&gt;he last two weeks, I've been thinking about it, and I like being alone. I like living by myself, and seeing people when I want to see people. I like being able to be messy, and do whatever I want, whenever I want. I like being able to be myself, and not have to worry about impressing someone

You can do this in a relationship too, not every relationship are those t.v style forced bullcrap. A lot of people actually like eachother a lot, and that cuddling....etc is not forced like at all.

Just wait till you find somebody you like, I used to be like you, but once you actually love somebody and it's not for the sake of a relationship it all changes.

My boyfriend is a slob sometimes, so am I, we both laugh about it, he's come over to laundry all over my house, broken toilet, dog piss on the floor; he's old, and shit garbage everywhere. I literally made him pee outside for a week once..... I don't know who you are trying to impress, relationships aren't about impressing eachother.

I do the most embarrassing shit infront of my boyfriend, the whole point of my relationship is to be myself and not feel I need to impress somebody, it's a judgment free zone. At least for me.No one, what are you talking about.

Blue Jays are the only thing close to "Canada's Team".

People in Toronto hate Montreal, people in Montreal hate Toronto, and the rivalries go everywhere, there is no affection for other teams unless you are from there/family is from there.Nothing really. Maybe how incredibly the same it was to my country. Reach for the Skylar1/4 of Canadians aren't white, other people play hockey, believe me. DNA decays over time, so we can't do it in the Jurassic Park method.

The only way to make a dinosaur is to use an animal that is related to them and try and turn on atvian; I think they're called, traits which are genetic traits from your past that remain dormant and don't activate. They're like evolutions blueprints.

Human beings contain characteristics from our past that turn off too, like how all embryo's look similar; for mammals, and how we almost grow a tail then stop with the bone..etc. 

If there was a way to fuck with genetics, we could maybe make a bird, reptile, or shark embryo grow into a dinosaur. 

Watch [this](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=0QVXdEOiCw8) to learn more in a simple and much better way. PQ wants to separate from Canada.Lords of the underground, darkness fills my soul with painCanada is too divided to have a single admired individual.
There are online therapy/psychiatry sessions, don't know how effective they are. Social cohesion, enforce a cultural melting pot and either spread French more/ require more education in it, or sever Quebec for good. Didn't we just kept on going on dates and here we are. Generally racist things. In my country, and I'm sure many others, not liking beer is usually pretty unpopular. I love beer, but even I scowl when someone says they don't. I know it doesn't taste good at first too.

Not like the NHL isn't popular in Canada either, I openly hate the Maple Leafs; am from the Toronto area. 

Not liking the winter.It's most likely an expiry date because the plastic seeps into the liquid eventually over time, which is why water has expiry dates on it.

You won't get sick, but you will be drinking plastic. 

Most pop's could in theory last for several decades if they were contained in something that wouldn't contaminate it. You're specialIt's safe to say not every Canadian likes Gretzky, a lot of us consider him an American now since he ditched the country check out /r/metacanada to see him mocked he is on the banner

I'm sure people in Quebec and the East coast might not give a fuck about him. http://www.pamf.org/teen/health/environment/your/plastic.html

http://www.mayoclinic.org/healthy-lifestyle/nutrition-and-healthy-eating/expert-answers/bpa/faq-20058331

http://www.livescience.com/32636-why-do-bottles-of-water-have-expiration-dates-.html

Pop is made of sugar, sugar lasts forever basically and doesn't really rot. No I'd say it's maybe or used to be David Suzuki, people hate him now, he was like our David Attenborough.

There are other people. It's not a hockey player, there is too much rivalry with hockey players, a lot of Canadians don't watch hockey, they don't even have pro teams on the East coast, or east of Montreal. When I joked about liking Taylor Swift in the lunch room at work when she was playing. I said she was my favourite, I just went to her concert....blah blah huge rant about how I love her. Everyone thought I was being serious.I am going to die.Ratchet, it's literally mispronouncing wretched, which reminds me of old british ladies, you guys are slanging an old persons word. Everyone is so stoopid and wrong about it, you wrong, I don't believe you, ever, ever, ever. I am right, you are wrong, I am right. Please get worked up.No I took it to another level.that's just because he's hot.Try /r/Finrand I mean /r/Finlandeverything?No I always go in the toilet and flush so I clearly don't care where it is. fuck off SJWHaha yes, but even then, you aren't special, there are many others like you.You have no idea how edgy and understanding I am of things, it's like I'm just better than everybody else and make massive assumptions based off a single internet comment, oops I did it again. nooooooooooooooooooooooOoOoOOoo

You are such an SJW, I'm tellingThey don't go bad, can someone just google it themselves, you can drink a pop ten years later and wont get sick as long as it's not contaminated.

Expiry date is to protect the manufacturer. http://www.stilltasty.com/articles/view/35

Read that.

Most of those ingredients are found in coke, it never actually rots like other foods do, that is it won't grow bacteria and won't become dangerous, it is the container that makes it dangerous. 

the ingredients in coke do not turn into a dangerous material over time.

I can't find a single article on coke ever going rotten, or it not going rotten either, too many articles on whether carbonation disappears.

Many forums I found on science where people were responding by saying what I am saying and that coke never goes rotten, it just won't taste good and the container decays into it just like everything else. Everything is an ideology. Literally everything in our lives, from the way we take shits, to how we eat our food and sleep.

The only thing that aren't, is actually taking a shit, and if I gave an opinion on taking a shit it would be an ideology. 

You give me an example that doesn't include ideology. 
by the way I friended youby the way I love youby the way I love how you went and downvoted all my posts by the way I love youLove youNo, it's means they're PrEPared. 

I'd take it as a sign they care about their health. This is an idealogy, *you* have been disqualified.

I L^o^v^e^ ^y^o^uyesIt hasn't, but to be honest I've only come here with pretty trivial problems so I don't blame it. They've done well for others. You did exact same shit to me.i stop the moment you dont reply I get the last wordAccuratesuck my dick bet.,,tchYes it was a great day for Canada, and therefore the world.Right away, tabarnak je le veux maintenant. Only in Saskatchewan.I never said she was shit by the way, I said she doesn't know about music production. There is a difference between singing, and writing music, anyone can be trained to belt out already written notes, not everyone can write and organize music properly.

She can read it because she sings it, I doubt she knows too much about music theory, and I doubt she could successfully write a song on her own.

The only reason she is big is because she is hot as fuck. She is talented, and hot, and was lucky enough to have been noticed. Did I mention how hot she is? Like ridiculously good looking and she can make a lot of money off those looks. 

I don't even like R and B

[Goapele](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=w_BNXqpdBTg)

[Jully Black](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=oYsu-_jyfTk) &lt;-- she isn't hot enough to ever become big, ever notice every huge pop artist is hot. Only rock artists and the odd hip hop artist can be ugly. 

[Divine Brown](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Q3jA56A3Yy4)

[Kesha Chante](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=g5M7J96GKFA)

all the same crap, Goapele and Divine Brown write their own music, Kesha Chante and Jully Black perform.

Difference, Beyonce is hot as fuck, three of them are Canadian so they'd never be big anyway, and Goapele is a hippie and heavily involved in womans rights movements and isn't as marketable as Beyonce.

I'm not telling you Beyonce is shit, she just doesn't deserve to be treated like some kind of icon when she is just basically a product, that's not something to look up to, being pretty, not writing your own music, and being a good dancer.  They're just girls with good voices shaking their booty, Beyonce is strikingly beautiful and tall so she outshines everyone else, she isn't some musical genius.

That's my biggest beef, she is not a musical genius, she isn't the top selling female artist blah blah because of her own work, somebody else wrote those scores, somebody else wrote those drum lines, somebody else wrote those lyrics.

The other artists I mentioned have more music credibility.

And tons of people criticize her for not writing her own shit, I read a lot of music reviews, and there is always somebody blasting her for not writing her own music.yes exactly.Honestly I may be one of the only people that actually is really attracted to a sense of humour, people say they're attracted to a sense of humour, but I feel not to the extent I am. Funny guys really get to me. 

Some of the biggest crushes I had in highschool were on complete goofs who traditionally wouldn't be sought after, but they were funny and if you can make me laugh I'm basically sold. A Soda Stream and a gift certificate to a candy store.To me it's an excuse for someone to say they're interesting, not saying they aren't interesting, but it's a way to say " I am into doing random shit and am easy going".

Meaning they will accept random suggestions to do things, and don't like staying in the house.

I don't know what the hell a real adventure is, I don't consider a random outing to a commercial establishment an adventure.

Maybe going on a trail somewhere, then deviating from the path and just trekking through the woods would be an adventure because you really don't know what you are going to get.

Driving and just looking for a place to eat/do is more boredom killing.

Adventure entails you actually have no idea what could possibly be the outcome of what you are doing. 

Me and my SO found a swimming hole in my town after checking out an abandoned church, not super exciting, but that was an adventure because we literally had no idea that we would be swimming 10 minutes after checking the church out. 

But ya, I'd take it as they are trying to say they are easy going and willing to try new things. Asking to get tested, or if he has been recently is not a big deal and should almost be expected, he is much older than you, I am sure he regularly gets checked and wouldn't be taken aback if you asked.

I mean he is 41...... he should be able to handle a conversation about infection and disease. 

Don't stress, you are doing the right thing, and I don't think there is a reason to worry a lot since you used protection. No because we could write a "Gay people what is the straighest thing you've done thread" and be just as offensive.

Most is good natured ribbing, reddit isn't the most homophobic environment I've found. Barely anybody has said anything truly homophobic besides trolls and super religious, and both of those groups don't bother me.

Trolls are just having fun, and like fucking with people, anybody, gay people aren't just the target.

Super religious people have their own personal beliefs that have to do with something that's been in their lives for years, so them being homophobic is nothing to me, it just means they are being very old school faithful. Most religious people shouldn't wish harm on you, so that's not really the biggest deal if they think they're saving your soul; at least the intent is good.

Those threads reinforce stereotypes, but whatever.No one is going to tell you your friend was right, you didn't even tell him off, you just asked him why you aren't in the hospital if you are so sick.

I think you being gay may have changed his mind on it because you clearly aren't sick and you guys are friends; so maybe he is realizing that his opinion was stupid. &gt;It's get worse when we meet up with is old friends and they talk about their previous adventures in partying in the scene.

You do know not everyone does this with their friends, and not everyone is ok with talking like that or even doing that? So don't feel bad, his friends are just different from you and you may be feeling peer pressure basically, because this particular group of peers has done something you haven't.

I slept around in highschool, but have been in relationships since around 21. I don't feel like I'm missing out, and I never feel the need to talk about my sexual escapades in highschool.

I even regret all that random sex I had because it was meaningless and I honestly don't remember any of it really, so it goes to show how important it can be to people.

NOt saying people can't enjoy random sex, and all that, but it's not for everyone, so it seems like it may not be for you.

If it was for you, you would be thrilled your boyfriend wants to partake and would take the opportunity. The fact you don't want to because he doesn't want to shows you are slightly monogamous, and maybe aren't meant to sleep around.

I think humans are a mix of monogamy and polygamy. A lot of our characteristics are similar to that of monogamous animals, and a lot of our ancestral past is characteristics of polygamous. Humans have the potential to be both.

If you can't consciously sleep with another guy while in a relationship you most likely lean towards monogamy. Polygamous are capable of spreading their feelings to others regardless of current relationships; and there is nothing wrong with that it's actually kind of awesome to be able to do this.

I'm making massive assumptions about you, but just thought I'd give you a point of view from someone who is 1 year younger than you and is monogamous.

My current SO's friends all slept around in the past, and I really don't enjoy listening to them talk about sex. I love sex, but it's not something I care to talk about in great length, to me it's like describing a shit you took, it's just a bodily function you satisfy, talking about it too much is a bit baboonish. 

This is why I'm glad I'm friends with straight people, they never ask about my sexual details, and I never ask about theirs, we aren't prudes at all, we can handle talks about it, but the conversation hardly ever strays there, we like to talk about a lot of other stuff, and not just what hole we stuck a body part in. I wrote a huge response, and deleted because I'm derailing the convo, this is about guilt pleasures, not who is a musician or not. I'm sorry. I have a small stomach, so I can't eat much, I've always been like that, I eat lots of little meals versus one massive meal. My parents always told me when I was a kid, and even now, that my eyes are bigger than my stomach. 

Huge meals make me sluggish and feel like crap, so not everyone that orders little is watching their weight, I just don't want to get the ITIS, I literally get it anytime I over eat.

Fucking poutine, don't let me near that shit, three bites and I'm fucking bloated and feeling like crap.

But honestly, Italian/Mexican house, can I fucking marry you? I would be eating that shit all the time, just not big sittings, but those two foods are my favourite. You'd literally have to wash my back with a rag on a stick after a year.

I'm pretty sure I would be fat as fuck if I dated someone making Italian/Mexican food all the time, I could not stop eating, that shit is fucking delicious.no but First Nations have some weird last names because of us trying to anglocize them. That could explain Tobacco Juice; a poor translation of something that sounds much better.no, most university students will be happy, despite what you think, Harper has support from Canadians, and leads/is neck and neck, in most provinces....

I'm sick of this "Harper" isn't Canada bullshit, people support him, and those people are Canadians, I don't go around saying the Liberals and NDP aren't Canadians because they conflict with what I want in a leading party. They're all Canadian.

Canadians like Harper, believe it or not, the people that voted in the past two elections were Canadians. 

I'm a Canadian that has only voted once, and that vote was for David Tilson/The Conservatives. 

Usain Bolt isn't a Rasta. 

He is a devout Catholic. Water has a bit of a metallic/rust/salty taste depending where you get it from.

It pretty much always has residual minerals in it.

I notice tap water from city taps tastes like chlorine almost, the water from my tap; which is from a well, tastes very mineral/sand like.

It's a super mild taste but I notice it. fleekYes I have really sensitive tastes; I hate vinegar and many strong tastes because of it, I can taste vinegar in ketchup and mustard.

I can also smell sneezes; not even joking, they smell like a greenhouse.

Water always tastes different to me, and I never understood "it tastes like nothing", because I always get a hint of something. I looked it up and pretty much everything backed up what I thought.

My water is really hard and full of minerals, and I can really taste it, it's almost like licking a rock.

When I drink city water it literally reminds me of pool water. 

Bottle water has the faintest taste, but if it's been in the sun I can literally taste the plastic in it and that's why I never drink bottled water, only when it's fresh from a store; even then it can be bad.

I think water itself doesn't have much of a taste, it would be best described as light metal possibly. Mineral water is actually really tasty to me; the one from my well, I kind of like that rock taste.

City water is gross, but it's safe to drink, and just as good as bottled.

If a bottle of water doesn't have that plastic taste to it, I think that's the "best" water because it's the purest I've had at least.

I prefer the taste of the minerals though, it's actually kind of nice. Yes, well rain water is basically the cleanest water; even then it can have pollution in it.

Water is just from the earth, it flows around collecting minerals, plastic bottles leak plastic into it over time and if exposed to heat, and city water is heavily treated(it is still safe). So it basically always has something in it.

I honestly don't even know if it's possible to make 100% water.

There is also different kinds of H20 there is H2013, h204....etc, that is the last number is on the top; not the bottom. Some of them are toxic to humans, I forget what type we have mainly on Earth. That's not inflammatory though, but I get what you mean, the public doesn't accept it even though it seems it may be True.

The OP means something really offensive that is True.Ya science pretty much has proven this.

However, MEN can be just as skilled in things WOMEN mainly are skilled in and vice versa.

Women tend to be shitty at motor skills, which is actually scientifically proven, they are generally worse at navigating through their environment than a man.

But Women can be just as skilled; it's not that rare, as a man in this respect.

Women generally are better at communicating, they can create a large vocabulary base in their head, and can translate their feelings into words much much easier than men.

But again. Men have been shown; not gay ones, to be just as skilled a women in this respect, and some women just can't do it.

But generally so, yes there are differences, but I think the fact they aren't 100% all the time is why we don't accept it.

I mean in China a man is typically bigger than a female, but take the average height of a Chinese man and compare it to the average height of a Scandinavian woman and all of a sudden it's the women that is larger, and stronger. They're both proven by science to be human and of the same species, virtually no genetic differences, yet women in some parts of the world are way larger than men in parts of the world.

This is why it is impossible to 100% say there are differences, I agree there are, but they're defied too.That the free market and capitalistic economies are actually extremely unsustainable, wasteful, and destructive.

I am not a neckbeard, this is just the truth, they do not make sense in the long term what so ever. Some of them already had careers. My dog is an Old English Sheepdog, he already is a shepherd. True.I'm not saying there is, but free market and capitalization end up 

A) Pooling the wealth to a small population; because tehre will always be humans that want more and more no matter what it's just a human characteristic give someone the ability to monopolize anything and it will happen.

B) Encourage consumption, and over consumption to profit those that are involved in the free market; so they can make more money obviously. This means humans are told to live way beyond their means and what they actually need.

C) Encourages the destruction of the planet, because everything we consume comes from the Earth, more farm land, more deforestation, more oil consumption...etc. We are eventually going to run out of these resources, it just doesn't work it capitalistic views, they just can't be sustained, we will and are going to eventually destroy the planet.

D) Encourages the degradation of our general health and safety, our food is a part of the free market, and a lot of our food is poisonous and harmful for us. The people selling it to us are just looking at money; again because of the free market. This is why cars have safety recalls, toys had lead in them.....etc, the free market encourages people to make as much money as possible and that often means the product can be compromised. When it comes to our food, that shouldn't be something can heavily profit off, it's a life necessity that shouldn't be fucked with. 

E) Encourages materialistic cultures to develop which actually kills real human culture. When everyone is busy consuming, and trying to make money to consume; by getting other people to consume, our lives become meaningless. There isn't as much magic in our lives because we are too focused on consuming rather than living. people get an education and a good job mainly so they can buy a house, buy a car, have lots of food, go on vacation, buy clothes, buy , buy, buy, buy,buy. Yes wanting a comfortable life is good, but we have virtually equated comfort with overconsumption. If you don't have the newest/latest thing you can't be comfortable because our society has taught us that old is bad and new is good.... I have no idea why.

I could go on and on, I am a part of this, and I live in this consumer culture, I buy Adidas shoes, I buy three pairs a year, I buy razor blades that I throw out and end up in the land fill, I buy food that has toxic chemicals in it and is devoid of nutrients. I do a lot of bullshit, which is why I am ensuring you I am not a neckbeard.

I feel you can't insult capitalism without looking like a neckbeard, which is why I posted this in this thread. I really think it's stupid. Riley, he's the cutest dog on the face of the Earth. They're extremely good natured, but almost needy.

I really don't consider them dogs they're so different, he is the biggest whiner on the planet, and you could pet him for hours and hours and he doesn't back away.

Most other dogs I know get bored after a while, but the second I remove my hand from his head he started to squeal. Which is why I try not to pet him if I am going to be doing something because I can't resist his whine. Ummm /r/roastme come back and thank me

Go to Top Posts or Gilded comments. Under the legs taint shot, so fucking gross, it looks like a science experiment. There really isn't much. I work/ed at Home Depot and we already know our powers, which aren't much. There really isn't a whole lot we can do for you.

I know in Canada you can give $50 off to whoever you want; but you can't abuse it, there is no trigger word to get that, just be extremely nice, I only gave it to people that were being ridiculously nice.

If you are a dick at Home Depot, you pretty much are going to get no help from anybody, we all tell eachother whose being a douche bag, we remember them, we remember their faces. The word spreads incredibly quick because we are bored, be rude to someone, and literally 2 minutes later everyone knows and is going to ignore you. 

Always be nice to customer service people, they do talk, they're bored at work and don't respond well to some shit head being an asshole.

I go out of my way to help people if they're being a dick, have asked people to "wait right here" and I'd go on my lunch. $300 for bedroom in my parents house, haha, I do the yardwork and pay for the cable, they're poor, and wouldn't charge me if they could afford it.

So for now its basically the best place to rent for me because you can't get any cheaper than this. I sometimes make meals for them to help them out more. 

Also, not as big a deal in Canada to live in with your parents, especially if you live in the Toronto area where houses are over $500,000-1,000,000; you cannot get one for under that, even a shitbox in the ghetto is over 1/2 million.

If I was on my own I'd be paying $1,000 for maybe a 1 bedroom basement apartment. If I rented an apartment it'd be over a grand. my friends have an apartment in Toronto that is smaller than my bedroom and they pay $1,500 a month, it literally is a kitchen/livingroom/bedroom in one room with a tiny bathroom. I have my own garage entrance, own kitchen, and own bathroom. Fuck the city.  Haha you are not alone, my sister is 32, and still paying student loans from over 5 years ago; though she had two kids.

I fucking hate the GTA, even my shit box town Caledon the rent is around $1500-2000 a month, I am getting a god damn deal with my parents. Also if I move out I know they will have to come up with that extra $300 themselves and would have to start doing all the house work, which again would affect them because they don't make a lot of money.

My brother lives with us, and my Sister her two kids and her husband. We live in the countryside in a pretty large house(3000 square feet), my parents bought this place for $250,000 their shitbox in Etobicoke sold for more, back in the early 90s.

Now this house is worth over a million; my Dad owes pretty much all of that to the government/bank. So ya we are poor, but we are pretty lucky, get to live in a huge house in the country, and there is enough of us that we get the bills paid for relatively cheap.

That $9,000 a year property tax is another story; 4th highest property tax in the country. 

You do get the city living where you are though, which is why it may be so expensive. I mean I bet you had fun living down there for sure, look at it that way, you paid for a lot of fun. Are you in the burbs now or out of the GTA?

The burbs are getting just as pricey, they're almost not worth it. 

I literally am going to move to Collingwood as soon as I'm done school, houses are dirt cheap, and Barrie isn't too far; for work. That's if all works out. 

My brothers friend has a mansion just North of Sudbury that was like $150,000, but he has to live North of Sudbury haha. /r/askgaybros can be pretty divided on things, sometimes I feel like it's a circlejerk;no pun intended, but I can say pretty much anything there and get someone backing me up. I'd say it's one of the more open to different opinion subreddits. 

But it's for gay people, so haha, I guess kind of useless to know about 

/r/metacanada is pretty open too despite it's appearance. My SO is from Alabama, I keep on telling him we're moving to the U.S whenever we can.

How long have you been out of the country, do you miss the GTA? Do you ever come back?

Haha sorry I know so many people that have left and are envious. Not everyone is monogamous, which is fine. I think society should be more open to polyamorous relationships.

I am more monogamous myself.

Why I like it? I really don't care about fucking other people when I'm in a relationship, like I hardly ever get the urge, and when I do I just jack off and it's done with, I don't feel like I'm misisng out.

I prefer to get to know someone on a super deep level, and just one person, so that I know their attention, and my attention can always be diverted to eachother. I am far too jealous of a person to handle more than one person at a time, it's just in my nature.

So monogamy works for me, but if none of that affects you I don't see a problem with not following it.

It just is what I actually naturally want, I am a homosexual, we have a lot more open relationships than straight people, and are "stereotyped" for sleeping around, but despite all that, I feel find myself only wanting one person at a time. The moment the US starts controlling their guns, is the moment Canada starts having less gun violence as well.

Most of our guns are imported from the U.S, this isn't American's fault, it's the criminals in your country and my country's fault.

But ya, as someone who actually isn't from the U.S, I want to see gun control laws there because it would help out Canada too.

Virtually all of crimes committed with guns, are illegal imports from the U.S, like 99% of them. 

You know your country has a problem with guns, when it's gun problem is spilling into it's neighbours streets. I don't mind basements, but people hate them, they are always cheaper because of that.

My friend actually had a basement apartment in Brampton for $850 a month if you can believe it, with his own parking spot. He was really sad when he had to move to a place with $1200 rent. 

Brampton can be cheap, but that's because nobody wants to live in Brampton, but I wouldn't mind, I'm from the next town, it's like 20 minutes away, so it wouldn't be that big of a deal. 

GTA is a bit overpriced in my opinion when the average rent in Montreal is $750 a month..... that hurts my soul. 

I would love to live in Toronto, but I wouldn't be able to afford it on what I can earn at the moment, which is a bit unfair, yes I'm a lower income earner; in school right now, and it sucks that I can't even live near the city without sacrificing quality of life because it's so expensive.

The demand isn't even as large as it seems, a lot of people from other countries invest in GTA real estate because it's so lucrative right now. 

I hope some sort of crash happens, or at least freeze in prices.

Even people with decent incomes would find it difficult to get a house in the GTA.

My one buddy is a welder and makes alright money, but he had to move to Waterloo because he just couldn't approved for over $500,000, especially with the down payment he had.

He really likes it there.

But ya, I don't mind basements, so don't be down on that, it really isn't the worst thing and they're nice in the SUMMER for sure, sucks in the winter. 

You are doing good, working and living by yourself, a home is a home, and basements can be very nice :) at least you are saving versus a stupid condo or apartment.

If you saw the piece of shit apartment my friend rents at Yonge and Eglinton for $1700 a month you would want to shoot yourself in the head, it is the size of a kids bedroom in the suburbs. 

And as you said, paying for all that extra bullshit adds up, my friend ditched her car and just does transit; she saves on insurance but can't leave the city without renting.

I'm 25, and I plan to move out at 26, so we are one in the same,I will be in a basement too. And most likely in Brampton/ Mississauga. http://www.justice.gc.ca/eng/rp-pr/csj-sjc/jsp-sjp/wd98_4-dt98_4/p9.html#a91

In its 1997 Annual Report on Organized Crime in Canada, the Criminal Intelligence Service Canada reported that "organized crime groups and individual criminals have access to a wide variety of firearms with an increasing predilection for automatic weapons" (1997: 15). According to the same source, these firearms are usually smuggled into Canada or acquired through criminal activities such as break-and-enters and thefts (Ibidem). **There appear to be few reports of illegal manufacturing of firearms in Canada**.

http://www.rcmp-grc.gc.ca/ci-rc/reports-rapports/traf/index-eng.htm

According to the Canada Border Services Agency (CBSA), in 2006, 96 per cent of all firearms seized originated in or transited through the United States. 

From government website, what you mentioned is a recent trend that represents a small part of the gun problem, most of our guns come from the U.S, it is America's problem.

All the Canadian gang bangers are usually wielding American weapons, the organized crime in Canada who really don't commit that many shootings use guns from other ways/ American imports.

Believe me when I say the majority of shootings here; which aren't even fatal, are gang bangers who have cousins in the states....etc, it's all American imports. 

Weapons manufacturers aren't going to deal with stupid thugs from Jane and Finch. They'd deal with the MOB and Hells Angels, and they barely kill people; they do though. 
http://www.mackenzieinstitute.com/on-street-gangs-and-guns/

&gt;in 1992-93, Operation Gunrunner (a police intelligence project in Southern Ontario) resulted in the purchase of 17 black market handguns \u2013 16 of which had been diverted to the underground from within the United States.

&gt;1994 at the trial of a Vermont gun-dealer who was diverting firearms into the Canadian black market (via the Mohawk Warriors) details were provided from Canadian police about 102 handguns \u2013 out of something ranging from 700 to 2,000 pistols which were smuggled into Canada. The Canadian police who recovered these weapons in arrests all across the country also retrieved 45 other weapons at the time; at least seven of which had also been smuggled into Canada from the US.

&gt;For those who cannot do the arithmetic, 16 out of 17 equates to 94 percent, not 50%. And 107 (at least) out of 145 comes to 74 percent. The usual estimate of street cops is that at least 80% of the pistols in the hands of Canadian criminals come from American sources. Anecdotal evidence from street cops and coroners in 2004-5 across Canada suggest this trend is holding.What I'm getting at is you are trying to divert the attention from the U.S and take a trending problem over decades; I can provide more recent sources, and not giving it the gravity it deserves.

The fact is the U.S is the main reason we have so many guns on the street, not Canadian manufacturers, it is incredibly easy to buy a gun in the U.S for dirt cheap and you can sell it in Canada for a huge profit. 

http://news.nationalpost.com/news/canada/increasing-number-of-firearms-on-ottawa-streets-due-to-influx-of-illegal-guns-from-the-u-s-police-say

**According to the most recent data from the Ontario Provincial Police, foreign-sourced guns made up the majority of \u201ccrime guns\u201d seized by officers. The 2011 numbers showed that 60 per cent of guns used in crimes were smuggled across the U.S. border, 20 per cent were locally sourced, while the remaining 20 per cent couldn\u2019t be traced.**

I get that some are from Canada, but to ignore the US as a problem simply because a couple of recent shootings were from gun manufacturers and you just bought one does not mean that they're not coming from the U.S.

You have to think about the type of people that buy firearms to shoot people, they aren't the type who can just legally buy one, and they aren't the type that can do a dirty deal with a manufacturer or an organized crime unit. They're too stupid and small time, they just have family in the U.S, or go to Natives. 

http://www.thestar.com/news/investigations/2013/04/12/star_investigation_star_reporters_buy_cheap_us_gun_no_id_required.html

**Cheap American handguns are flooding Toronto streets.
At least 70 per cent of all guns used in Toronto crimes are smuggled from the U.S., mostly from states with lax gun purchase laws that make it easy to buy a pistol in a pawnshop, at a gun show or in a parking lot.**

Recent enough for you?I used government sources because they're more credible, there haven't been any other updated information by the government on guns. They don't really spend the money on that, when they should, which is why so many of them are untraceable, and you can bet the majority of those are also from the U.S. 

You can search the government websites those are the most recent updates. I read statistics all the time. that is democracy, we aren't letting the votes of the minority of the population go unheard.

If more people in Canada want the Conservatives to win that is democracy, that means the largest group of people gets the leader they wanted, it doesn't matter if its 5% and there are 40 parties, it is still democracy.

70% of Canadians are not against the Conservatives, a lot are undecided, and most adults I know aren't as callus about them as youngins.

It's mainly the young people who are all hyped up about the Charter of Rights and Freedoms and blah blah, that are upset with the Conservatives.

Most people that are against the Conservatives, are just traditionally Liberal anyway; like Toronto, they haven't gone from supporting to changing their opinion.

The only thing that's changed is the NDP has taken a larger chunk from BOTH parties, lots of older people remember how horrible the Liberals can be too, and realize that the economic situation Canada is facing would be worse if the Liberals had been in power. Harper did a lot for the economy, but the WORLD economy isn't working.

Everyone is blaming the world's problems on the Conservatives, when our current situation would be the same regardless of who is in power.

You do realize that you can be against the FPTP system and support the Conservatives too right? You don't have to be on board with every decision the party you choose makes. I feel that's an issue that isn't important at the moment. 

Like I absolutely do not like that the Conservatives support Israel, and basically everything to do with their foreign policy, but I still support them versus the other two.

I'd vote NDP but I have no idea what would happen if they actually were in power, and don't trust Mulcair.(I'm almost an NDP at Heart and wouldn't care if they won). I just don't want the Liberals in power. 

Harper seems like he enjoys power more than money, and I feel Mulcair and Trudeau could be bought out. 
No read my original post

&gt; Most of our guns are imported from the U.S, this isn't American's fault, it's the criminals in your country and my country's fault.

I was blaming it on criminals in both countries. 

Glad you are able to have a civil discussion though, one of the few redditors that hasn't told me to fuck off because I don't agree with them.

I wasn't placing it solely on them, but I was saying once they restrict it, it will trickle down into Canada and become harder to get them.

I'm sure once that happened manufacturers and importers would start filling the role though.

I read while searching stats for you that a lot of people in the movie industry import guns; they're allowed, and illegally sell them. That's a very random source you would never think of. You also made me realize there was a trend of domestic sourced guns in Canada; still mainly from the U.S, but it seems people are trying other ways too.

Maybe 9/11 and subsequent actions have made it harder to smuggle?Blanks

Blank-fire guns are real, working weapons that have been minimally modified to fire blank cartridges. Blank cartridges contain gunpowder, but do not fire a shell or bullet. They are used for scenes that require a believable muzzle-flash and a loud report. They can be costly and dangerous.

-- from another source.

I don't think they're used as often as dummies, but for high budget movies that want some realism they use them, and they're actually legal to import into Canada as long as they're being used for the movie industry.

Some production companies I read used this as an excuse to import illegal weapons and sell some of them.

They're modified to not work, but can be fixed into fully functioning weapons again. Yes but if you read the article from Ottawa and Toronto you will realize that the guns are coming from the Southern states with the most lax laws, like Georgia and Florida which aren't far from Ontario/Quebec at all, you can drive to Florida within a day from Ontario.

Ontario is closer to the most gun relaxed states since we are the most south, and all those states are mainly in the South too.

Alabama, Georgia, Florida, Mississippi, Missouri.....etc, they're directly south of us.

The article says they use the I 70 to transit them from the deep south to the North.

There is also a problem with Americans in general getting illegal weapons from these states too.

Guns used in crime in New York...etc some of them also are traced to the south too. There was a huge deal about it, some seller in Florida was literally selling them to anyone and not even looking at IDs. No no, you misunderstood; thanks for telling me how they work. Canadian import laws ban certain weapons from entering Canada, however if they are used in the movie industry they can be imported.

This means that some people were just importing guns that weren't even going to be used in the movie. As in it was a couple of people they think importing these weapons on behalf of production companies that didn't even need the gun. Nobody who actually produced the movie would even know the gun was order and imported, the company was used as an excuse to be allowed to import them and sell them illegally; they think. 

They're still obviously used, I'm sure Resident Evil used real guns. Well I've driven to Florida three times in less than a day, we just took turns driving.

I'm about 1 hour away from Buffalo, and from that point it's a direct interstate route right to Florida.

You are acting like travelling across the U.S is hard. https://www.google.ca/?gws_rd=ssl#q=Caledon+to+florida

My town, to Florida, 20 hours

20 h 26 min (2,195.5 km) via I-95 SIs that what they're called Juniors? When they're like literally a one room, with a closet for a kitchen and a closet for a bathroom?not meWell I could be super racist and say it's because they're the only ones that don't drop out.

That's what my response would be. Oh god should I delete it now?are you guys mocking me, I was making a joke, I don't know if I should leave it or not.You have no class

*ba dum dum*Haha, it would be an issue, I was just arguing that it's still democracy that's all.

You have the right to your opinion, and again I agree with changing our system, just right now I don't think it should be an issue for whether you vote for a party or not.

I support the Conservatives on other things, so that isn't enough for me to not want to vote for them.

But I do agree with you 100% on that, and it is inefficient. Minority governments should have minority power. can't tell if sarcasmMac DreI got into an argument with some guy yesterday on reddit, I checked out his profile, and looked at his gilds, he has had a pretty funny history, some guy is following him around gilding the most random comments

https://www.reddit.com/user/SOwED/gilded/

https://www.reddit.com/r/NoFap/comments/38xf1s/ive_decided_to_leave_nofap_and_here_are_the/crzx5cj

&gt;Why do you keep following me and sporadically gilding comments of mine that have no upvotes?

^ That comment even got gilded.


It's worth a lookI should have said to intentionally convey sarcasm through written text. don't be so harsh on yourselfI do not understand the horror stories, unless you are a puritan that can't handle seeing the odd unsolicited dick pic and dirty talk, I think anybody can handle it.

You are a big boy; I'm assuming.

If you are under 18, you can't handle it, you will be preyed upon by pervs. Do you mean getting involved, or being involved?It just happens, there is no etiquette it depends on the person.

I've found that guys can move quickly, though I know nothing about girls; I had a few friends that were girls in highschool. Every guy I've become friends with just happened.

A bunch of guys at work invite me out; even after knowing them for only a week, so I don't think there is any time frame and it depends on the person. I wasn't weirded out by someone wanting to get a beer a week into knowing them. 

So do what you feel.  Guys aren't as stand offish as girls I think, I could be wrong. I don't watch any serious shows that aren't reality. They're all funny.

Kroll Show, Eric Andre Show, Broad City, Workaholics, Nathan for You, Your Pretty Face is Going to Hell, Check it Out with Dr Steve Brule

--------------------------

I watch a lot of stupid reality shows like First 48, 600 lb life, Hoarders, but I wouldn't recommend them, they're depressing. Johanneskirchen, GermanyUm I talked to my grandma on facetime when I got head once. On Christmas, and Jesus was there, with a raptor.Do you really get something when you get involved, or are you just doing something? Isn't being involved the correct term? Doesn't being mean doing, and doing mean being, but getting is doing but not being. Well you are looking for guys looking for sex who may have a certain look they want.

If you looked for a relationship I doubt bottom/top would matter.

I top my SO and he's 3 inches taller, I topped a guy a dated for a bit a while back and he was like 4 inches taller than me..... so I don't know.

I also don't actually understand the race comments.... what about being an asian makes people want to stick their dick in your ass.... I honestly do not understand that and am not being an SJW.

There are a lot of asians in my area and I haven't notice them being bottoms?

I also like to top masculine looking guys, so I don't understand the cute thing. 

Ba'ha, maybe it's because I'm from the country.Yes, I'd imagine mostly everywhere public sex is illegal. 

My friend at work's sister is a cop who used to bust gay guys having sex at a bathroom in Sears(Brampton, Ontario) it is apparently a hook up spot, and very illegal; threw the name out there if anybody else has heard about it. 

You are in Australia, I'd imagine their laws are basically the same as Canada when it comes to public sex... now I'm confused, don't know if arguing semantics or took me seriously the whole time. not everyone has a 1950's mindsetThat sucks, but I don't think it's inappropriate for you to tell her not to say that infront of you , you don't even need to mention the boy.

Say you understand that she isn't homophobic but you don't like the idea of her spreading the use of the word because you know how it can affect actual kids that are gay... I don't know some SJW crap.

My niece calls me gay all the time; she is starting to realize it, she learnt it from kids at school, she laughs about it ....etc. I just ignore it, she is too young to understand complex things like not alienating a minority group. I just tell her it's not nice to make fun of people, you can do that to with him.Ahh, ok, now things are going over my head for sure, explain, maybe I'm too stupid. Did you just call me a commoner or something?Where was this when I was in Grade 5?I'm not a big fan of the backside, so I personally don't care, I know I don't like completely shaven. 
Maybe you have a cold. There isn't much you can pick up from kissing that is significantly harmful. Some smart ass is gonna chime in and say Ebola, Meningitis...etc. 

Always skype before meeting to catch those catfish, happened to me before.Wow what a dick. Oh, well there could have been allergens and other irritants inside if it wasn't clean.

You didn't catch some deadly disease by visiting someones apartment. You aren't in Guinea or Sierra Leone are you? :)

Obviously go to a doctor if symptoms persist, but there isn't anything to worry about besides the everyday bug. 

Also, on the subject of catfishers, honestly do the skype thing, I've been catfished twice. Skyping eliminates the potential of that happening. I never understood why people do it, absolutely nobody would be cool with that.

Start off a relationship with mad dishonesty, ya great fucking tactic. It's hard to explain, but you need to get into a frame of mind where you realize that like elerico said you just have to do it.

There is a psych up process were you kind of build up these events in your head, but once you do them you realize how tame they really are.

There really is nothing to be nervous about going out, you are going to be with friends. Just go and have a good time. No one is judging you, no one is going to even care that you there, when you go out, everyone is in their own world, the only people that care you are there are your friends. There is literally no reason to be nervous.

Why I keep saying this is because what could possibly happen if you went out? What threat is there? There is no threat. 

What about your parents makes you feel they are judging you?

Hope you do it, socializing will help you with your self confidence problems as well. Ya so am I. It was hard to tell if he was joking or not, then I realized he was serious. I used GrindR thats about it. Everyone is going to tell you to move to the city, but that's maybe because they don't live in the country and don't know what they're talking about.

I've managed to be in a relationship for the past 5 years consistently and I live in a village of 2,000. I am close to a metro area of 5 million though, though I mainly date people from other small towns.

GrindR will be your saviour, other apps really aren't used by guys in the country/ aren't populated enough.

That or Tinder is your best bet.

GrindR in the country is a bit different, tons of people looking for hookups but tons of people looking for dates too. I live in the actual country, believe me. Bonfires are an everyday occurrence here, it's not abnormal to hear gun shots going off from farmers shooting at crows, coyotes or turkeys....etc we 're all huge hicks. 

I just don't know how isolated you are, I am pretty isolated, but I'm close enough to other towns with decent populations. 

Gay scenes, like bars and clubs....etc do not exist in the country, your local bar is your gay bar. Whether Israel is legitimate. Learnt my lesson not to tell a Jewish guy you sympathize with Palestine. He thought I was racist..... even though I was dating him, and they're not a race. You know that if you do other stuff that's still sex right?

If bottoming hurts you are gonna have to keep doing it till you know for sure it hurts you.

Honestly, it's really uncomfortable for some people, even if they want it. My ex was a bottom, but I couldn't ever top because he'd make all these noises like I was hurting him, and I lost my boner. I'm pretty sure he shouldn't be bottoming ever.

I don't know how many times you've tried, but isn't there a point where you just say" This isn'tfor me"

Despite what gay porn tells you a lot of gay guys don't do anal that much.you canadian, not asian.So the answer is brown rice because it's funnier when we say it. Or at least Americans think it's hilarious. Ya that's only Jews that are in that lineage, you do know there are plenty of Jews that had ancestors who were converts, or a mother that was Jewish?

By that sense, I should have the Jewish genetic marker because my Great Grandfather was Jewish, my Nana was a Catholic Irish lady with Freckles and pale skin who wore a star of David to remember her dad. It just confuses me that they could be considered a uniformed race when they seem to be so diverse?

Also, I use the term race lightly, I'm not going to deny physical differences between groups of people from geographic locations, they're very superficial, and we're all the same species of animal, but geography is proven to affect physical characteristics and certain people developed certain physical attributes by living in the same area over time.

The further south you go the more pigment the natives produce which actually slows down skin cancer rates, the further north you go the lighter the skin because white skin is much better at reacting to sunlight; so we can produce vitamin D. 

Asian eyes developed to protect; they think, either against wind burn from living in the himalayas or to protect from the glare of snow. People who were blinded by the snow/annoyed by the wind were more likely to die and therefore not spread their material.

Jewish people like everyone else can be traced back to Africa. They also don't share the same for sure guaranteed physical characteristics that Indo-Europeans, East Asians, or Africans do. They all are Indo-European or African. 

But practically everyone from Europe , Middle East, and South Asia can trace their lineage to the exact same place Jewish people do; the fertile valley. 

I read in that link you provided that Palestinians also share their lineage with Jewish people.... why are they considered two different races? 
http://www.livescience.com/40247-ashkenazi-jews-have-european-genes.html

Also there on the Ashkenazi jews having European genes. Well you can just try it every once in a while, don't try too much at once.

Whoever you are with just say ok I want a break for now, there is a getting used to it phase I believe.

I tried it, and personally do not like it, it just doesn't do it for me, despite me thinking I would enjoy bottoming.

I still do it just for my partners sake, but very rarely, he knows it's not the greatest for me, so I usually just let him do it when I'm drunk. 

Also if your partner has a huge dong that's not gonna help.All that masc stuff is pretty bullshit, I've yet to meet an actual "masc" gay guy, I've yet to meet a truly masc straight guy too.

There definitely isn't one in the gay scene.

My ex played a shit ton of sports, played baseball, coached baseball, played in a basketball league.....etc he was pretty femme, he enjoyed clothes shopping and was really into fashion. 

I play sports, am not into fashion, like crude male humour, generally only get along with males, but I'm overly sensitive and am worse than the stereotype of a female when it comes to that... so there is no True masc.

I pretty much expect anyone who describes themselves as "masc" to be putting on a show and lying, having huge arms and wearing a hat backwards does not make you masc my friend. 

I also live in the country, most females around here could be described as masc because they aren't afraid of bugs, animals, the cold, getting dirty, doing labour....etc blah blah blah. I could consider most city folks girly based on a lot of gender "norms", even the manly ones. 

There is no proper way to define it, my mom is a girly girl, but she chops wood like a lumberjack and is a nut for the Patriots....

I could go on and on about everyone defies it, but you get the picture.

I would focus on just meeting people and not paying attention to labels, and just liking who you like.

I would describe myself as a nerd, my boyfriend is a jock, I'm more masc than he is though... confusing. bout fuckin timeI don't know if trains are a good place to hit on people in general especially in the morning.

There are certain times this is appropriate I wouldn't think this would be, though I nothing about commuter life as I've lived in the boondocks my whole life. you are invited, he is dropping you off, he agreed to do someone a favour, he isn't going to mind that you are there, there will be no problem with you being there. Again, he is doing a favour for someone not hanging out with you.

Treat the girls like everyday people, there is no sexual interest so you can throw nerves out the window, who cares what they think. They're not going to judge you, again you are going with a friend so I don't know why you would feel out of place, people bring random friends all the time.

Everytime I go to my buddies house there is some rando there I've never met, we both just say hi, and treat eachother like another member of the group, there is no issue when you share a common friend. Only teenagers are xenophobic towards strangers, adults generally like meeting new people, especially young adults. 

You should be excited to meet them, and they're going to be excited to meet you.

If you are a shy guy that doesn't talk alot just smile and give off body language that you are happy and there should be no awkwardness. I don't mind quiet people as long as they give a sign that they aren't having a bad time, which is look like you are listening to people,smile, have open body language, chime in every once in a while, even if you are just agreeing with someone.

The easiest way to get involved in a conversation with someone you don't know is to agree with something they say the moment they say something that you agree with. If they say they like "x food place", and so do you, say " Me too, I love that place", it's not hard.

You aren't going to be expected to be the commander of the conversation, talking to people in groups is a group effort. You don't even need to say anything interesting, again, when I meet new people, they don't need to say much for me to like them, as long as they seem happy with themselves and happy to be there I generally don't care about them being there at all.

 It's not as difficult as you think, humans socialize, that is part of our nature, that means sympathy and understanding is a part of our nature, and people understand that there are quiet and shy people who want to be a part of a group too. I have many quiet friends who I don't mind spending time with, I usually just ramble on andon and they sit there and agree/ laugh. Quiet/shy people are fine as long as I feel they are enjoying themselves.

His job is to drive you, treat him like a taxi cab driver and thank him, and say hi, that's about it.Well then I'd base your judgment off of your friends.

If you are friends with shady sketch bags then maybe I'd be nervous?

If you are friends with relatively together people there is no reason to not trust someone they trust to drive.

I trust my friends judgment, if they were offering me a ride with someone they knew, I would trust that that person is responsible.

So I'd judge by your friends, if they're good people, why would they accept a ride from a stranger who is dangerous?

You need to be more trusting of people, not everyone is a psycho. The amount of times a friend of a friend has driven me somewhere in uncountable nothing bad has ever happened, my friends aren't friends with sketch bags.

You not trusting the guy sounds like you don't trust your friends.  2 months is long enough to make a judgment of character.

If you trust your friends, you should trust the driver. It is blind trust but thats what friends are for, to provide you with trustworthy resources.

They wouldn't recommend a bad doctor to you would they? Or a bad mechanic....etc

The whole point of having a friend is an extension of you basically, at least for me it is, I'm not friends with people who conflict with my morals. 

I've gotten into the car of co-workers I only knew for a week because based on our hours of conversation I knew they weren't an idiot or a maniac. what uber drivers? 

If they don't even know him, it is fair for you to question who he is, I would be tripping about some dude on facebook giving me a lift and Im a pretty easy going guy.

I'd question who it was, and if it was an uber driver Id look up reveiews. This basically is me, but I feel my personality more than makes up for it. 

I've had boyfriends in the past who were good looking so looks aren't always everything, my current SO is annoyingly attractive.

I think if you are funny enough you can get action. You're cute... there I did it, I didn't even want to, but just in case you actually are down on yourself you are good looking.

I always fall for people who fish for compliments because I know there are some out there that are genuinely down on themselves and shouldn't be, you shouldn't be if you are. sounds like you need some therapy not surgery. this but I have low standardsI'd arrange a date doing archery and then ditch out on him to go [shoe shopping!!!!!](https://kazlauskaiteegle.files.wordpress.com/2014/05/11.png?w=301&amp;h=353)

Then be like " Don't you hate feminen guys", with pictures of you trying on shoes, while he sits there with a bow in his hand looking like a [lonely Robin Hood](http://img12.deviantart.net/86bc/i/2005/124/8/6/lonely_archer_by_nuavar.jpg) doofus.... I don't know, something funny. I found it!

Thanks for the reply.

It's by Mr.Green, yes Bonobo did create this,it is an original score; which makes him even more awesome.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=m-FuDyzBsso

This came out in 2011, I've been listening to it longer than I've known about Bonobo so for some reason I thought he had maybe sampled it from somebody else and couldn't find it.

For some reason I was reading your comment and all of a sudden Mr.Green popped into my head, and I knew it was him.

Thanks for the help :) For some reason I like Mr.Green's version better. But I am more partial to things that sound more hiphop anyway, Bonobo is a genius though. I know this version actually is crappier and just a loopy rework but I liked it. 

It's a weird song that turns into the office theme song which is why I think it stuck out in my head. Tell me about your Uncle!George Crooney too!I wanna meet that Dad!I give this 5 bags of popcorn and a cane for the blindThe should name it Doris. If they wannnt. Nah public sex in a bathroom of an establishment is kind of a serious crime, Brampton isn't *that* bad that the police are completely tied up with drugs/murders, they have time to do lesser things too.

Remember we are talking about Canada, Brampton would be a super safe town compared to the U.S. My average was 2 weeks, anybody that didn't want to wait that I didn't bother with.

I like getting to know people more, so I can trust them, people that put the effort generally aren't the type that do hookups every other day.I think the fact it's in a bathroom little kids could walk into makes it pretty serious, that is a lack of respect for other people, and isn't something kids should walk in on when they need to go to the bathroom.

I think that's why it's serious, it's not sex, it's the fact they're doing it in public. 

People can be harmed, that's kind of gross for a little kid to walk in on.

Nobody would really be harmed from someone taking a dump in the middle of the street, but that's still pretty fucking gross and serious is you ask me.

There is something wrong with your brain if you get off to the thought of a little kid walking in on you, or if you are comfortable with a little kid walking in on you, something seriously wrong.

Having public sex means you are ok with a child seeing, which again is perverted. I'm from Ontario Canada, it was alright, they didn't touch on homosexuality that much though.

It was pretty explicit from a heterosexual standpoint,and the majority of people are heterosexuals so I'd say they do a good job.

Same sex partners and transexuals are now on the curriculum in this province too. can't tell if sarcasmNo problem, I'm not saying they're the only way, but people from the city are the main people who are going to give you advice, most people live in Urban environments and don't understand how different the country is.

The selection is a lot smaller though, and you have to be prepared like you said, to drive to nearby towns.

My SO is about 80 kilometres away, we see eachother around 3 times a week and usually spend weekends together, and it's working fine, once we get more serious we will move in together, but that drive can be a bitch.

We have both mutually cancelled plans several times because of it, so you have to be a bit more flexible because it is bordering on medium distance relationship.

I basically do not expect to date anyone from town, closest guy was 25 km away from me and I found that extremely convienent. Haha no problem it was popular when I was a teenager, kind of embarrassing to listen to now. I'm 25 and never really gave up on hiphop if anything I like it more now. I read everything as sarcasm, sorry, I can't help it, I'm too used to everybody being sarcastic about everything in my family it has warped my view of the world.This is not the response I was expecting, I thought people would think that's way too long.True good call I am often high on reddit and don't thinkI enjoyed kissing girls, and I'm pretty gay. 

I think you need to go balls deepThey haven't bothered me and I've done a little trolling myselfThat Mexicans must make the best tacos. I've never had an actual taco made by Mexicans in Mexico, and I love Mexican food and I have a weird obsession with having a real Mexican make me some food.jetstreamDiddle, piss, stick things in it, normal girl stuffmutter under your breath that you swear the next person you look at is going to die. fedorasnutporn, and Sean PaulThe Jersey Turnpike going the other waynothing we are animals. Love the question, don't have an answer2 dayseverythingMy signature is different everytime... I'm not a very important person/r/askreddit fastest movingI came to say this and Icantevenhelpit eitherwho gives a fuckno I just sign shit with scribbles, nobodies ever questioned it.

Yes I've signed multiple documents all at once with their own unique signature, it hasn't affected me.

I just do my intials with scribbles and dots following so there is consistency but they all look incredibly different and anybody could forge it. &gt;The island is made of coral and surrounded by sharks.


Could there be a more magical place to live?Are you fucking serious?

was it a baby?used diaper?&gt;.I guess my question is,will I get a super loose hold after the constant use of dildos?

You're the best bro[This](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/3nbbxs/whats_your_favorite_sentence/cvmik4i) .splains usernameC'est la vagine de ta mere.oh god how'd that feel?&gt;And that they can still poop when your arm is in there.

Has this happened?I drive a Prius. THANNNKSS!Ya people here are a little more PROGRESSIVE, you know, we CARE MORE.I thought so twosiesya it's pretty loose*puts head between legs* ya I know I only wish my son Nathan Murphy-Brown could see it.Because they're so punyI'm from a country that is half and half; possibly the only one of the planet like this. Circumcision is partially on the decline here because parents are realizing it's only necessary for phimosis and that it takes away from the pleasure of sex. 

I honestly have never seen smegma in my life, from childhood to adult hood, so I never understood the big deal over it, from my knowledge you have to be extremely unclean to develop that. I would guess that was precum building up.

You can just ask him if you can full retract it or not. I can fully retract no problem, but I masturbated a lot as a preteen/teenager so I'm pretty sure I prepared it. I read that masturbation is actually a good way to get it to retract. 

As for the hygiene thing, guys with foreskin or at least me are taught hygiene really really early, so most of us should be very very clean, I pay attention to that area the most in the shower and have since I was a kid.

An off topic tip I can give you, is that guys with foreskin are way more sensitive than those who are cut because they have more nerve endings, circumcision kills nerve endings at the head of the penis. This means you don't really need to be the best performer orally for it to feel good, I've never received bad head in my life, it always makes me squirm and sometimes I have to get them to stop because it feels too good.

So if he asks you to stop, don't freak out, he is just feeling too much and it ca become overwhelming. I dont know.

Are you a sexual person to begin with? Do you make jokes to begin with?

I wouldn't be making too many sexual jokes, even heterosexual sex jokes can be taken too far. You don't wanna become a hyper sexual guy who only jokes about sex.

I'd make gay jokes in other ways, as in pointing out how you don't like girls not how you like sausage, that seems to be something that straight guys can handle right away. It is self depreciating and shows you are comfortable with yourself.

I wouldn't advise you to make sex jokes in front of them, or at least limit the amount. I've been with a guy from Quebec, he said some FrenchCanadian words during sex, it was hot to me. It wasn't stereotypical "sexy" French, it was hick sounding Canadian swear words that actually were hot and I never thought they would be. 

I only watch English porn too, so maybe you just haven't heard another language that can do it for you.

A lot of porn I watch is from Quebec and they speak English but in a French accent, and that's hot too.

[This](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=6RnIUcFonik) is it(he says the difference between French and French Canadians during sex), for some reason it turns me on, I don't know if it's because I grew up learning French and know a lot of Franco-Ontarians/Quebecois, but it does it for me, and my native language is English.

Do you live in a country where everyone speaks English?Maybe it's because you aren't a native English speaker. I'm sure there are native English speakers that find other languages more attractive. 

I'm a native English speaker, so Quebecois is a little different, they look the same as me, live the same as me, but sound a bit different, so that could be why I like it so much.&gt;fap fap

**fap fap fap fap fap fap fap fap fap**

keep goingYes 100%. 

I said this previously, got downvoted, there is no way in hell that your DNA dictates what kind of human you are attracted too. Only the rule of 1/3rds and symmetry have been scientifically proven to be universally accepted as beauty, what colour the skin is, what shape it's in has absolutely nothing to do with what you are innately attracted to.

If you were raised in Tokyo, you would find Japanese men hot, and Europeans. The only reason Europeans are found attractive throughout the world is because we advertise ourselves throughout the world.

Again billboards in Asia are likely to have white people advertising products as Asian. Why? Because a lot of the companies operating over there are European/American selling clothes, shoes....etc.

Canadians aren't all of the same genetic lineage but these facts prove that people are just racist.

&gt;The 2006 study had an interesting find, that people born in Canada were more likely to marry someone of another race as opposed to those who immigrated there;[30] only 12% of first generation immigrant visible minorities were in a mixed union, this figure is higher for second generation immigrants (51%) and three or more generation immigrants (69%). There are a few examples of this:

&gt;63% of Canadian-born Blacks (who were in couples) were in mixed unions, while the numbers for Blacks born in the Caribbean and Bermuda (17%), and Africa (13%) were much lower percentages.
For Chinese people born in Canada, 54% (who were in couples) were with someone non-Chinese (it's not noted if this figure refers to anyone who is not East Asian (race), or just not Chinese (nationality)), compared to only 3% of those born in China who immigrated to Canada.
33% of South Asian Canadians who were born in Canada, were in a mixed union, compared to only 3% of those who were born in South Asia.

&gt;Certain visible minority groups had higher rates of being in mixed unions;

&gt;78.7% of Japanese

&gt;64.9% of multiracial people

&gt;48.2% of Latin Americans

&gt;40.2% of Blacks

&gt;29.8% of Filipinos

&gt;25.4% of Arabs / West Asians

&gt;22.5% of Koreans

&gt;21.9% of Southeast Asians (other than Filipinos)

&gt;19.4% of Chinese

&gt;13.0% of South Asians



I am more used to seeing black people with other races than their own race if that's any indication. 

Canada isn't perfect, but it leads the world in racial integration, yes South America has a lot of mix race, but they aren't as diverse, they're just three races basically. Indian has a lot of mixing but they're all the same race. 

It really depends on how you define race, Canada has very narrow definitions of race, and it's basically based on skin colour, most other countries will include a nationality as a single race; like those in the EU. 

A German marrying and Austrian would be counted as a mix race couple over there, but not here. It has to be an actual racial group marrying another racial group. Not really, being insecure with your sexuality is a personality fault on your behalf, anybody that does this I feel sorry for that they feel they need to assert their heterosexuality.

I mean it is rather childish to give a shit.

All of my friends stopped with the no homo shit when we were like 18; 25 now. 

My straight friends have actually asked me on advice/ if they look good. I told one of them to cut their hair because it was grossly long and I told him he looks much better now. No homo was not involved, they know they like pussy.... who cares if other people know this?

People should be able to compliment eachother, I don't know if it's a  Canadian thing, but guys can be pretty gay with eachother here and I never hear "no homo", only people with a shiesty thug attitude use that term. 

Guys can hug eachother in public here it's not really a problem, male friends kiss eachother on the cheek in a joking way when we've been drinking, people put their arms around eachother in photos. I don't know where this "I'm really straight" attitude comes from because I haven't really seen it, and people are still homophobic here, but even the homophobes have no problem complimenting eachother.

I remember a radio artist "Dean Blundell" or some shit I fucking hated him, he was kind of homophobic, but he even said he doesn't mind seeing hot guys kissing eachother.... and this guy got fired for being homophobic, so I don't live in an area where this is really common.

Anybody that says "no homo" is just trying to imitate an American, and that's lame in my opinion and too most people here. Sometimes that country does more harm than good. I have no fucking clue, I can't remember how I act on dates, and all I can remember from my first date with my current SO is telling him off because I rambled for 20 minutes and he didnt say a word so I assumed he wasn't interested and I literally told him to leave and I'd catch a cab home... 

I have no idea how I walk into relationships. 

I've never naturally attracted a guy without using the internet, I live in a small town and there is no gay scene here. So first dates are the only experience I have, and they've all gone decently well; I think, I'm sure some thought I was a douche. 

Only tip I can give, or that's worked for me, is I go into dates thinking they're going to fail miserably everytime so I don't expect a thing.You are going to let an 11 year old mess with your head?I don't know..

It's hot in Mexico and cold in Canada.I know that it's a mixed race country on the Indian ocean coast; I think, and is just basically one city with a ring of countryside around it.

High standard of living. 

Hot tropical climate.

Clean streets?fuck nonot for the entire year like mexicoreddit[This](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/3nf9fo/ayy_reddit_whats_your_favorite_reddit_post_or/cvniiza)NASA is hardly the reason people are starving.I knew cold denying Canadians would chime in, I'm from Canada, it is fine to say Canada is cold. It is, we are just in denial. When is the day of your attack planned?My area has more leaf fall than colour change wtf? Why does central southern Ontario suck so muchI consider Barrie the gateway to the North; even though it's North Bay. I was basically a shitty kid and wasn't allowed to go to prom or school dances because I showed up drunk to them twice; so did everyone else I just was destroyed.

So I didn't have one, but either did about 15 other kids who got kicked out of semi-formal dances.

So we all just hung out and went to the after party.

It's not a big deal in Canada, the only person that was upset was my Mom.clicking on that just made me realized I'm talking to a bunch of Uni students. 

Not a bad thing, just made me rethink my life for a second.well now I know not to check my ticket I hope they enjoy my $5 I'm poor can confirm article is True, I buy tickets often, it makes me feel for about whatever amount of time it takes me to check my tickey/card that everything is all good.

It kind of does do something positive for you even if you are wasting money.If being stabbed is cool consider me Miles DavisBecause I turn now, good luck everybody else!!Climate changeBy big deal, I meant it's not a right of passage(or rite I have no idea) like it is in the US.

I didn't mean big deal as in "awesome party", I just meant it doesn't matter if you miss it, you won't really regret it, because it's not in our culture.

Canadians just do as the Americans do. I could imagine an American being upset they missed it.

Hope you didn't think I was implying they're lame, I didn't have that attitude, I would have gone if I was allowed, but I was banned from school events because I was a chronic drunk.

My Mom is basically American and thinks Prom is a big deal because of tv which is why she got upset, but it's not really a big deal here, graduation is the actual big event. If you are confused try out

http://www.gayteenforum.org or www.emptyclosets.com they're more teen oriented there is also /r/askgaybrosteen I think or something like that.

It's hard to tell because you haven't given a lot of information but talking to people more your own age might be good.

---------------------------------------------------

I can tell you this, I knew in grade 9 I was MAYBE gay deep down, and was dating girls, and basically made posts like this on emptyclosets.com all the time; reddit didn't exist.

Not saying you are gay, but you are at an age where you may be repressing it. By grade 10-11 I knew for 100% I was gay because I basically had completely given up on thinking about girls. I still wouldn't admit it, even online, and would make posts similar to this, I even used to watch lesbian porn and like "congratulate" myself on doing that successfully. 

When I was in middle school I was so brainwashed about being straight; even then I sort of knew I liked guys but I had crushes on girls.

So the best thing you can do, from me saying all this, is to wait a couple of years and just let your feelings develop.

Talk to people your own age on those websites; I don't know reddit's demographics that well, and give it time.

Before grade 12 started I knew I was gay for sure, and even then I wasn't willing to admit it. 

You are also too young to know for sure, you could be bisexual, you could be heterosexual that likes guys a bit, or you could be gay, but you are at the age where you will know in the next couple years(if you actually try things)

I hate himWill Ferrell I liked Happy Gilmore, I actually liked Little Nicky too.

That's it. Austin PowersWhat are you talking about? The US has a national identity and culture, take it from somebody who isn't from the US you guys have your own thing going on.

And you have invented so much, from types of music to foods to everyday things in life. I'd say you have a strong national identity. Yes and Waterboyits in the woodsI think Billy Madison is white people's Tyler Perry, I'm sure not every black person likes Tyler Perry and is pretty divided on whether he's funny or not.Wedding Singer was good too actually. Mount forest,  Caledon, orangeville, grand valley. I know it's not an actual region but it says the leaves are falling off faster than colour change. SHAG is great too, you can't lose with him and Quest Love. 

The videos seem to fit, even though it's nothing to do with the music. It is an awesome channel. His other stuff is pretty impressive. Obligatory pictures out my window to prove, things are green, some trees are completely done with their leaves.

http://i.imgur.com/IVdX3J4.jpg

This one zoomed in, you can see two trees with no leaves surrounded by Green. Usually the colour change is good here, but this year it's crap

http://i.imgur.com/acPrt8i.jpg

Also I never knew that, and it makes sense, 1 week ago it was VERY warm here, like 25 degrees up. [This](http://i.imgur.com/nNMZEdv.jpg) is the same shot from last year, everything looked way betterKinda douchey this got downvoted. Canada is like Scandinavia with American work hours. Go to Canada, same shit, for some reason I feel like Australia is similar. 

You don't just have to smile here, you have to hold doors, say sorry, say thank you all the time, even if you hate everybody around you. 

It makes life more pleasant, I find the U.S friendly. I said with American work hours, we still work some of the longest hours here, we don't have European style work ethic, it's American style, you just work, work, work.(I think this is why the U.S is the largest economy of Earth)

We have more days off work, but Canada is still one of the worse countries for days off, especially compared to Europe.

The U.S, Canada and Japan clock some of the highest hours of the developed work, don't even get my started on the developing world(they pretty much just work all day).

We have all the social programs...etc, but work is still expected to take up the majority of your life like in the U.S.A. No, when it you learn it from childhood it doesn't bother you.

We also expect you to leave problems at home, so at work you shouldn't be a dick to people just because you are having a shitty personal life.

It does make things easier and people more approachable. I've heard in certain European countries people don't like being approached, at least here in Canada I know if I need to borrow someones cellphone or help with my car I can ask a stranger no problem.

It's fake, but it works out in certain ways. I mean during the 9/11 attacks Canadians took in complete strangers from the U.S into their homes for several days, that overt kindness pays off.

The U.S.A is also number one donater of foreign aid on the planet, and they are the number one country for domestic donations/help. When one community faces a tragedy the whole country pitches in. 

People label the smiles and happiness as fake, and it is, but that learned happines/fake smiling I think translates into people being more conscious of things. People feel pressure to donate to things when asked because you are expected to be nice.

It takes away the freedom to act as you feel; without being labelled an asshole, but it also makes people generally more generous, and stats back this up. I'm not complaining,I  said you had to, and that implied socially, yes it's called being polite, but I'm saying I think even assholes do it because they know it's social standard.

It makes living a little bit easier when people are putting on a happy face in public, I didn't say it was a bad thing at all. Just explaining how it is.

If you walk into a store and someone is behind you and don't hold the door....etc you look like a dick, obviously you don't have to, but most people don't want to look like an asshole.

In say parts of Europe you are an asshole if you get in peoples business and are too friendly with them...etc it's all based on the society you live in.

Obviously none of it is law at all. Also by hate everyone around you I meant if you are in a bad mood, I've been in horrendous moods, but as soon as I'm in public I pretend everything is all good, you only act up infront of friends/family. Where in Canada do you live, everyone smiles where I live and waves, if I walk by with my dog people stop me and talk.

Some old lady pulled over once and got out just to see my dog and say Hi, found out we're Irish and flipped out because she was.

I don't know, maybe you are from Toronto/Vancouver/Montreal. 

I notice people in Toronto don't really smile, or start conversations, but I pretty much am guaranteed for someone to talk to me where I live and other places in Canada.

Have you even been to the East Coast?It's Q-TIP from A Tribe Called Quest!!!

Lmfao Quest Love is the drummer from the Roots, I always mix them up because of Quest and they begin with Q.

You want to look for A Tribe Called Quest. I'm gay, but if a female proposed; if I was straight, I'd be ok with it if it's something I wanted to do.

Not really a huge deal, kind of unconventional but not unheard, my buddies girlfriend pretty much pesters him to get married all the time, I'm sure she would propose if it was normal for girls to do it.

Personally if anyone; guy or girl, proposes I don't want a ring, I'm not wearing a wedding ring, I don't wear jewelry or anything but clothes. I've heard that some school districts in the US are the best schools pretty much; or some of the best, you can get in the world, but there are a lot of poorer districts that get shitty funding/education.tall people.... it's gonna hurtGuys hug eachother...?

I have to stop my friends from hugging me Hello if I haven't seen them in a while or aren't gonna see them in a while.

It's not like a squeeze just a quick thing. What do you mean older? Would 1990 count?The 1990's seemed like the beginning of the kid generation.

Everything felt like it was geared towards me.

A lot more violent; in both Canada and the USA, rise of hiphop I can remember.

I can remember a computer being a big deal, but I was little and didn't really give a shit, by the time I cared about computers Windows 98 had come out and they were decent enough. I played a lot of games at microsoft gamezone.

Used to go on chat sites and troll people basically; before trolling was even a thing.

Google wasn't the only search engine, I can specifically going to other search engines, even I think searchengine.com or something. just don't look at me afteras long as you call an ambulance for meI only drive in American made vehiclesthat's good enough, but we have to stop by McDonalds on the way.&gt;Hope you miss those 2 minutes of your life, bitch.

I'd of gone for 4, but I'm a prick.I would have put her back in the store and closed the doorI think its the fact the OP wants him to use him for sex before he leaves the house instead of waiting for him to leave.

I'm ok with my SO watching porn, but if he was jacking off right after I left and not giving me any I'd be pretty pissed off.

Porn is ok, but it seems like the OP thinks his boyfriend would rather whack off than fool around which may be a problem.

Everyone is jumping on the dude bangwagon. Guys watch porn but they shouldn't be replacing it with actual human intimacy. Oral/frot is like 100% of the time with me even if anal is involved; last.

I'm not a big fan of anal and it do it to please partners, I'm a top and every guy I'm wish acts like they're in pain so fuck that. Is everyone such an aggressive top they need to work out to keep up?

How long are you fucking for? 
holy shit i have boring sexhttp://shag.bandcamp.com/

http://www.last.fm/music/Shag

Also on Youtube,No I can last forever, my partners also cum really quick so I just end up forcing it to happen. I guess I haven't been with anybody that is down to fool around that long, only time it happens is when we were drunk.

My boyfriend, and my ex, and my ex before that, all finish within 5 minutes, I just thought this was normal.

We usually fool around for like 30 minutes, then once we get going 5 minutes is all it takes. 

I'd like to do 2 hours, but I thought that didn't happen often. 

We don't use poppers or drugs or anything.I look at it this way, there is a small amount of gay people(2-10%), gay people asking straight people if they are gay/asking them out, should not be a big deal.

In reality it would be a relatively rare occurrence and should only flatter the other person; gay or not. I don't get why anyone would be upset with someone essentially complimenting them. 

It's not even invasive, it's just letting people live their lives, heterosexuals; most, should realize that it's harder to be gay because there are less people, therefore it shouldn't be seen as anything negative if a gay guy asks you out in a non creepy way.

Obviously hitting on someone after hearing no isn't acceptable no matter who you are, but this is one thing that I don't understand the opposite side at all.

Saying you are uncomfortable with gay people hitting on you is stupid and homophobic, it has nothing to do with personal choice, you are basically not cool with someone living their life in a non-harmful way which makes absolutely no sense.

Sorry for the rant, but this is one of the few things I don't sympathize with straight people for, you should be allowed to ask if they're gay/ ask them out. There is nothing wrong with it.

---------------------------------

As for you OP it depends on whether or not you have enough courage to do so, I wouldn't ask him out without knowing he is gay, so maybe you can just talk to him after class and beat around the bush, if you realize he's straight just keep it friendly?25 % of the worlds fresh water, one of the largest producers of grain, largest producer of berries, largest producer of beer grains, one of the largest producers of cattle, the 3rd most proven oil reserves, the worlds largest undisturbed forest,largest nickel/zinc/copper producers, one of the largest gold producers, one of the largest timbre suppliers, one of the largest dairy producers, one the largest fishing countries, 2nd largest country on Earth......

I think Canada is good, I could go on, we have everything covered minus tropical fruit; but greenhouses can grow them. 

We'd all reclaim the parts of America that were originally part of Canada, and the 13 colonies would become a playground. Not all of them, sometimes I'm meaner when I'm drunk(as a joke) and I don't mean anything I say really. Just forget about him, ghosters are fucked in the head it has nothing to do with you.

I ghosted people in the past; before GrindR was even a thing, it had nothing to do with the guy, and everything to do with my life. I just wasn't conscious enough to think about the other person and it is a completely selfish and asshole thing to do.

So you have that, it really isn't you, it's them, ghosting is a cowards way out and there are multiple reasons why they do it from

A) Just generally disregard for your feelings, and being selfish

to

B) Being a sociopath

and everything inbetweenI don't know, I've tried to post different topics

https://www.reddit.com/r/askgaybros/comments/3m55ka/what_type_of_humour_do_you_guys_like/

https://www.reddit.com/r/askgaybros/comments/3fw1hd/what_kind_of_music_do_you_guys_listen_to_any/

And I got relatively good responses and interest, so people aren't opposed to it, it just seems nobody bothers to ask, I don't like flooding this subreddit with my bullshit so I try not to post much, but you could do it.

Everytime I did people had no problem responding and adding to the conversation.

So why don't you ask something?

I tried to start a conversation about hiphop on another account once, and it got downvoted pretty quick so some things do seem off the table in this subreddit. 

*

https://www.reddit.com/r/askgaybros/comments/3mq7r8/what_is_the_most_frustrating_thing_for_you_about/

That is the first question on the top list for this year and it's number 700 something, the first question that isn't to do with gay/relationships/boys. And even it pertains to being gay.

I think my question was the 2nd Top Question of the year that doesn't have to do with what you mentioned and it was number 800 something.

So 1/700 questions don't have to do with relationships/beinggay...etc

What I have to say to that is that partially we have other subreddits for other subject matter, and another a lot of people don't have people to talk to about being gay, so gay forums are completely over ridden by people looking for advice because they really can't seek it in real life. Had no idea L'Omelette was in this.

Degiheugi is really awesome, guys so diverse and uses non-traditional samples that end up working well.Stocky to me is naturally big boned, and short; usually short, tall people are rarely ever stocky.I use the music ones the most /r/triphop

Weirdest one I've found is /r/ooer or /r/enlightenedbirdmen

Funniest one is a tie between /r/roastme and /r/pettyrevenge &lt;--- love this one. 

I also go on /r/Ontario a lot, and /r/Canada (it's a boring one compared to other countries).Well literally fruits and vegetables being added to your diet is relatively easy and healthy.

If you can't find yourself being able to eat the amount you need, make a smoothie every morning.

I do milk, berries/bananas and then add in spinach, kale or broccoli(make sure there is like 1:4 vegetables to fruit). If you don't wanna do milk you can literally do water and ice cubes and make a slushie.

That way I find is the easiest way to make sure you get some fruits/vegetables everyday and it's relatively easy.

Everyone has 2 minutes to throw shit into a blender and drink it, sometimes I add chia seeds and other random shit.

You start adding more veggies the more you get used to it, and eventually you'll start liking veggies.

literally exposure to healthy foods is the only way to start really enjoying them, you just start slow and go from there.

Eventually you will be craving healthy stuff just like you crave the unhealthy stuff.

I get the weirdest urges for cherry tomatoes, cucumber, strawberries...etc all the time. I don't think so, I think your society/culture impacts whether you are religious or not.

There are plenty of gay people that loose their faith, but there are countless straight people that loose their faith too, so it doesn't seem to be a gay thing. Just because some of them conflict with homosexuality doesn't mean that's the only reason to leave the faith, a lot just don't buy into it.Tu aurais d\u00fb leur envoyer au c\u00f4t\u00e9 sudCaledon is the hilliest part of the GTA, just north of there is the Hills of Headwaters which is basically the hilliest part of Southern Ontario.

Pretty much all of the greenbelt/ oak ridges moraine is your best bet.

I live in a really hilly area, and am used to it, and find it weird when I go to flat parts of Ontario, but this province truly is pretty flat. pettyrevenge is the best.

/r/neckbeardstories can be funny at times/r/hybridanimals.... just clicked it

[this](http://imgur.com/7kH7E5R) made me cryyou're not black are you?Anything to do with race, and the black/white difference in the U.S. As a Canadian I am getting sick of that shit.... it literally feels fucking archaic to even be talking about it. 

Any "look what came in my package of x" post in /r/mildlyinteresting, you most likely put four peanut butter cups took a picture of it beside an empty pack of three.... if it can't be proven there is literally no point posting it. Obama being voted in, seemed like a huge deal?how the fuck we supposed to keep peace?

Love that song, we bump it across the river from the D in Canda. 

Detroit is actually pretty cool to visit, seeing urban dilapidation is an experience, and there is still plenty of things to see in the city/ the area. 

At least for me it was cool to see.A week topsWe just leaf blow all the leaves into the woods, but not everyone is fucking Hanzel and lives in a forest. Haha ya [this](https://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/e/e8/Ouelletteave.jpg) make Detroit seem like a nice place, you'd never think it was like this just across the river

Patio's set up, people walking, people driving, with Detroit visible, who would've thought.Holy shit, /r/treesgonewild god damn, haha, sometimes I wish I was straight just for all the whacky porn.halfsalkflkhahahg saoda;osohgasgathank you

how the fuck we gon' posed to keep peace... I'm afraid to say the restI know something about every state most likely.it's satire though, they're supposed to take it to the extreme.No but sometimes I feel like I was born 5 years too early, and should have been born in 95 because I like the music movement going on right now; not on the radio. There is so fucking much to like.

I miss some aspects of the 90's though, don't think they're superior.Canada, I've been to every state on the Eastern seaboard, and most of the states that touch those states, and watched enough TV / consumed enough American media to know something about them all.

My TV provider has a Boston, LA, Atlanta, Buffalo, New York tv stations, I see the commercials/ news sometimes. I'm 25... so I can listen to new music, I just wish it was there when I was a teenager, the selection wasn't as great because the internet hadn't become as large a network?

At what age do you think you can't consume new music, most of the artists I listen to are my age or older. I'm younger than Taylor Swift.Yes I'm 1 hour away from New York state so I guess I shouldn't be allowed to have an opinion, of course I am going to know about the U.S. oh True the subject matter is by people who take it to the extreme. Sorry I thought you meant the posters were being serious. haha well my mom was in her 20's when the Beastie Boys came out so I consider that her music almost haha. That hilarious your Dad listens to it. 

Really so I have 2 more years to like everything then I have to give up?:) I know there is a certain age it becomes passe to listen to new genres of music.

Everything I listen to isn't pop music it's just individual producers: I dont want to say underground because it's not the same anymore anybody can expose themselves on the internet, and when I was a teenager in the 2000's I was stuck with shitty selection and myspace basically. 

Now it just seems incredibly easy to listen to music you like that is new.

I have started to question whether I should be this passionate about music, it seems like such a youthful thing.This can be found on google, it's the USA. I was born in 1990 so when I was a kid there was tapes but music wasn't that much to me; I liked a lot of rap as a young kid like Biggie and Wu tang, but that's all i could remember.

Once I was old enough to start developing a taste at like 13/14 I was on Napster/Limewire and we did mix c.ds; so basically the same as mix tapes. People would make eachother c.ds with their favourite music....etc. Literally same thing as the 90s

The selection on those freeware programs were limited to famous musicians basically only, and I guess I assumed only good musicians make it big; didn't realize tons didnt.

By the time I was 17/18 it was 2007/2008 and there were a bunch of websites/ youtube for listening to music from artists around the world.

Right now I listen to a lot of Triphop, glitch and downtempo, but a lot of it is still influenced by 90's / 2000's sounds. So I think those decades did have an impact on my taste. 

[P.SUS](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=spJm6ujFxGs) is a good example, it has a 90s sound to it was produced this decade, by some guy in Pittsburgh, with an Asian sound to it.

In the 2000's or 90's I would have never been able to find any of this. I have no fucking ideaWhat was the question I missed the mark?

Which country spends most money on foreign aid, it's the U.S.A

Which country spends the most of their GDP on foreign aid is a completely different question.

I'm also not from the USA so I wasn't being narcissistic,I'm from Canada.I have no idea? There are really sketchy parts of every city practically. 

That's about it, nothing too bad. Still doesn't ask which spends the most of their GDP.

Your question is asking who spends the most, with no asking of including GDP.

You just mention that they only spend .19% of it's nationali ncome on foreign aid.

In AskReddit, if you read the guidelines on the side, your question has to be clear, you have to be able to answer it from the title.

Don't fault me because I'm used to answering questions based on the title, not extra information. 

So what is your question?

How does reddit feel about only spending .19% of its national income on foreign aid?

That should be your title, just so people like me don't get confused, you'll get better responses if your title is the actual question, many people skip the info bar and just go straight to answering, the info bar is usually filled with useless information.

How do I feel about it?

I feel it would be fine if they spent less on the military, they already give a shit ton, regardless of it being a little bit of what they make, obviously they should raise it, but I don't know where they would get that money from, something would have to be cut.

How open are Americans to military cuts?k let's both go back to the late 90's :D Triphop is awesome. I'm officially out of touch. Youtubeya so not a whole lot to warn, I'm from Canada mind you, so going to the U.S isn't really like going to that different of a country, at least from a tourist perspective; certainly living there is a little different.

I honestly couldn't think of a single thing, each state is different.

The roads in PA were horrendous. Buddy you could go down the food chain of rappers forever it's all subjective.

I'd say Wu-Tang is cool, Immortal and Nas suck :D. They could even be considered "pop" and crap.

Cise Starr, Thes One, Zion I, Sunspot Jonz, Lyrics Born, Aesop Rock....etc.

Then someone can come and name some other next level rappers.

It's all on who you like. I listen to a lot of unknown artists; I hate saying underground, and I actually like Lil Wayne.

Lil Wayne is good mind numbing chilling beats, I love hiphop, but he is one of the few famous artists that I actually can stand.

J.Cole isn't bad either.

We're just getting old, especially if you have beef with Lil Wayne, most youngins don't even care about who he is. Ya just for in the future, AskReddit is sometimes the lowest common denominator answers, especially for serious questions.

If you want a good discussion tag your question with [Serious] and any answers that aren't serious or derail the conversation will be removed.

A lot of people are on their mobiles so they just read the title question, click and answer.

I learned very quickly not everyone reads the info bar because I'd try to put in more things I wanted to know, but everyone was just answering the title. 

Cheers.

I personally think the U.S needs it's military to kind of keep the world at bay, as stupid as that sounds, I think it deters other countries from doing really stupid things; at times, out of fear of U.S retaliation. Not saying the U.S should bully the world, but their military actually has a reason to be.

As for foreign aid, I think they can still cut the military budget slightly, and allocate it towards that, but I'd rather see you guys get universal healthcare, but that's a whole nother can of worms. eating scolding hot food; drunk.

going grocery shopping; high.Shia Labeouf is the closest and most common I've gotten,

JUSTTT DOOOO ITTTT

I don't really look like him that much at all, I just share common features. The leader of the Parti Quebecois; a provincial separatist party in Canada, had an assassination attempt on her a couple years back.

The fact an Anglo Canadian tried to kill a French Canadian that supports leaving Canada shows you there is still some hostility.

Why does it matter?

If Quebec separated from Canada the U.S.A would be affected for one since we're their number one trading partner, and if they separated there is a potential of chaos/ attacks within Quebec/Canada by extremists who support the opposite of both causes, which again the U.S would most likely be mediator of. There were terrorist attacks in the 1970's by them before separation even had momentum.

You'd never think something in Canada would be important but it partially is, if she was killed it would have been a big deal and may have sparked the separatist fire even more in Quebec.  "You think your shit don't stink, well it does, it stinks like shit" - Macgruber. I heard Monterrey is actually one of the most " American" cities in Mexico and isn't that bad, but I've never been, I just heard this from Mexicans and took their word for it. They really uptalked the city like it is quiet different, and upon look at pictures, it looks pretty freaking nice.

It's also basically on the border.In 2005, Monterrey was ranked one of the safest cities in Mexico,[16] and one of the two safest in 2006. However, since 2008 the city has experienced violence related to turf battles between warring drug cartels in Mexico. The year 2011 has been the most violent in history. Drug dealers are a major concern, although military offensives and police captures of important drug-cartel chiefs have weakened drug cartels trying to settle in the city. The city is safe to travel by day and night; nevertheless, precaution and common sense should be considered in certain districts at night.[17][18][19]

Pulled that too, it seems to actually be one of the safest Mexican cities. My ex used to do this, I was pretty passive aggressive with him in the morning or that night about it and would deny him.

We had opposite schedules, he wanted it in the morning, I wanted it at night, but since I wanted it at night he would deny me first, and then I'd deny him in the morning. 

I was a douche.What up with 1994?No there was always a threat of some programs going all funny that were reliant on clocks, but that's about it, only idiots believed that nukes were going to get launched because a computer doesn't know what time it is.

Again, only time based programs that didn't factor in 2000 were affected, I'm pretty sure most computers were made with the expectation of the year 2000, especially those operating on Windows 98, why would they make it only have a calendar and time scale for 2 years? That makes no sense, computers were like $3000 back then. True I'm from 1990, I appreciate certain things from the 80's, but the 2000's still influenced most of my experience, just like people born in 94.

I know it was cool in highschool to like older music, don't know if kids 4 years younger liked it. He cheated, and also never explained why he was denying me till we had a fight about it. He was tired from work, we are both gay, I expect most guys to want to fool around whenever, and he was the first guy I was with that actually didn't care for it too much. Being tired from work never affected me or my previous boyfriends before. 

It really messed with my head, I was an idiot for making assumptions, but I took it really personally since he wasn't like people I had dated in the past.meh, we still were the first generation of everything going to shit, believe me, plenty of people my age are into all the same shit you guys are, it's just split I guess.

Some people like better quality, others don't. My brother is from 1989 and he has horrible taste in everything basically. We weren't 100% sparred. Also were to first for shit to be tested on.

Britney Spears, Backstreet Boys, ....etc, 

I think Facebook and the likes are the biggest problem, they're creating a generation of narcissists that my generation is partially free from. Some got sucked into the facebook/instagram/twitter tunnel, actually a lot did, but it's not unheard of for people my age to not use any of that stuff, I don't and never did. I think you have to be cautious everywhere in Mexico because of the drug wars, but Monterrey; at least I've heard, is a really modern/nice city, and they have their own culture/cuisine/music that isn't as well known in the U.S. 

It's near Texas though, I know you are in California, I think Tijuana is pretty sketch, but obviously the touristy areas are nice.

I went to Cancun; deep within Mexico, and the actual city of Cancun felt pretty fucking unsafe, my sister got approached by every guy, and my Dad got us the fuck out of there.She was hot as fucking shit, I am gay, and I wanted to fuck her back then. I was like 8 and had a crush on her.

That school girl outfit, she was smoking.Canadian here; generally good. 

I'd move there behind Australia and the UK if I had to move to another country. So 3rd place isn't bad at all.

The fact I'm gay plays a roll in my decision, if I was straight I would pick the U.S for first place to move to./r/pettyrevengeGive no fucks during an earthquake.Ya I love the U.S I just don't like that certain states you can get fired for being gay, and the religion.

That's the only thing, when I was a teenager I actually wanted to move there, and I slowly realized it'd be dumb of me to do so, I don't want to be limited to major metro areas.

The US is like Canada, and you have warmer weather, I actually don't enjoy winter that much, I like hockey, and snowboarding...etc, but I'd give those up to be able to hang out on my patio year round like you can in some states.

It's just all the Southern states are the most homophobic, and there is no point in leaving Canada to move to New York State or Michigan....etc it's literally the same thing as where I live now.

You guys are more than brothers, you're like Siamese twins. I am not being a douche, but that was about Chinese.

Chang is a typical Chinese last name; not that everyone should know that.

Japanese names are really easy to spot

Michita, Hedusuka, Misogi, Horikawa, Yoshida

A lot end in vowels. They're almost like Italian last names, but you can see the lack of "white" sounding names to it.

That's at least how I always can tell, they say "Italy" but don't sound it.No, no not asking for apology, just trying to let you know what they are so you know, it's useless information, but at least you know the difference.

Chinese last names are usually really short, almost 1 syllable, not all of them, but that's how Chinese goes usually.

Chang, Chow, Ming, Peng, Poa, .....etc

Japanese is like bouncy, Hor-i-ku-sa. It goes from consonant to vowel to consonant to vowel. 

Useless info, but may help out in the future at least in guessing where somebody or something is from.I'm white by the way, you just don't want to ask somebody from Japan where in China they're from, and vice versa, they sort of hate eachother. 

No problem, my exes friends girlfriend was from Japan and she was pretty upset when I assumed she was Chinese.No one has called me out on it, but I used to think I was really smart to almost neckbeard levels when I was in highschool, I wasn't a dick to people about it, but I thought about it in my head.

As I got older and experienced the world more, I realized intelligence comes in many different forms, being able to spew out facts doesn't make you automatically smart.

I also learned to listen to people more.

This was all on my own accord though, nobody told me I was doing it, but I realized I was judging people really quickly, and it's not good to do that even if you are keeping your opinion to yourself. You will cut off future relationships(friendships, acquaintance, network link...etc) if you do tihs. Cold weather here has literally made people cry in Canada; new immigrants. there is a difference between experienced panic and new panic. I'm sure people who haven't been through them before would be way more scared than you guys.

I on the other hand kind of want to experience one and am curious, where I live tornadoes are generally weak, they happen often enough, but I've yet to see one.Haha, True, where are you from?

We have sirens in my town, if they ever went off, everyone would flip their shit. Haha fuck, that's stupid.

It reminds me of this city near me, but it's built on the bay of a lake so there is a reason for it to have a fucked up street pattern; you can't drive across the lake.

But that looks like they're like " I wish there was a river flowing through downtown". And built one with concrete. I'm from Canada, I only know the South side is bad haha.I had an awesome childhood, wasn't raised religious, but was taught right. I'm from the safest town in Canada, and it's also not-religious at all.... so religion doesn't dictate safe/happy communities what so ever. Just thought I'd throw that in there. We leave our doors unlocked all the time, even on vacation. So trauma? What trauma, I live in one of the nicest towns on the planet. 

My childhood again, was awesome, best childhood I could ask for, playing outside all day in the woods, lakes, swimming, fishing, biking, having tree forts.

I knew I was gay when me and my friends started watching porn; straight porn, everything in my life was set up to make me "straight", and I noticed I was paying attention to the guys more.

There was not nurturing to make me turn gay, my brother is 10 months older than me and straight, we were best friends growing up, I played soccer, baseball, lacrosse, hockey, tennis, and golf.

All my friends were straight males.

I have a good relationship with my Dad.

Absolutely no trauma.

Here I am, gay as fuck, and less sinful than your average religious person from the states.... so I don't know maybe it's just a part of nature and you need to accept that. 

There is no understanding it, if you knew some biology, and things about fetal development in the womb, you'd realize being gay is just something that happens.

It has to do with lack of testosterone in the womb, and nothing to do with trauma or any of that crap.

I had every reason in the world to grow up straight, and I still became gay, even with an awesome childhood/ awesome relationship with my father.

My Dad did a lot for me.I hate how Canada is the most accepting of immigrants/gay refugees and we're always seen as a last resort.

Is it the cold? Or do we just have bad PR?

You'll be accepted as an immigrant the most in Canada.

We have hate speech laws that make it illegal to publicly spread ill will towards minority groups, including Malaysian's and gays. Also rated the most accepting; socially, of immigrants in the world, only idiots here are against it.
People want privacy.

I'll throw in something that hasn't been mentioned but it ties into privacy, I think people genuinely don't want other redditors to know they're gay; they're that closeted.

Even though reddit is a pretty liberal website.

I've had random straight people PM me after reading a post I made on /r/askgaybros , and they were all supportive.

Anything genuinely homophobic said on the website gets downvoted into oblivion.

There really is no reason to be hiding on reddit at all, people on this website are more open to things, just look at all the stupid subreddits and ridiculous things that are popular, it isn't exactly a closed minded website. 

Minus /r/coontown , /r/whitepeoplefacebook /r/blackpeopletwitter ....etc, but those are few and far between. 

Everytime I mention "I'm gay" on another subreddit I get upvotes, it's like instant karma.I actually support Harper, not the deportation part, but that's all being blown out of proportion.

Only terrorists are going to ever be sent back, we aren't going to start sending people who commit other crimes back. I also don't really think it's racist to want to deport someone that does something horrible here. 

I also do not think Harper is racist, he has opened free trade agreements with Muslim countries/started talks with them. Dedicated government support to the Aga Kahn.

He hasn't slowed down immigration either.

He is just very "American" style in some of his policies, he puts too much funding towards watching terrorist in our country, and is widely supportive of Israel; which has never been Canada's position. 

But I will give you this, Canada has more active terrorists/extremist than the U.S does, and the U.S has 10x the population. So there is a reason to be concerned about foreigners in our country.

But my opinion is, if you aren't scum, you don't have anything to worry about.

Most of the people complaining about that have British parents or European parents, I've yet to hear a Muslim complain about it.

My Dad was born in England, and my Mom was born in Macedonia, I don't think I'm going to get deported to those countries anytime soon. I also do not understand how they could send me back to England, would England even take me? I'm not even a British citizen, also Macedonia would not take me for sure, they're a poor enough country as is, ya right they want a Canadian sent there to suck off their welfare. The law makes no sense to me, and I think I don't understand it, and a lot of people don't understand it.

I really don't agree with it though, it is bullshit.There are a couple people I have pissed off, they're most likely doing it.That is awesome. Don't let that be your only choice check out the other countries as well. It's a long process and don't be discouraged by denials alto of people I know applied several times or waited years before finally getting in.

The conservative government here has stream lined the process for trades workers to move here quickly. But that's only viable if you want to work in the trades that are in demand. It's how my boyfriend fRom the US is allowed to stay. I totally forgot I'm drating someone who is immigrating here, honestly I'm an idiot. I forgot he was foreignhttp://www.cic.gc.ca/english/immigrate/trades/apply-who.asp link for program . No education required besides trades certification which are cheapThis is major snowball of bad shit happening, scroll down to bottom for short version.

Got a parking ticket in another city; my old old boyfriends house, didn't pay it; forgot.

Had my license suspended because of not paying the $25 ticket.

Was sent letter in mail to stop driving and pay ticket, did not receive letter.

Was pulled over for speeding 10 km over the speed limit by a cop on the side roads; the cop most likely was not from the town and does not understand that people go 50 km over the speed limit and there are bigger fish to fry.

Cop thought I knew I was suspended, which I didn't, treated me like a criminal.

Impounded my car on the spot, got the driver to bring it to three cities over; about 80 km away. Served me with

1) Driving with a suspended license

2) Speeding 10 km over the speed limit

3) Lying to a police officer

He left me on a sideroad in the middle of the country, drove to my house to tell my parents to pick me up. I was 20 at the time, it is basically illegal for him to go and tell someone else I needed a lift. My friends sister drove by and picked me up/ drove me home. I pull up to driveway to see cop talking to my Mom.

-------------------------------------

The Judge threw everything out, and basically called the cop and asshole, couldn't believe this happened to me, and I got out with a $200 fine and no charges.

I had to quit my job because I didnt have a car for a month and there is no transit where I live.

------------------------------

My sunroof was open on my car, when I called the impound lot to close it, they said I had to come down. So I drove 80 km to get it covered, but it had already poured rain and there was about a half foot of water at the bottom of my vehicle.

-----------------------------------------

Impound/ tow fees ended up costing me over $2000, which was money I saved up for first year payment of University.

Fixing the electronics and damaged fabric in my car after it got flooded at the impound lot cost me over $2000, which was money I saved up for first year payment of University. The car was basically brand new and completely ruined.

---------------------------------------

TD; LR - Didn't pay a $25 parking ticket on a suburban street(was not negatively affected anyone really), ended up getting my car impounded license suspended and paying over $5000 out of pocket in fees, getting license back, fixing car, impound, tow.........etc

Also lost my job, and was left in the middle of the country to walk 20 km home. 

Thanks Ontario, you guys sure have your priorities straight, make a kid take all his University funds and spend it on a stupid $25 ticket, delay me going to University, and now I'm taking out a student loan, you guys really look out for your citizens. &gt;Dislike: Donald Trump

Unless you are from another country. That is entertainment to me. He's better than Bush. [Became](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uGCpxOLIzZ8) - Atmosphere.

About his friend that died from drug abuse. 

The song is about him following the trails of someone that was chased by wolves in a snow covered forest... I would have never guessed it was a metaphor, the song is good enough when it's about being hunted by wolves. 

Really hits home, I've lost a bunch of friends to drugs. So many of his songs are, he is awesome, I don't know why he didn't get more popular.

Always Coming Back Home to You, Little Man, GodLovesUgly, National Disgrace, LoveLife

the guy is really talented. yes, forgot about Es-K

Kind of off topic, but Que D takes a Dorothy Ashby sample in one of his songs

Here is an instrumental mix by Mark Farina off of Mushroom Jazz 3, he mixes in vocals from Billie Holiday's God Bless the Child at the end, I really recommend all of the Mushroom Jazz series. 

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=N4s8TL8lmH4

Here is Que D's version; it's hip hop

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1AmNDV7-N0Q

---- both are good in my opinion, but this song you posted is awesome.

Jazzy harp is something that's rare. 

This is awesome, reminds me of [Thes One](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=5A4Qbwg4yXI&amp;list=PLrS9pSxkV40LNokelD2OOxi1iSM6HKJ_Q)'s PanAm.Only one who is going to say this, the Conservatives.

Don't trust the Libs, am unsure about NDP.Canada's pretty boring at the moment, our current Prime Minister is about as interesting as wet paint.

The Green Party leader is kind of an odd one. She swore, and was drunk during a speech.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=UpOE59SinhE

but she's American born, so we can just blame it on that :P&gt; But it's not confined to any particular genre - we've had everything from classical to classic rock to trip hop in this joint - but more of a mood, a vibe, a certain sound...

This is triphop, are you upset with it because it's not traditional?

There is certainly a melancholy vibe to it, I don't know how you can't hear it. This song is sad and mopping, is it the drum line you don't like? This subreddit is meant for more than just one genre of jazz. 

How would you describe it? Upbeat?blehYou're excused.

What's so funny guy?    ^__^

skypeI avoided going to Blue Jays games this summer because I thought I might bump into my ex, even though the chances were ridiculously low, I know he goes whenever they're playing on the weekend. Yes, it's called Canadian raising, I notice it and I'm from Canada.

There is more emphasis on vowels, sometimes they're elongated.

Biggest way to tell if someone is Canadian and not America is ask them to say

House, Bag, Car, Garage, 

You can hear Canadians actually pronouncing the "ou" and almost emphasizing it "hu-ows".

Americans say "Hows", they ditch the u sound

Car, some Canadians almost roll the r like Scottish people, it's hard to describe I notice it all the time and it drives me nuts. It's like a pirate saying c-Arrr. A lot of words with an ar ending sound different coming from a Canadian.

Bag is almost always pronounced b-ay-g.The entire Lake doesn't freeze, just the surface, there is still flowing water underneath.

Some fish go into almost a dormant /hibernation like state, frogs hibernate, turtles hibernate, even water snakes hibernate in the north.

They have an anti-freeze in their blood basically that stops cellular damage from freezing.

I don't know about fish 100%, but I know the Lakes don't freeze solid, and that the fish remain in the liquid water underneath. it's like Bay-g

Depends on where you are.That "oo" noise you hearing is Canadians properly pronouncing the "ou" sound.

I am not saying we are superior, but we tend to actually follow pronunciation rules of vowel sounds and combination. (Again doesn't mean we are better, we just for some reason like to differentiate between vowel sounds and take the time to do so)

That "aboot" sound is us actually making the "ou" noise, something that a lot of Americans don't do.

They pronounce "ou" as "ow" like "ow I got a boo bo"

We typically pronounce "ou" as "ou" like what you get when you have double o's as in "boo-boo". It's Americans that stopped doing this, and they're basically making fun of a more "proper" sounding English.

Again proper doesn't mean superior, Canadians just take the time to pronounce everything, which is why the "stereotype" is slow-sounding people that pronounce things funny. 

We are basically the easiest to understand universally for English speakers. 

It's a mix of British and American, so we pander to both parties. Oh yes, I know to do that now. I also now know that my license can be suspended if I don't pay a parking ticket on time, I literally never thought that would happen, and maybe it would go to creditors. 

Sometimes you forget to drive to another town to pay a $25 ticket. I had to go to their court office to pay it or do it with a credit card ; which I don't have, online, so I sort of just put it off.

That little ticket sat in my glove box, and was plotting it's evil plan from day one. You are totally right about the t into d I never noticed that at all, until now.

At first I said it like someone from the East Coast or New England, then I started saying it like I normally do, really never noticed that.

Weird thing is, if someone asked me a second time "what do you want on your toast" and the answer was "budder", I would make sure to pronounce the "t", "BUTTER". I know it's weird that I said that, used to live in a kitchen and I remember specifically making that "t" noise when I was annoyed with someone. 

I heard in Quebec they add "w" into words when mad.I'm from Southern Ontario, if they were from the city they sound like Central NY, I am on the border of the country, people in PA, Ohio and all that thought I was from NY.

But this is what people in my town; or some, sound like, it literally is like a hick/Canadian accent, and most people wouldn't think it exists. Most people talk like this around me.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ezUvGhT4KwM

The de-aad comment for Dad is sooo True. They're vicious as fuck, so I wouldn't. You don't want to have to kick one in the face, that won't feel good on your soul.Russia has the Orthodox; Christian, religion that widely influenced their holidays, society, architecture. 

They use the Cyrillic alphabet used in Slavic countries from Poland to Serbia.

They are a Northern country, so winter plays into their folklore and all that stuff.

I think the Bear is a symbol of the country; black bear.

I know the reason they have dashboard cams on their cars; or a lot of them do, is to crack down on police injustice.

Despite peoples hate for the Government the people seem to be pretty upset with the way things are run.Figure out who the hell made me. I don't know rob the shit out of every local bank?

Go to Government offices and read all the files I can till I get bored; which would be quick.

Put the Queen's Face in Charles' crotch for when I unfreeze time.

Put Obama bent over Trump in dogstyle position on White house front lawn.you loved itDentists encouraged it actually so they could profit off people feeling self conscious about their smile that would be eternally captured through pictures.  - ___ -Je peux parler en tabarnac de crisse ton mere. J'm. Because I'm from VermontRide the bus, forget how to play, but if you end up riding the bus you get fucked. this gave me chills, I had some perv approach me when I was a kid too.oh you!Oh, I'm all good man, thanks for asking. I didn't want to take away from your post by saying " This is what happened to me", but I mind as well now.

Was at basketball court with my brother down the street from my house, man in van pulls up, talks to us for a bit about his lost dog, brings us up to his van, asks us if we want to go help him find it and he'll buy us I forget what. I saw a bunch of cartoons of cigarettes in the back, and both of the seats had been removed; it was a minivan. 

My brother is older than me, but I think I was the only one that was shown stranger danger videos; or at least they started with my generation.

I knew something was up the moment he offered to get us something.

I told him that we just needed to go eat and that we'd come back.

My mom flipped her shit when I told her at dinner, I forget what she did exactly, but I remember she was basically hysterical that happened.

She still let us play alone outside though after, go figure. The 90's were a strange time. 

Nothing as bad as your story at all, he didn't show us anything, but he attempted to abduct us basically. Closest station to both of us is Downsview, which is the same one both of us use if we're going to Toronto; I live a little bit outside of Toronto in the countryside.

I also know he is cheap like me and will buy crappy seats, and I know he goes there fore sure on the weekend.

I wanted to go so bad, but avoided it like an idiot.

You really shouldn't avoid Yonge/Dundas, so many people there, just look forward and don't even crowd watch for him, that way you'll just walk by if he's close. It's not like an empty area where you guys may come face to face.

Just like the chances of me bumping into him at the skydome are basically zilch.You guys are all good right? I didn't even ask, I assumed you were because you said you got out of there really quick.

Stranger Danger videos literally may have saved my life/ avoid molestation. They are important as ridiculous as they are, I remember the videos saying they'll offer you something if they want you to go with them.

The lost dog really had me, I'm a sucker for dogs, and I legit wanted to help, so did my brother, then he was like "I'll get you [icecream; I forget]" and I was like, "STRANGER DANGER STRANGER DANGER", made up an excuse and got out of there.

Haha, 6 year olds really do pay attention to those videos. Have you told your sister? Or does she remember?I think Teddy is the one working.tant pisYou guys have the biggest hoser accent in the country BY!!!!!

TABARNAK DE CANARD DE MON MERE DE LA BANQUE DU CANADA DE MONDE DE MONTREAL DE DU DE LA

Fer serious, yew guys sound like dis der, okie?

Fer fuck sakes I'm from Alberta der.chiac

&gt;I could understand that just by picking out a few words. French is just gay english

This had me rolling, you are a dee best der. I wish I wasn't poor and could gild this.c'est pas vrai, c'est shitYes, I met him at a wine tasting.I'm sort of curious about how other northern countries embrace winter.Toronto Maple Leafs.

Biggest city in the country that plays the most/invented hockey. Haven't won a cup in over forty years, are a shit team. I fucking hate them.

But boy do all the other people in the area love the shit out of them.So many th-If the Chicago Cubs are worth 1.6 Billion and haven't done shit in 4 decades, then yes, yes they are, I am unfamiliar with the Cubs history/ support.

I know Chicago is a huge city, so I would assume yes.
*Just looked it up, yes they are the Maple Leafs, they're worth about the same, and have a shit track record.

How the hell are they worth over a Billion dollars?Don't call me bro fucknutThe city would probably go nuts if that happened I'm guessing. All this I'm hard/tough bullshit, you live in a 1st World Country, doubt you know what hard is

WE consider things masculine that are done by little girls in other countries.Have a stupid username.

Shitpost.

Shitpost.

Shitpost.

Shitpost.I'm sorry I don't live in a country.Redditors who live on Earth, what do tourists always do wrong when they enter your country?I hate to admit it, but I have eaten snacks in the house, and used to blame it on my niece. I only did it like three times, and she didn't get in trouble, they just would be mad if I had eaten it and wouldn't care if she did.no I'm trolling essentially, your mistake made me laugh, awkward sentences always make me die, thanks for the laugh, no harm, I just thought it wa sfunnyAm I the only one who freaks out about this, just reading this stupid question has tripped me out.

I don't want to die, it's bullshit in my opinion. I left out I was eating childrens snacks; princess fruit chews...etc, they weren't for me, and I was demolishing an entire box in a night. Mc Cholome dildos of course ay di di la di doLMFAO NO I AM 25.

I ate my nieces snacks this year, her Frozen Disney Princess Snacks. I told my sister/mom it was her while I was watching, when it was me.LET'S KILL THEM!

RABBLE RABBLE!!!Haha no

K I watched her a couple of times.

When I did, I ate all her disney princess snacks, and when they would come home I would blame it on my niece.

I'm a real role model. Not staying a child foreverWhere did sweaters come from?Democrats and Whoopi Goldberg, I'll let you decide which one is which, and which is the which of the which one. Are we in a tango right now?I know man, and it's like who invented the spoon right? Like totally far out.5/6yes the clappers are going down to do they bits on toad commonWhat is a dance I thought it was some type of moving around.To see another day.

It's so beautiful the world if you explore, and see things for yourself, and diddle once in a while. I got gold today, I didn't put an edit, I just sent a message thanking. gay sexCall TLC and are immediately handed a tv series. Slice em', dice em' throw em in a potAte at Arby's7 1/2 Inchmake up, wigs, tight clothes, fashion, yup. 

This isn't just in France,

there are African tribes where the guys wear make up and dress up all pretty like. I forgot to get a Shamrock Shake. Had a bunch of pot in my bag in highschool; all dimed out, somebody stole another persons cellphone during the class, principle was called, door was shut, he started opening and going through everybodies bag.

The guy admitted 5 minutes into it, but it was the "most" I've ever felt I was really fucked in my life.

Since then haven't really had much trouble. &gt; Who is the nicest person on Reddit, and why?

&gt;I fucking hate Poem for your sprog. whoever she is, she write shitty poetry that never ads anything to the conversion.

I thought we were trying to act like crazy people. So there's more of us, I'm not really excited to see what happens, and don't have the chill attitude of it, I prefer to not be remindedNo it no racist, the ball ping and pong across board. Miley CyrisWhile you diddle.my assi was waiting for this, you reaction wasn't funny though. I was expecting somebody to rant. dealyou OP. And your smug fucking attitude. fuckin repostwww.mcdonalds.com/jobs/apply.htmlfuck youpaying billsTrollsfuck you my sausage link darling.

I mean cream cheese is ok, but it's not the best to lick off somebodies body.

Hey there green your town found grew for say to want nowIce creamYou are the one who is the ball lickers, when I find you, I'm gunna make you eat my shit, then eat your shit which is made up of my shit, and make you eat my shit which is the shit that you just shit out which was my shit that I made you eat. Listen, I'm a Doctor too, you don't know what you are talking about. SmurfvilleI jerk off a lotpoontangMMMMEERRRRRR MEEEERRRRRR MERRRRRRRRRMERRRRRRRR MERRRRRRRRMaking low brow jokes. Ya they're more on the /r/downtempo or /r/chillhop side, but this song was more along triphop. 

They're really good if you like downtempo with fat bass. Time to watch the leafs shit the bed. You can't escape it, backwards hat was big when I grew up, I'm in my 20's and do not mind guys that dress like that.

I'm not used to suits, so they're unattractive to me, very casual, comfortable clothes turn me on in a guy.

I notice people in the city prefer guys to be dressed up; could be because they're used to seeing this.  My boyfriend is from the South and lives in Canada with me now.

It was 15 degrees out; don't know farenheight(maybe like 60?), the other day, he had a scarf, beanie, winter jacket, and gloves on. I was wearing a light sweat shirt and jeans..... I refused to go out in public with him.

I'm normally not embarrassed, but wearing full winter gear in Canada in September looks pretty stupid/touristy. 

I basically gave him a speech, on how you don't wear gloves inside, you don't wear scarves in the fall; unless you are a city fashion, but you can wear a beanie year round if you want.

He was pretty happy I saved him from looking like an idiot.

He went grocery shopping before that with his scarf, jacket, and gloves..... it was 20 degrees outside. 

Four random things I had to teach him; just a cultural thing, 

1) That long socks are ok to wear with jeans in Canada, they don't do this in the south; he said, and wear ankle socks year round. He calls my socks "Dad" socks, but is starting to realize why it's ok for Canadians to wear them; they're warm.

2) Sweat pants are acceptable clothes to wear in Canada and are almost fashionable in the winter for casual wear.

3) Sweat shirts can be worn by people of all ages in Canada, it's not a teenager thing, it's a necessity thing. He is starting to like the fact we have more options because of the cold; you can wear hoodies year round at any age. 

4) Shorts that go past your **knee** are acceptable clothing in Canada, and popular, I think it has to do with the bugs; at least in my area, you really don't want all your skin exposed. Really short shorts are common where he comes from, and I'm embarrassed to wear them, and he is embarrassed to wear long shorts. 


---------------------------------------------------------------------------------

My ex sometimes wore Italian leather shoes that I didn't understand, I never said anything, but my heart used to sink when I saw him wearing them, they were just so funny looking; I'm a hick. Other people have said this, but I'm going to say it.

Dip out of there now.

He sounds like a douche bag

&gt; I'm a size Queen I only like thick dick shoved in my hole hope you bring lots of luuuubeeee.....


bleh fuck that. How did you even last this long with him? Did his douchebagery exponentially grow from the first date starting off small? One day you are having fun, the next he is telling you he needs his hole stretched by a pop can dick.There really isn't a universal gay culture.

There is a culture, that LGBT partake in, but that's not "gay" culture.

We really need to come up with another word for the underground gay culture or whatever the fuck you wanna call it, so that these posts aren't made.

You don't need to associate yourself with that if you don't want to, I think the fact people label it "gay" culture is what bothers others.

It should be called the Queer Party Circuit or some shit. QPC. Yes this, anybody can become "fit", most people can loose weight.

I didn't even know what they were until I read that post, I learn most of my "gay" shit on here.

I don't have a problem with it, but I have a problem with what the OP of the other post said the guy did. He dated him for a month then randomly said 

&gt; " Oh ya by the way yo' dick ain't big nuff fo' my corn holio, let me hollar back at you"

That's what I have a problem with.

If you're on GrindR looking for hookups or even relationships, and from the start you say you want a guy with a big dick, as long as you find someone just as shallow as that, I really don't have a problem with it or would hate the person.Sweatpants in the burbs' isn't unseen/unheard of.

And I meant just below knew or at knee, everything my boyfriend wears is above way above knee. He commented that he noticed guys don't wear above knee shorts that much; I feel above knee is a Uni student thing. Literally kept on pointing it out till I noticed it too, he said it must be a "northern" thing.  

Montreal isn't all of Canada, and is known as being way more fashionable than the rest of the country, so that doesn't count, people outside of Toronto and even in the outer boroughs of Toronto wear sweatpants in winter all the time, obviously not to work, I'm talking about around the house or if they go out grocery shopping to get something.

If you are going to eat somewhere for dinner obviously you aren't going to wear sweatpants unless it's like a bar or franchise.

I live in a small town on the outskirts of Toronto, the closest town to me that is a part of the concrete mass of Toronto is full of "fashionable" people that wear sweatpants.

Just because you don't like them doesn't mean other people don't, almost everyone I know has a pair.

I can tell by the "really basic" comment you might be a bit more into fashion than the average person, I was talking about people who are just trying to not look like an idiot in public. Enough people here wear sweatpants, and at knee/below knee shorts, it isn't unfashionable.

Fashion is subjective and differs from place to place, I could argue over dressing is unfashionable where I live because it is, you look like a plug if you were all city dressed where I live, you are expected to be modest and humble here, most people are rich here too, nice clothes, but nothing flashy. Sneakers are worn by adults. 

But ya, you're from Montreal, you don't count, you guys are all hot and are completely unique in Canada.I meant knee, I'm stupid.&gt; I'm sure DrDingusForrester knows that

I didn't know it, as much as I troll on here I don't know everything to do with gay people, I literally didn't know what GrindR was or /r/askgaybros was until 9 months ago. I'm on here to learn about things going on with other gay people, not to act superior because I don't know anything about it; just in case you thought that. I feel disconnected, and it's annoying not being able to talk to other gay people when all my friends are straight males that live in other cities. This is me trying to catch up after 7 years of being a quasi-closet case; still am not out to all my friends and I'm not out at work. 

Sorry that happened, he is just selfish. Believe it or not, a lot of people only care about themselves when it comes down to it.

The fact he could insult you after a relationship that long, says he really doesn't care about other people.

He has the right to be bored with someone, but to say " I regret everything involving you" is just such an insulting thing to say and clearly shows you were just an object in his life and not a person.

The exact same thing happened to me, so I know how you feel, I wasn't married though, but he replaced with me with somebody else and said " I've been unhappy with you for the past year"..... ok thanks for dicking me around for that long.

It just goes to show a lot of people only look out for Numero Uno at times.Being weird, several times, all said in a good way. I almost expect it now.Being sick will make you loose weight anyway. You usually eat way less and your body wastes energy fighting off whatever is making you sick.It's just pump action bullshit from what I've seen on movies.I've been cheated on twice in the only two serious relationships I've had, has turned me into a paranoid weirdo. 

I was really tempted to post something today just after my boyfriend left because he seemed to be being secretive with his phone, but it was just paranoia talking, and I convinced myself not to.

Getting cheated on fucking sucks, that's all I can say, and when two different people of over 2 year relationships do it, you start to wondering if everyone is just fucking you around. Pucks Farm; best for kids, Downey's Farm, Anywhere in Caledon; I live there they're everywhere.Isn't there Winterlude or something?

Toronto really needs to throw a winter carnival like QC, why on Earth it doesn't is beyond me.

OP there are things you can do in the GTA during the winter too, Albion Hills in Caledon has cross country-skiing and snowshoeing you can do on a ridiculous amount of trails; it's about 40 min drive from downtown.

The main key; at least for me, is listening to "happy" music and getting outside as often as you can and when you can. Even if it's walking to the convenience store.

Enjoy the freezing cold air, and look forward to doing nothing when it's snowing heavy outside. 

The winter is pretty awesome, I just don't like the extreme cold, and the fact I get home from work and it's getting dark. You are so smart! Tell me about yourself.Anything by Coldplay. There were native inuit people there.

Fishing, whaling and possibly furs are the main industries.

They also eat birds that they leave under rocks to rot, I forget what it's called.

Inuits have been inhabiting the arctic circle for millenniums. Awww, I didn't mean to come off as rude I was just joking around bud. Even my son can do it, and he's got issues. that's good because I can make lots of sex.

Before you come over make sure to use bathroom, I don't have one. oh I meant literally "anything", like any song.  I hate Pop music and Rihanna is next level dopeness compared to the mopping sounds of that shitty band. Thanks, I'm happy to be here.I'm gay and hate Coldplay... literally am gay. Look at user history. 

I normally don't mind gay jokes, but that one annoyed me; in the movie not you. That's how much I hate Coldplay, I find that the most offensive gay jokePlease post to /r/blunderyearsSo do a lot of towns/cities in the North

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Iqaluit

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sachs_Harbour

So does Whitehorse, it's bigger than Nuuk in Greenland, is really expensive to live, and has really short winter days

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Whitehorse,_Yukon

It's expensive because there is a lack of development in the North, it is in demand because inuits actually still have relatively large families.

It is natural population growth that drives it, very few people are actually moving there. 

You're not an idiot, it is mind blowing people live up there. Nah no harm done, I was just exaggerating my hate for Coldplay.

I worked at a Home Depot the past two years, I heard them enough times to want to kill myselfDon't be mean now.I can see their eggs, but not their hamYou're a good eggIs it that bad? Is it worth buying?I'm gay haha, so it don't matter yo, I got issues.

Even Tim and Eric's homosexual innuendos make me uncomfortable. at least he's got spaghetti potNeeds to go back to Jackson HoleIt's Tim show and he can do what he wantsThe only thing wrong with what you are getting at is when you judge people for friendships, acquaintances and just everyday interactions based on looks.

I feel like if you want to only date people who are of a certain attractiveness than go ahead, your own attractiveness will dictate how successful you are. There is nothing wrong with that.

But being rude, uneasy about people that look off is what is wrong. 

As in how sometimes for certain positions that require less skills more attractive people are likely to get hired even if they're less qualified; especially for women, more attractive people are usually paid more money.

People judge your intelligence, morals, and everything based on your looks sometimes, which again is wrong.

OP you have a different problem than this, you are worried basically about what other people will think if you aren't with someone who is hot. Why else would you not be comfortable with being with someone less attractive than you? There is no reason to care unless you care about what other people think.

I'd also like to add most other people don't give a shit how attractive you are, especially people who are less attractive, they couldn't give two shits who you are dating or who you are with. I never look at a group of people or couple and am like "damn she is way better looking", so maybe you need to change the way you look at the world.

I just see people, and so do the majority of everybody else. If there is a hot person in public people pay attention to them, not who they're with....etc. 

The only people that care about ratings, and will say anything like " out of your league" ....etc are childish. They don't have a good grip on reality, looks only became super important relatively recently, before that everyone was all haggard and banging eachother.I think it really depends, I'm dating a 32 year old and am 25, but he looks my age, and his previous dating history is all older guys.

Sometimes I forget the age gap even exists, but there is a point where I think it would become a problem

A) When younger party is using older party and vice versa; older is just trying to buy a hot young guy.

B) When the age gap is large and they want to start a family,I think it is unfair for some kids to be raised by really old parents that may die in their teenage years, but that's just my opinion.

--------------------------

Age gaps can be fun, because you can poke jokes at eachother, I'm always reminding my boyfriend I wasn't alive when he mentions anything before 1990. 

I'm not a twink by choice I just look like I'm 18/19 and am relatively hairless which actually sucks believe it or not. no but the best way to get it is to tape it if you have no other waySome immigrants don't know how unprofessional that is, not their fault, they're just from countries were people can do that stuff openly.

The amount of shit I heard from people at my work, I could have complained but decided to leave it alone because they were foreign and didn't know any better. 

Eventually she will be caught, and either fired or given a warning. Someone will complain. I mean some, India has some more rampant homosexuality, though not necessarily violence, just overall ignoring it. It's from old British colonial law.

Hindu religion in itself is accepting of homosexuality but not really in the same sense that we look at it, and I don't really know enough about it to say anything, but I do know it's moreso old British colonial law that gives India it's homophobic environment.

Jamaica takes this to the extreme, and people still get killed often enough if found out to be gay, and that again is old British laws.

A lot of homosexual discrimination in countries around the world can be blamed on old law systems from colonial countries that are still in place in those countries.

I also thought most of South America was relatively tolerant and Guyana was the only country where it is still illegal.

I'm pretty sure homosexuality or at least anal sex is illegal in India still. Why do you think you shouldn't be with him? Anything off about him?It depends on the person like /u/NerdyForThings said.

Personally, it would feel weird for a guy to give roses, stuffed animal, anything typically "romantic" to me. Sorry to sound wrong, and anti femme, or pro masc, but those gifts seem like things that a female(there are most likely plenty that don't care for it either) may enjoy more , with the odd male who may enjoy that. I'd rather just have dinner paid for or doing an activity paid for. Gifts really aren't my thing, minus Birthdays/Christmas.

Candy is also alright on Valentines day because I don't care if it's a chocolate princess tiara, I'm eating that. 

You can be into plants, and cute things....etc and be a dude, it just does absolutely nothing for me at all.

Ah maybe you just feel he is smothering you.

How is he not funny?&gt; This is a shitty post, but I'll respond anyway

I don't know what the hell that is but I'll lick it anywayThat dynamic can work, you dont' have to agree on whats funny and may eventually start finding how lame the other person is funny.

When you get smothered just show signs you take things slow, it shouldn't be enough to turn you off, it just shows he's falling for you harder and not everyone falls hard for people.

I've never fallen hard for anyone in my life, it's also me liking them and that turning into loving them, I take a lot more time to warm up to people, maybe this is your problem too.
tears to my eyesvideos blocked for me :(I actually exercise to keep my mood elevated , 3 days a week at least, plus doing other random activities whenever I can. 

I also workout to gain weight as I will stay at around 145 lbs if I dont, I'm 165 right now and am aiming for 170 lbs, my body really hides weight and whenever I stop working out I turn into a twig. I came here to say eat fruit. They're high in water content and your body absorbs it better than just drinking.

For your actual question.... a blow up doll. Fleshlight?I'll throw some out there that touch on it

I'm not a fan of Tupac so it may not be in that style. Some of them I copied the line that touches on it.

[Zion I - Trippin](https://youtu.be/I3PYY5PIuxA?t=219) &lt;-- only has the odd mention of it

[Maspyke - Gong Show](https://youtu.be/vpjsr1OR5iI?t=146) &lt;-- has to do with education system again

[KRS One - MC's Act Like They Don't Know](https://youtu.be/xnI8JEW7Ty4?t=75) &lt;-- brief mention, song is mainly about how hiphop became popular and white people finally think it's cool to be black; or at least that line.

[Arrested Development - People Everyday](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=a_4Y7Cei_bw) &lt;-- about inner racism within the black community

[Living Legends - Purple Kush](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MnyVYLAv-Gc) &lt;-- about being judged for being from the ghetto

[Cyne - One Day](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tD04ynxNGUY) &lt;-- touches on it

[Cyne - Money Parade](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=4S1Q27LsbLA) &lt;-- one of the more racial oriented

[Cyne - 400 Years](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=AB7ysBudJgY) &lt;-- this one is explicitly about racism, I think it does a way better job than Tupac

[Cyne - Soapbox](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=11eoDv2ESzw) &lt;-- Cyne/Cise Starr seem to really want to mention it often

[Binary Star - Conquistadors](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=2c7To97v2s4) &lt;-- touches on black rights movement

[J Live - R.A.G.E](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=nSCshnLnqKk)

There are others can't think of them, not all is what you are looking for. Don't know if you wanted the subject matter or the sound of Changes. 

So you cheated?; didn't 100% seem like cheating intentionally.

Why did you do it?

Where you looking to hook up; be honest, or did it really randomly happen?It should be called Sandra Bulloch destroys every space stationyou took my puppy and left me all alone

you said you loved me but that was just a lie

how could a mommy aBAnndon your own sonTrue I've been cheated on a bunch of times so I always try and figure out why people do it.

Though your situation is a bit different, I was having relationship troubles everytime, but I never told the other person "I didn't love them anymore", that pretty much is grounds to get drunk, upset and cheat. If anyone gets a get out of jail free card it's you. My niece is half Mi'qmaq&gt;to make your first million dollars?

[smffuhaaha](https://media.giphy.com/media/5ve0mzORj7m5q/giphy.gif)Imperialyes the narrative should have been that she secretly works for ISIS, because it seemed like she did. Cokea super broke white dude for meDo you expect a real response there?You did this on your phone didn't you?repost shitpost[This](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/3nylqn/serious_what_are_some_serious_trolls_you_know_and/) oneshutupdiddlin my doo daayyydiddlina wood fenceEat her vagina outawww you deleted it i was just joking mengNigerian Princes don't want to give you moneykill a manthen I'll just repost another shitpost by you a la carte.

haha joking, I make shitposts all the time, it's the best thing to do, I also delete them, you don't know the stupid shit i've asked,you don't even want to begin to start to commence to finally and faithfully understand the shitpost I have made on this here very right now website we are talking on.On EarthlmaoI'd make everyone skin blue so we could all shut the fuck up pleaseI've been good ever since the Joker died I've just been slapping Catwoman around making her do things for me.Making Sims tired so they would start a fire and burn to death when they make breakfastI did it for the bitchesMole Man because he gets shit on, and nobody is gay for him.Ya glad things worked out between you guys, I read the first post when you originally posted it but had no advice to offer. Haiti/Dominican Republic. It's good in Chinese foodyes and the wars between those two countries, the movement of power from one country to another, just everything, voodoo...etc, Santeria, Macumbi...etc haha sorry so much on that little island Hispanola. I hated George Clooney's character more, the cool veteran guy who gets all the ladies... go fuck yourself.

Stupid story about Vegas or whatever the fuck that banter was, I couldn't believe that shit of dialogue was plugged into that movie.

They went for folksy and came out douchey/barfNothing special, it's nice someone recognizes a post you make.I don't have an STIWeekend ruinedthis for sureTake flying lessons and buy a planeYay he gets to call Service Ontario! But seriously he should call them as painful as that may be. I know it includes your car if you own one, and what you have in your bank, anything you own that would be registered, obviously things like tvs, computers don't count, but anything that they can prove as having monetary value.

Including a house if you have one.The NDP told him to not hold those views so he doesn't hold those views[removed]Chill out guy you think because I make a mistake on the internet that I am an asshole, you just sit in your ivory tower, while I do the work[Nappy Roots - Good Day](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=M3fkZeWsyvo)


[Niedola - Matroyoshka](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=mnmbPLC-iUU) &lt;-- Japan is known for having some dark material, but this music video made be extremely uncomfortable. It's about what seems to be a murderous lesbian couple. The song is pretty dark too, but I like downtempo. NSFW

[Glen Porter - 5 AM](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=iV98MpubQIM) &lt;--- awesome song, really fucked up sound, reallly fucked up subject matter in the sound clips he puts in... Life just isn't worth living anymore.... etc, even though the song is actually great. NSFW

[Glen Porter - Ask Her Nicely and She'll Show You Her Scars](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ckvzzwOLDgQ) this song literally gives me the chills, it's amazing, acoustic triphop. The sound clips he inserts are really fucked up though " He left me black and blue" "she's so sore she showed it to me" "always violent" and uncomfortable laughter&lt;--- talking about her vagina and getting raped, I'm pretty sure the song is about a girl getting raped. Still a beautiful song. NSFW

[Prefuse 73 - For Some But Not For Me](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=WDsvVKHd3cE) &lt;--- most fucked up sound that I actually like, he is really great and pretty much invented glitch. Not dark at all, just one of the first electronic artists to use really unconventional methods SFW



Industrial of some sort for sure. This is similar to /r/chillhop, /r/downtempo, /r/futurebeats , /r/chillmusic

I have two playlists on youtube that pretty much are exactly this type of music. Like exactly this type.

[Zoning Out](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=snjMYyjPUiE&amp;list=PLwnZVWlybns1oMSsfn5sMWIUoDgVuR8tu)

and

[Slow Down](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=mcK_DxAPlFM&amp;list=PLwnZVWlybns35IXqiR0Ejcc3m1fd5l583)

Sorry for the lame names, I really think you'll find songs you like on both of them, they're from various genres and artists. Subscribe to some of the channels if you like them, I don't upload music, I just make playlists I can listen to later on. 

It's really diverse so skip through songs if you don't like, some of it is more triphop and instrumental piano / Japan Nujabes style.

Harper is run of the mill.wa-oh-wa-oh-me-ow-ohWhen I'm looking at the [world now](https://encrypted-tbn0.gstatic.com/images?q=tbn:ANd9GcRsNhGm9HvS0O43Wc9faC33TyjtYaE_1NOJGvoGl59WRmvI8ySH)

and it's going [insane](http://i.imgur.com/oCjm2Vk.gifv)

thinking about checking out, can't do it again

but I know just who I am, how strong I can beya blew it, capicheeit's from Human Planet, Jungles Episode.

It actually is pretty awesome what they do to make music. Soft female singing over a heavy beat? This isn't gonna be exactly what you were looking for

[Koven - Petrichor](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FFyQBhfnhEs) &lt;--- she has an amazing voice, singing starts at 1:23

[Enkidu - Falling](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ys_3nHIOipg)

[Kidkanevil ft. Phasma - "Inakunaru"](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9mJSzU2-iDg) &lt;--- favourite of mine, really wispy voice, heavy beat. 

[Populous - Fall(feat Cuushe](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FGs57y4nA_Y)

[Grimes - Genesis](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1FH-q0I1fJY)

[Massive Attack - Tear Drop](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=u7K72X4eo_s)

[Mimi Page](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=4uEj6CIvnKs)

[Yukari - Hang On](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fGWKJtQgQEQ)

Try out /r/triphop or /r/downtempo as well, the basis of those two genres is basically soft female vocals over heavy beats, that isn't what it has to be, but that's the signature of those two genres. 





I don't know if you can consider this a cover, but Goo Mar does version of [In the Hall of the Mountain King](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Sh0qn2SvQ20) that is pretty awesome

[Monophonics - Bang Bang](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xyWHRC8A_uU) is a pretty good cover of [Nancy Sinatra - Bang Bang](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=T5Xl0Qry-hA)

[Brock Berrigan - Celebration Song](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xJ4-vj4zBcw) is an awesome version of [Jorge Ben Jor - Take it Easy Charlie](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tihuetXMG8U)I couldn't even click on the link it creeps me out so much, I believe you OP. No proof required. 

I don't wanna know what fucked up biological process causes that. Obviously [Crashed Ice](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dsYdkYNIq14) , it would be so fucking fun&gt;Venetian Snares - Die Winnipeg Die Die Die Fuckers Die 

Then the Album was called Winnipeg is a Frozen Shithole... thanks for making me spit my coffee out.

Sounds industrialish.

Don't really know many groups like this

[Death Grips](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3_V_2BFWahc) is the closest I could think, but they're a bit more drum based. But they have ridiculous names, and have an angry/deranged sound. Haha no problem, didn't realize you mentioned Aphex Twins, you can check out industrial electronic, or  drum and bass for a sound similar to that.

What you are listening to sounds glitchy, but it's got a different vibe. 

I'll suggest some glitch anyway. 

[Prefuse 73](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1pZznNedGjM)

[Dabrye](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hYZ5uL35kpU)

[Koloto](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xxGv_YFg8G4)

Also the [Crystal Method](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Jn95H30m0D8) is associated with Aphex Twins.

I guess you are looking for early 2000's, late 90's industrial electronic. I was just wondering this too, I've never heard this before and I thought I knew all of his stuff/thought maybe this was new, was disappointed to find out it wasn't.
I think it's weird unless you see them normally; i.e at a store, bus stop.

Some complete rando saying that, that is a bit weird. Living Legends, Aesop Rock, CYNE, Hi-Rez, Prie, People Under the Stairs, Zion I, J live, SaukratesYa there is not talent involved. Clearly have never actually listened to hiphop, it's one of the hardest things to successfully write lyrics for. Many of the artists are PhD's in English

For Instance

Eyedea and Abilites

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=jAWrscplyOA

J live English Professor

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=XEx2T1NLsqw

Binary Star ; Decompoz is a PhD

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=__Z4jDgOFTA

Maspyke &lt; English Masters

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vpjsr1OR5iI

A lot of hiphop artists go to postsecondary for English.... virtually no other musical artists have to do that to write good lyrics.

He also created the Universal Child Care benefit, something that greatly benefits my sister... a single mom..

Without Harper she would be out $300 a month to spend on her children. 

She doesn't support abortion, and didn't get one, like many other girls would to make "their" life better, she put the life of another human being above hers.

I don't get what you are on about, all this antiharper bs from /r/Canada is really starting to get it me, it's incredibly undemocratic for such a hivemind to form.

What about the Liberals/NDP makes them better?

Canada is one of the most radicalized ; for Islam, countries in the Western world, we have more ISIS fighters than the U&gt;S does and they have 10x the population. We ISIS and other terrorist cells in every major city. Many independent reports have said that 1/100 Syrian refugees are undercover ISIS fighters.... that means Harper is right to do C-51 and to stop the Syrian refugee process in the spring.

Do you know how many Canadians have committed terorrist attacks? Killed innocent people abroad? A lot. 

His government has been in power during 4 foiled terrorist attacks.

The fact he is actually taking the threat seriously, shows he is a moral person. If he was amoral he would pander to public opinion and let an attack happen, which again, would have happened 4 TIMES. Look it up.

I think making Canadians feel safe in Public spaces is a lot more important than making a few "immigrants" few welcome, the needs of the many outweigh the needs of the few and it is so True.

Imagine if the Toronto 18 plot went through, how much tax money would be wasted on security AFTER that, how many people would be afraid of doing things in Public? How much would that affect Canadian society.... A LOT.

There is proof that some terrorist are using the Syrian crisis as a way to move around the world, like literal proof; again look it up, so.... I don't want those people in my country at the moment.

An indepdent party verifies refugees, it's not Canadian Government, we are just delegated and have no say in who is sent to us, there is a reason for everything Harper has done, people just aren't updated on current events to realize it. Or can't put two and two together. Harper doesn't want to scare the public and be like " terrorist, terrorist" like they do in the U.S, but that is the reason he does what he does.

There is a real threat, that he is actively preventing, and us Canadians stupidly bitch about him infringing on our rights, I think the right to a happy peaceful life is more important than the right to be able to be involved in terrorist activities without being monitored by the government.

I give up my right to full privacy and "equality" knowing that I can go to Toronto, take a subway, and know that the Government is actually trying to prevent real radical threats from happening.

Look it all up please, I'm not even anti-Islam at all, I come from Islamic countries, the threat is real, and Harper is the only leader with enough balls to actually approach it, regardless of PC hippie Canadian public complaining about violations of their rights that DON'T and WILL NEVER affect them, ever.

A terrorist attack, just one, may not kill a lot of people, but it would AFFECT every Canadian in their DAILY lives, that's what makes it so important, he isn't dumb, and doesn't think that there is going to be massacres....etc, he just knows that an attack would make going out in public/events a lot harder, and would negatively affect Canadian life style in all facets. I say deport them, I say monitor them. I don't care if that can be applied to me, I'm not a terrorist, so it will never affect me. They also say the Conservatives are racist.

Fact : 2010 we have 280,000 immigrants to Canada, more than any year in recent history.

Fact : The Liberals actually cut back immigration in the 1990's while they were in power during a tiny" economic crisis". Canada is facing a huge crisis now; that's not harpers fault it's the WORLDS fault, and we are letting in more immigrants than ever before. Ya the conservatives are sooooo racist.

They also made it easier for people with just TRADES skills to immigrate here, that means the restrictions became EASIER, people who don't have any post secondary education can move here to work in the trades.... wow he is so racist, he is letting in stupider immigrants.... makes no sense at all to think he's racist.

The only thing I don't agree with Harper on is it's environmental policy; but everyone who is against him because of it is a hypocrit who lives a lifestyle that destroys the planet anyway unless you are off the grid growing your own food you don't care about the environment, and on Israe; he supports them too muchl.

Oh ya, on your support for parents comments, he also did that organized sports tax credit, making it easier for poor kids to play sports..... ya what a douche bag.

Sorry to go on a rant, I just hate when people claim shit that they don't even back up with fact, people just spew " He is racist", without even realizing he has let in the most immigrants/ made it easier for less skilled immigrants to move here. 

He wanted to help Syrian refugees, then that report came out on how many radicalized people are using it as an excuse to immigrate and that must have affected his decision for halting processing in the Spring.

He's not perfect, but I trust the guy a lot more than the Libs, they are the ultimate pandering party, they just say whatever the public wants to hear.

If the Libs comes into power, I cannot wait to see the shit show that follows and the hivemind change to anti-Liberals. Yup, again Harper is a douche, every politician is a douche, he is just the best douche we have so far.

I do like Mulcair actually, a lot, I just feel the NDP may be irresponsible; more so than the Conservatives.

We can't forget some of the crap that Harper has done; unintentionally, that has been pretty crappy. The closing of science research libraries, and funding was poorly handled, the intent was to save money and actually keep the research but somehow it all got fucked up, which was really bad in my opinion, the scientific community should be fully left a lone.

He has is pro-Israel, and wants to give more funding to the military, which I don't agree with at all.

But those two issues to me, are less important than other issues, and immigration is the least important issue to me, it affects the least amount of Canadians, most of us were born here, so I don't see why it's placed at the top of the list.

Environmental policy is something that I do see as very important, is the one thing that I sometimes hate the Cons for, but they do it from an economic standpoint, and aren't completely horrendous, the world as a whole is destroying the environment, so being truly "green" is very hard. It's not like the Libs/NDP would do much more to help in that respect.Sometimes if it looks like they put too much effort into how they dress I can, but I always give them a chance, some of them aren't as "vain" and "shallow" as you may think and just generally enjoy that crap. I just tend to judge people on that really easily/am embarrassed to be seen with people that are dressed really well. Unless they are foreign, then I sort of just give them a get out of jail free card because they may be from a society that does that a lot more. I thought they just went to temples/mosques and or Muslim education schools.

Arabs aren't the only muslims, my family is from the Balkans and there are a lot of muslims there that are "european" in lifestyle, writing...etc. Everything is done in the Latin/ Cyrillic Alphabet. Look up Bosnia, Macedonia, Albania. /r/roastme , /r/blunderyears , /r/facepalm , /r/whitepeoplefacebook , /r/pettyrevenge , /r/nottimanderic&lt;--- nice collection of different types of humour/r/listentothis for music is alright too if you like listening to random songs that people generally approve of; it sort of filters out shit but not always.

/r/nottheonion for funny real news articles

Honestly just click the random button for 30 minutes, and subscribe to subs you like, you will get a lot of crappy ones, but will find at least a couple that are pretty interesting.

/r/blackpeopletwitter is funny too it's not racist either its whitepeoplefacebook but for black people, just funny posts that people make that might be "stereotypical" or "more to their culture", all in good fun. 

/r/cringe is alright

or /r/cringeanarchy

/r/ThatHappened is good for funny stories.this, and I think the site may be under pressure to avoid linking copyright violations just for it's sake too. Ya I just think reddit may not want to be a community; due to it's size, that links to a lot of things that may infringe just because it makes them look bad? I don't know, it's a wild guess.

I don't care about reposts at all, I actually will answer the same question in askreddit a million times and try to say something different.

People can't absorb everything this site has to offer so reposts are almost crucial to me. Funnier than them all . Correct, I'm not arguing with you, it was just a crackpot theory I had they did for maybe making the site "look better" I have no idea, from a business perspective.

Piratebay haha, what a shit show that was. 

Thanks for bringing the google search up, that didn't even occur to me, google is the *internet* to me haha, and of course everything illegal is webcrawled and added to their searches, how stupid of me to forget, sometimes things just fly over your head. Sometimes the answer is so obvious you don't even see it.

Jeopardy had a category the other day that stunned everybody, the answer was literally in the question; Trebek even said this, it seemed like such an easy category, but under pressure people were choking up.

Of course that freak from DC got most of them because he's a genius. I'll never be seen as equal/comfortable with others as heterosexuals, at least in my lifetime, I'm already 25 that ship has sailed. I really like him too actually, he seems like he might be funny.

I call people freaks when they are abnormally talented at anything, it's a compliment. Think of a 90s valley girl talking haha.

haha I was gonna call him Dave but I knew that was wrong so that could have influenced the "freak" too.

Me and my family were joking that Trebek was going to start introducing him as the "DC Freak".

The guy is just so fucking randomly knowledgeable, and quick. Have you noticed he buzzes in before Trebek finishes sometimes; like 1/2 second before he is done talking. This is one of the harder ones to tell, I'm going to say Cons or Libs for sure, going to be minority obviously; I hope not but I don't think so. Messy eating, I mean getting anything on your face/hands, so I basically hate eating finger foods, and hate seeing other people at them.

I know they're just enjoying life, and it's not really causing harm, but seeing sauce on your face or hands makes me want to vomit. The sauce reminds me of your saliva , and bacteria in your mouth, and seeing that mixed with the food I'm eating really grosses me out. I'm not even that much of a germaphobe either, I can share drinks/food, I just hate seeing it, I'm the same way with meat, I can't stand seeing blood or anything that reminds me it was alive, but I don't mind eating them. 

I also hate loud eaters.

When I was a kid I used to tell my parents that we should all eat in cubicles because I couldn't stand how everyone ate, and that way we could talk to eachother still but don't have to see/hear eachother as much. No I like him a lot, way more than Ken Jennings, he has a really unique personality.

I think they can press it, but I was just pointing out he does this often, meaning he needs a lot less time to think about the questions than the other contestants.

I think speed + accuracy kind of dictate how knowledgeable the contestants are, he is clearly being triggered the answers by key words combined with the category and doesn't need to hear the full sentence to guess how it ends/ what the answer is.

I really want him to beat Ken Jenning's record, like really bad. in Canada they are called black without any eyes batted. Most black people here are from the caribs, so they really don't like being called "African" because they are proud of being from the islands and find it racist to just be assumed to be from Africa.

The term implies that you are African culture in Canada, so you just say black.

We also call Indians/Pakistani's/Bangledeshi's/ Anyone with brown skin brown.

Our government census even says "black". We also say "white" for white skin.

It's really not racist, at all, I find people racist who get all worked up about it, it means they are seeing the other people as different who need to be "protected", they're just people to me, and if their skin is black, they're black, it's an accurate descriptor. Sometimes Wheel of Fortune; haha because Jeopardy is after it.

We used to have a funny one called "You bet your ass" in Canada that I liked a lot.

Cash cab, but sometimes it's way too slow.

Pretty much nothing is on par with Jeopardy, Who Wants to be a Millionaire was way to slow.

I love how Jeopardy is fast, and actually get annoyed when the contestants don't get through all the questions.

How about you? Are there any other worthy ones out there? If some beastly chick hit me, I'd most likely kick her, so many girls are bigger than me. I'm 5 9 160 lbs, plenty of females are larger than that. 

So it is sexist, it's saying girls can't defend their own against some guys, when plenty of chicks could kick my ass, why can't I smack them back, what makes an angry chick a delicate flower? Coffee being bad for you.

Meat being bad for you.

Tap water isn't clean; most of your bottled water and bottled beverages use tap water.

In Canada the idea that our leader is racist is something people run with without providing proof that is actually racist. I second this.

Long beards are pretty gross.

I don't like moustaches unless they have a beard accompanied. 

Just look like you take care of it and you are golden, it's pretty easy to do that. 

Smooth looks too boyish Any language or just English?People Under the Stairs, RUN DMC. I think you can without food for like a week, but water only a couple of days. 

It depends on how fat you are too/ healthy/ your immune system/ your metabolsim I think.Creativity + knowledge of music theory makes a good mix. oh ya it's a bit ridiculous.

Whenever I hear a Canadian being like I'm "Asian-Canadian" or "Indian-Canadian", I ask them if they were born here, if they say "yes", I say "you are just Canadian".

You can further describe yourself as asian Canadian; lower case, black Canadian...etc, the emphasis should be on the country not were your grandparents came from.

I'm literally from 10 different countries, it would take me forever to recognize my heritage, and is quiet dumb.

I think the fact Americans' call black people "African-American" versus just "American" or a black American really put the emphasis on the "African" and away from the "American". Nothing about black Americans is like Africans, they are culturally and even genetically the same as the other Americans partially/more so than Africa.

A lot of them are mixed with white/native, and have been removed from Africa for over 200 years, that is enough to say "ok you aren't really African anymore". 

It really gives a "me and you" vibe when you describe like that, just say American. Stop walking in the middle of a busy foot traffic area.Either have I, I've been hit by them when drunk though; twice, and I had no idea who they were....etc, they thought I was somebody else.

Didn't hurt bad, but it's kind of a double standard. I think women who are beasts can handle getting punched, I'm non violent anyway, but if a chick attacked me I would defend myself, I feel kicking their legs would do the least damage, obviously you don't wanna deck them in the face. I was born in Canada, my mom was born in Macedonia, and my Dad was born in England, I really don't feel connected to Macedonia... England yes because I'm Canadian and our cultures are similar.

The only thing Macedonian about me is I like the music/eat the food.

I feel identifying with another nationality takes away from the country you live in. At least in Canada, a lot of people have this "the country my heritage from is better" mentality, which can get annoying. It's good to be proud of your heritage, but an Indian-Canadian who was born here, and goes to india, is going to find out very quickly how "Canadian" they are. the sOn a gay forum of all forums, I was bitching about how everyone is on the Liberal/NDP bandwagon in my country; Canada, for the upcoming election. Really strange guilding, did not expect that on that subreddit. No change rooms are kind of a gross environment for me, and most guys in them aren't even in good shape. I don't go to the gym, but I play hockey, if anything it makes me want to be straight.

I also hate the awkwardness of it, because I really am not turned on in that situation and hate thinking that I make other people uncomfortable.

Same thing goes with sharing a hotel room with a straight guy, they make it awkward, I have no intention of pulling any moves. I really like R and B; not pop R and B. Canada brings poutine, and candied maple.My opinion is countries should be clubs that you "join" almost, and anybody can join. Race/cultural heritage should be irrelevant, to me it creates more segregation. Obviously you can add to your new country with your old customs, which is great, but people should embrace the country they live in.

I only say this because Canada is like 10% Italian, and virtually everyone of them identifies as Italian, and will openly blast Canada; even if they're 3rd generation... it's kind of annoying, please move back home if you hate Canada so much. Ya that sucks, not every country is like this, Canada you just have to basically be here for a winter and you are Canadian.

It seems countries with a longer history; Canada has a long history but it goes back with natives so thats a whole nother issue.

but here you can be "Canadian" relatively easily, so I don't know why people don't take the opportunity, people are literally ashamed of Canada because it is seen as a "dopey and lame" country, well I'm proud to be dopey and lame.Ya wasn't being a dick saying I would if everyone was ripped, just saying would you been turned on if you were allowed to change at curves???

Haha, :D obviously we aren't attracted to every guy, and I can see enough "dick" if I wanted to on my own without having to creep a locker room.

I will tell you this, just to be fair, there is a lot of "locker room" fetish within the gay community, a lot of porn revolves around it, it just doesn't do it for me, I've played organized sports my whole life, they smell really bad and are full of bacteria not my cup of tea.  I think the fetish developed out of guys that have never played sports and don't realize how disgusting they are, they smell like piss. 

I'll also admit I don't mind seeing guys at the beach or at a pool, but I'm not really creeping, much in the same way if a girl with a nice body in a bikini walked by, you would "looK", it's not really creepy, just admiring something that looks nice. Honestly does anybody have tribal music like this, or no any, with the downtempo but chanting in the background?https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=2fzNBVn0bKY

I get weird after I orgasm, completely turned off, and just want to zone out. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=lAcO0SSGVHE&amp;list=PLwnZVWlybns1_rULc36O2KlJXx9qoBd33

Darker playlist I made, kind of perfect for Hallowe'en, everything has a creepy vibe.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PxFaJqxT19Q&amp;list=PLwnZVWlybns1b70y6A-ITnrEXqLLiuVJZ

Specifically a Fall playlist. Tried my best to sum up the feeling, it's all songs people won't recognize though, good to open up to new sounds though.Been using reddit for 2 years, it's always had a hivemind, that's the way humans are.

I don't let it censor what I say, I actually enjoy getting downvoted, it means people bothered to read what I wrote, if they don't agree with it who cares.

I actually never downvote, I upvote every response people make to me, even if they continue to downvote me in our discussion.

I'm open to other peoples opinions, not everybody is though. That's just HUMANITY, not reddit.oh god is this normal grindr conversation?When I was younger, hockey, baseball, soccer, golf, badminton, tennis and lacrosse.

Now it's jut tennis and hockey, I wanted to join a soccer league this summer but I was too lazy, and I played baseball for a couple games then stopped going; a bit too homophobic. 

I used to snowboard but it's too expensive.

too, tooo, toooo tooo too too[TR\u2206NSITIONS - SOULUL\u2206R VIBR\u2206TIONS](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=roA7rAfr4lg) &lt;-- only Indian inspired; Sitar.

[Fakear - Darjeeling](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dk8FwKI1nA4) &lt;-- again only Indian inspired.

[Oriental Job - Gramatik](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZEdmbZkJNP0) &lt;-- Indian inspired. 

I don't know many actual Indian musicians. Besides traditional music.[Darjeeling - Fakear](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dk8FwKI1nA4)

because it was the answer to a question I answered 2 minutes ago.[Penthouse Penthouse](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=iw2nPjlc29Y)

[Shipwreck](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=aoUKVI6Qcvw)

[Koi](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=SMu9dGm2bE0)

[Funwari-chan](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8T6HGgIsjQc)

[Madijuwon](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=nvfpFrnqQos)

[Kidkanevil](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=YkdCHN4c_CQ)

[m ai t r o](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=WzxGPit_8UQ)

[Yppah](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xTJhs6ua3Bk)

they're along similar lines.Maybe he was addicted, or using something too which is why he was running drugs, my buddy used to do the same and he was abusing the crap out of the stuff, the only reason he was doing it was to get more drugs. 

I don't agree with the moral implications of selling hard drugs like meth and cocaine, it's just really immoral to sell that stuff even if it was in your past, it's pretty dangerous/addictive/destructive stuff. Maybe he didn't realize that, but to me it's a sign that he sort of doesn't care about other people, even if it was in the past.

I used to sell "weed" and even then I felt guilty because I didn't want anybody to get high and drive then crash. There are moral implications to drug dealing that you have to get past, you need to either not care about the fact your are harming other people, or be too stupid to realize what you are doing.

Hopefully he was just too stupid, but I personally don't agree with anybody that does something that bad, meth and cocaine actually kill.  This won't be a popular opinion, but as someone who has been "there", I know the type of people that do this stuff and they're generally not good people.

But people can change. Hey, same shit happens to me, I made him show me everything on his phone, found out he was doing same shit on facebook and I was pretty pissed.

He also has photos on his phone of himself that are provocative and make no sense for him to have. 

His phone also has a lock on it.

I am still very suspicious of him and let him know that if I catch him talking to guys again we are done, and if he gives me an STI he's going to get his ass kicked.

Cheaters are liars, so don't expect them to be honest with you, what he is doing is suspicious and the fact he gets angry about it makes him more suspicious, my SO didn't get mad he was "nervous" and happy to show me everything. 

Just be careful, a lot of people are gonna say you are being paranoid, but there is no reason to want things to be so private, what could he possibly have to hide from you that isn't worth letting you know about? 

Some things should be kept private yes, but anything on a cellphone/computer shouldn't need to be "private", what could you possibly be doing that you wouldn't want other people to know? 

Internet and cellphone activity are two things that really shouldn't involve anything that you wouldn't want your SO to know, unless you are taking pictures of your crap, there really shouldn't be a reason to hide things.... I never understood the " I want privacy" line, there is nothing that should be private on your phone.

Could someone give me an example of something that they have on their phone that is "personal" enough you wouldn't want your SO to know about it? I thought your SO is supposed to be an extension of you, so knowing their personal things even if embarrassing is a bit crucial.

Just don't understand the mentality of wanting to hide things. Whoever I date has access to everything I own, the most embarrassing thing on my phone/computer is porn.... sooooo embarrasssinggg. try out Yppah if you like them, or Tycho(you most likely already know them though)tred crack rap welcome to the pap papppp!Stuffed bell peppers so good, but if you put enough porc in it it can become unhealthy and cheese, it's so fucking good though mmmmm. I almost don't consider them healthy because they're so tasty, it doesn't make sense. 

OP try it, it's almost like a cabbage roll without the sauce. Whoever uses the term "boyfriend material" isn't worth your time, what is this fucking 1990's California Valley Highschool?

Yer like so not boyfriend material, I don't want no scrubs.  Fuuuuaaaaacccckkkkk offffHaha, stuffed peppers is a dish from my "heritage"(Bosnia, Macedonia, Greece and Serbia), my family makes it all the time, we go overboard with the cheese and pork; just realized I spelled it the French way earlier thanks bilingual labels Canada. 

We never put beans it in it though, usually just rice, paprika, cheese and sausage, sometimes topped with feta. Haha ya, OP should look up Balkan food, its all relatively healthy; minus the cheese and smoked meats, and is really tasty.

Beans is a really good alternative to meat, much healthier too, so that is a good suggestion, I feel it would give it a mexican flavour, Balkan people eat a lot of beans but they usually eat them in tomato sauce and they're prepared in a completely different way that makes them taste a bit strange; at least to me I don't like the bean dishes.

But they're really good for you and are tasty.

For ours though, it's about 1/3 meat, 1/3 rice 1/3 cheese, haha so not the healthiest. Throw a shit ton of feta on top and you have cardiac arrest in a "healthy" looking dish. Can someone tell me why they wouldn't want their SO to know their passcode to their phone.

I brought this up with my boyfriend, he gave it to me, I forget it, never look on his phone, but the fact he gave it to me let me trust him.

I asked him to explain why he had a lock on it, I want actual reasons that make sense for me to trust people.

He said that it's because he has a lot of personal information on his phone; banking apps....etc, and doesn't want to loose it and worry about someone gaining access. He has a decent amount of money in his bank account so it made sense, I'm poor as fuck so I never feel the need to protect my banking information, if someone wants to pay my debt for me go ahead.

But ya, that is a reason why some people lock their phone, they also may have selfies/pictures they just don't want others to see, that are relatively harmless. I mean the idea of a stranger seeing some of the photos I send to my boyfriend makes me cringe, and them reading my text messages so it makes sense.

I'd just try to use his phone in front of him; leave yours somehwere, and ask him what the new passcode is in a non-accusatory and casual way.

"Shit I don't have my phone I need to check my bank account to see if transfer went through", pick it up " Oh whats your passcode?".

If he doesn't want to give it to you ask him why.They're not gonna hire you at Starbucks, try McDonalds. Nice v-neck and chin strap, it nice of you to let people know you are a douche so they can avoid you. You're Nefertiti necklace isn't reflecting enough blinding light into my eyes.I didn't know Michael Angelo was alive and painting peoples faces.Just get your skoal and beer and enjoy your day off work. Thanks for making sure the picture is blurry.So I should lie? Sometimes giving another perspective can help her understand.

I never told her to hate her father, or that he was a horrible person, just a major fuck up/ selfish thing to do. I'm sure her Dad was incredibly confused, but sometimes you need to look at it from another perspective.

She didn't explicitly say her Brother was a homophobe, he may think he was being deceitful and is really confused about it all/ hurt, I would be a little upset if I found out my Dad was gay.&gt;I should know to not have sex this often

No, there is nothing wrong with what you did, it's how you did it. Obviously protection is key, and now you know to use it in the future.

There is no shame in wanting to have sex. What makes you think he wants to give you one?murcaDerrrprprprprprprprpYa, and I said give him time, he is young, 17, most likely has homophobic friends, most likely is upset about the deceit, so maybe just talk it out with him and fully hear his side of the story, don't even argue with him, just try and hear him out.

I don't think he should write him off, or you should, or your mom, and that they should support him, I was just saying their is a solid reason to be upset, I experienced this twice, with four different cousins, they all took it differently, all of them but one came around.

Of course they had happy times, and were a family, it just was never going to last, and was set up for failure which is what's wrong with the situation, it can be seen as deceitful because he wasn't being honest about the reasons for marriage; depending on if he knew he was gay or not.

He got a family out of it, and kids, your Mom is obviously happy to have you guys, he is obviously happy to have your guys.

But in the end, your Brother has a reason to be upset, so all you can do is hear him out, and wait for him to mature a bit, 17 year old males can be extremely homophobic, I was 17 only 7 years ago, so I'm sure things haven't changed tooo much since I was a teenager.

I can remember virtually every male was a tad homophobic, some where accepting, but I could see their opinion being different when it comes to a family member, especially a parent. That would really hurt.

Have you talked to your Brother about why? Does he just give you non-specific reasons like you said "that's gross"....etc, is there any way you can get him to be more explicit in why he has a problem with it?Alright well I guess I deserved it. I didn't realize I was such a shitty persobj'espere que tu avais appr\u00e9ci\u00e9 ton sandwichI did, I just never responded to people who sent me dick pics/ ass pics without soliciting them, haha, so I never go this deep into the rabbit hole, and am glad I didn't, that is way too quick to decide to hook up in my opinion.R.Mullen, and Good Like That are my favourites but there's plenty of others.

Yppah has more of a traditional instrumental sound and is a lot more experimental than Tycho, but he's pretty acceptable to most peoples ears, virtually everything he makesHey nice song, though it can be classified as trip hop I think it'd do better in /r/chillhop or /r/chillmusic because it is more reminiscent of actual hiphop.

I've found certain songs don't do well on /r/triphop if they aren't "dark" enough, if that makes any sense.haha no I meant electronic music that samples it.

Like

[Bayaka - Edamame](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=slYrJNMXBKU)

[Axel Thesloff - Bad Karma](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=knfrxj0T5NY)

[Rone - Bye Bye Macadam](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kfoJUeyMsOE)

[Cusp - Jespy](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fo1e1HQC9BU)

[Superpoze - Iceland Sound](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=rTz26pKS4A8)

[Jazz Cartier](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=i2t3cj3SE78)

[BNJMN x Krs. x Dutchboy](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8v8JNaX7J6M)

[Hi-Rez](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=771FbVwRmSs)

[Nae Sano](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ea7VaRU275s)

[Lox Chatterbox](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=a1B7--OQHxI)

[Lyrics Born](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dbPxZQBuSIk) &lt;- pretty fast

[Sunspot Jonz](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ChINckcDDvY) is melodic and fast

[Eyedea](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=jAWrscplyOA) &lt;-- literally one of the fastest rappers I know, he is dead now though.

[Dark Time Sunshine](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=0_rnDXq9XOU) &lt;-- fast, good story telling, not all of them are melodic, but this song fit the ball.  It's mainly Swamburger that does it. 

[J Live](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=XEx2T1NLsqw) &lt;-- good story telling, melodic, and relatively fast

[Asheru](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tUpAnhFGM_M) &lt;-- relatively fast, melodic

[Talib Kweli](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=7xk0eGIU0Ys) &lt;- melodic, not super fast, this song is with Asheru.

Not really exactly what you were looking for but you may like. 

[Aesop Rock](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZEBGCOCxLgA)

[Cyne](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tD04ynxNGUY) &lt;-- song I provided talks about a crack deal, but it's referring to black association with drug dealing, and isn't about drug culture, but black American culture. 

[J Live](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=K0i241-2_NE)

[Binary Star](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=__Z4jDgOFTA)

[Little Brother](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=4l0-AMHiCHs) &lt;- honestly Chitlin Circuit and the Minstrel Show are both amazing albums, have nothing to do with drugs, or drug culture. I recommend those albums to anyone, even if they don't like hiphop. 

Virtually all the artists I listen to; minus the odd one, stay out of talking about drugs, and if they do it's mainly pot. I live at home, we just have lots of outdoor sex, thank god I live in the country, and there is a trail in my backyard that goes on for about 2 kilometres that is crown land(government).

Having sex at home with a full house; my brother his girlfriend, my sister , her boyfriend, her two kids, and both my parents, makes it pretty hard to even think about doing it at home. 

People who think living at home with their parents is going to ruin their sex life really need to start looking at the world in a different light. I personally don't think I'd get a long with someone who had a problem with it, they most likely would think they're cool, when they're really not. Anyone that is worried about "lameness" is lame themselves.

Nothing to be ashamed of, life is life, when you're dead nobody is gonna care where you lived or who you fucked, you're just gonna be a rotting corpse being eaten by worms, or a pile of ashes in a tin can, at least you'll look really good then too. God BlessI have a boyfriend haha so maybe that's why, he likes me enough to put up with my crap.

I had two FWB's earlier on in the year, and they were both country boys, so we naturally liked going out into random places, corn field wasn't one of them though haha, that is a good idea though.

We actually boned once on a Maple Syrup farm in the late winter, while they were harvesting, against a pine tree, with cross country skiers skiing by; we were blocked completely I really am not into people watching it actually weirded me out. Haha, can't get more Canadian than that, and we actually both got so cold we didn't finish and just went to Tim Hortons to eat.

Doing it outside is fun if you aren't going to be caught, it feels natural almost.

You'll stick it in soon enough buddy, just enjoy your life as is, and plan for times when your house is empty, or find somebody that doesn't mind going out into the wilderness. I'm really glad my boyfriend is outdoorsy like me, we already spend most of our time outside anyway. &gt;Y'all need Ativan and/or Zyprexa

I doubt there is a connection between GA and being gay. Anxiety in gay men is a result of the environment and pills wouldn't be the greatest fix to the problem.

They need therapy; me too.

Stop pretending like being gay is easy for everyone, because it's not. The anxiety is pretty warranted in my opinion, I personally don't get it anymore, but I had it pretty bad.

Therapy really did the trick. &gt;Just got out of a serious relationship

Ya, nothing will turn you off more than that if you are self confident enough. Glad you can be ok with being alone for a while, I really have trouble with it, but I enjoy my time by myself when I get it.

It's nice to not really have to care about another person for a little while and kind of be selfish towards yourself. Relationships aren't hard work in my opinion, but they're draining at times. [What do you mean?](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hKxCDwCEgao)me

and it's because you are a chicken [a koo koo ka cha, a koo koo ka cha, cha chi cha chi cha chi, craaa, craaa, craaa](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1TphEh0Qgv0)Glad my buddy has fucked up dreams too, haven't creeped you in a while decided to do so.

OP dreams like that are normal, and maybe this is the first time you remember it, people often don't remember their dreams.

I die in almost all of them, and have vivid feelings, that wake me up rather quickly, so I always remember them; they say that's the best way to remember your dream is to be woken up in middle of it if you naturally wake up you won't remember much.

You most likely have had dreams like this and don't realize it.

I had a dream my brother died once, went to the funeral, when I woke up, the dream was so intense, I had a brief 10 seconds were I thought he had been dead for a couple of months, it was a really surreal and scary feeling. 

Really nothing to be worried about. 

Vivid dreams are kind of cool. No problem, I'm just gonna keep my mouth shut on that topic from now oni peel mangoes and eat them like an apple.I'd just try Ebay, it has everything, even the t'ird. two sodasMaybe he's just a short texter in general, lots of guys are. I'd drink it, but it's against my vice principlesI am honestly gonna try this, then I can give the kids my homemade fuck offs. only user to consistently have a controversial symbol next to their comments, somebody is stalking your posts and downvoting everything, it's kind of ridiculous that even I notice it.

Leave john2nhoj alone *howls*Going through the same thing, best thing you can do is just talk to him about it and see how he feels about it all. He can offer some insight for sure into how he became this way, and I doubt that he didn't feel the same way you did at some point.

My boyfriend told me that I'm homophobic and care too much about what other people think yesterday. He noticed that I don't do anything in public with him, I take away his hand from mine when we drive by cars, and supposedly I always am bashing other gay people; don't even notice it myself. Not saying you are, but you may be a bit homophobic still, I know I am, I catch myself bashing gay people on this subreddit sometimes. Just did it 10 minutes ago. 

He's had a lot to say that has made me rethink my behaviour.

He's also from Alabama, and I'm from Ontario; gay marriage has been legal here for over 10 years. So if anybody has a reason to be closeted like you and me are it's him, yet he isn't.

There is just a moment; at least he told me, where you sort of have an epiphany or brain fart and you realize how stupid you are being.

Yet to happen with me.

You'll get there eventually, it just takes a while. I know that people that think like you usually still see homosexuality as "lesser", so that is something you should focus on too. Honestly, you'll find it difficult to want to continue if he shows a sign of you hurting him, so just take it extremely slow at the beginning.

I'm a top, and always go unbelievably slow/ use lots of lube. 

It really does depend on the bottom though, some can handle pain more, some don't mind you taking over and doing what you want, some like it gentle....etc.

So best thing to do is just be really vocal about everything as you are doing it, there is no harm in asking if something feels good/ bad, if they want a certain position....etc.

I normally just go for what I want and ask for approval as I'm doing it and change what I'm doing accordingly, and it doesn't really cause problems. 

I prefer them on their knees; doggy style, because it just is so much easier for me, but I notice a lot of guys want to be on their back for some reason, you have to life their legs up over your arms to get good access. 

Proper access is key to both of you enjoying it, nothing worse than a bottom who is trying to get you to get them from a weird access point. Porno positions aren't always the best, some of them are good though, like one leg on floor other on something a little higher up; like the bed.

Sounds bad, but if a bottom goes into a really "slutty" or "I want it" position it makes everything so much easier, missionary position is annoying as fuck. It's because it was easy to use it as ammo against eachother, I really don't think they "truly" cared about it.

But yes, someone should have said shutup already. 

Show your face for a couple seconds to verify your identity to a female officer and that's about it, issue solved. Yes I realized I derailed everything... forgive me for I am high.

Also agree that dreams have relevancy, but sometimes they're relevant in strange ways.

I used to play COD all the time, right before bed, and I often had dreams where I was basically living a game of Free for All COD in real life, people I know would die in these dreams, and so would I, but it was related to the COD.

OP possibly could have seen a movie, watched something, heard something, read something the day before the dream that actually related to the context, and their brain created the scenario.

But yes, sometimes they are warning you of things, say if you are stressed out about something, or procrastinating, you may have dreams about the repercussions of what you are fearing/avoiding happening. 

My Brothers death dream actually coincided with my Grandpa's funeral, and he had been having major anxiety attacks that had to do with him thinking he was going to die at the time too, so it sort of made sense I had a dream he died, I attended his funeral....etc.


One weird thing that people think is True, is having a dream about your teeth falling out, may signal you are worried about what other people think about you physically, and it's actually quiet a common dream, and quiet a common worry people have.

Wish there was more research on it./u/NetRockyAZ7688 and women... a koo koo ka chaWhat did you just say?No I know, my point was, it was already ok, issue solved already I should have said.

The whole argument of whether they should be allowed is obviously ridiculous if it is in their religion, verification of ID was ever the only issue and it got solved before. 

Thanks though, haha, I guess I should have been more specific, and can see how that can be read as I think the issue was identity purposes. But that's basically the only "logical" issue with it, and it's already solved. is Belgo from Belgium?

And congrats, I'm sure the Queen shed a tear when she heard you're allegiance being pledged!Vice has other problems, namely hiring too many hipsters. As much as I want to vote NDP, I honestly am so "unsure" of them, that I don't think I can, so this seems pretty True.

A lot of people like the idea, but don't want to take the chance. There is the Caledon Trailway around Belfountain.

You can take your dog to the actual park there but it's honestly not that big, and I think it has to be on a leash, I rarely see dogs there.

The Caledon Trailway is the best place to take dogs. 

Honestly anywhere in Caledon is good, Belfountain doesn't strike me as particularly more appealing than any other part.  Cheltenham, Caledon Village, Caledon East, Palgrave, Terra Cotta,Cataract, Mono, are all nice and have a lot to offer too.

I live near Palgrave and the trails here are pretty nice, and Albion Hills Conservation area has a lot to offer.(All of these towns mentioned are in Caledon; including Belfountain) The Caledon Trailway is part of the trans-Canada trail, it's an old railway line that got discontinued, and is dog friendly, and offers a lot of views with side trails that diverge.

The awesome thing about it is it has access points all over Caledon, literally all over, I suggest the North part near highway 9 if you can get a map of it, and go towards Tottenham, there are really really unbelievable views from there and it's kept on the hush hush.

You can access it just south of Highway 9 on Mount Hope, Mount Pleasant, Mount Wolfe, Airport Road...etc, basically any North-South road that goes through Caledon, and you can park on the side too.

If you go to Mount Wolfe, Mount Hope, or Mount Pleasant, you head North towards Tottenham, and you have some pretty spectacular views. [This](http://cdn.where.ca/wp-content/uploads/2013/09/Fall-Colours-Toronto.jpg) is literally one of the views near Mount Pleasant.

Then... go to Mount Wolfe, or Mount Pleasant and just drive south for about 2 minutes you will get a view of Toronto and the GTA that looks like [this](https://s-media-cache-ak0.pinimg.com/736x/65/42/75/654275952b25eb7462a2929a0d2e9d15.jpg) that is taken from the top of Mount Wolfe road, not lying, it is worth the visit. I live 2 minutes from there, and go there on days were there are fireworks because you can honestly see fireworks going off in Toronto, Brampton, Vaughan, Markham, Mississauga all at once.

Tomorrow I am going to go and take some pictures of the fall colours from there and I'll try and post it, it really is wroth the visit, and virtually nobody knows about it.Last suggestion is going to the Caledon/Cheltenham Badlands just west of Inglewood(which is at Olde Base Line and Highway 10) it's about fifteen minutes from that area I was suggestion, [this](http://headwatersarts.com/wp-content/uploads/2014/07/caledon.jpg) is what it looks like, they recently closed walking on it to the public, but you can still go and view it.

Haha I'm done tooting my Caledon horn now. I rarely get to brag about my town, it's a rural and really quiet for the most part so there isn't much to brag, but it is beautiful. I have been trying to explain this to my SO from the U.S south, he keeps on asking what the winter/ fall/spring are going to be like, and I'm like "I don't know", I don't know what the summer is going to be like. I don't know anything, it may be hot, it may be cold, it may be wet, it may be dry, it may be sunny, it may be cloudy. 

Ontario literally has the least predictable weather in terms of warmth/cold. We get pretty stable rain/ cloud cover, that is predictable; but droughts/ floods happen too.

We honestly get all the freaking weather related events you could think of, tornadoes, blizzards, heavy thunder storms, droughts, wildfires, even earthquakes; not weather events, the only thing we don't get is hurricanes, but even those have hit us as tropical storms and don'e major damage.

Then in the winter we somestimes get arctic weather conditions.

This province is schizophrenic.

Wasn't it pretty hot out like 2 weeks ago, now they're saying it may even snow in Barrie this week. &gt;I love small/rural towns just because of the nature

Caledon is nice, but don't underestimate the city, life there is more convienent. I will list some shitty things about Caledon.

- No public transport, your car breaks, you are shit out of luck.

- I feel like I spend my entire life racking leaves, picking up twigs, chopping wood just to help maintain the area; we live in the woods.

- Sideroads are fucked in the winter, so you need to really plan your commute to work if it's going to snow. Sometimes you honestly can't make it out.

- The power goes out all the time because of all the trees, tiny wind storm... power goes out, perfectly calm out... power goes out. I'm being serious, it happens at least once a month where I live an often last over 6 hours. A lot of people have generators here.

- I hear coyotes killing animals very often, hearing nature is cool, and them calling is cool, but listening to them rip apart a neighbourhood cat/dog; it happens/racoon/fox really is an experience that is unsettling. I have countless audio on my phone of them hunting from this summer, I couldn't sleep some nights it was happening on my lawn.

- You really do have to watch for wildlife on the roads, deer do randomly pop up and have caused accidents that have actually hurt people I know. My friend totaled his new car because he reacted the wrong way when one popped up..

- Caledon is the worst place for mosquitos, there are countless pounds/mini lakes/stagnant bogs/marshes that make them the perfect breeding ground. My SO from Alabama thinks this place is messed up and he lived on the bajou where mosquitos are 5 x the size.

- Everyone speeds like a mad man on the sideroads which actually make them partially dangerous

- There is no crime so police are there to harass the general public basically. I go through ride programs all the time, though I don't drink and drive and agree with them, it's kind of annoying to be stopped at 3 p.m on a Tuesday.

- 4th highest property tax in the country

- Did I mention how inconvienent it is, you usually can't just walk to a bar, store, get groceries, everything closes early, my local bar /restaurant isn't open on Mon-Wed . Many stores/ restaurants have weird hours. It's like 30 years ago in some places.



Also that is awesome you got to see the Badlands earlier, and I've actually never been there as late as November, I usually just take friends/family not from the area in the summer, it must have been nice then.

A lot of people seem to use it as a filming location, and wedding photos used to be quiet popular there. I can remember when it was barely known and basically only locals ever went there, now you can't go without it being jam packed. I'm voting Conservative. 

I know, I'm evil.

Green party hits home the hardest with me, but I'm a hypocrite. Your quotes are making me think you are mocking me, but maybe I'm just being a "paro" "high" "dumbass" haha.

What do you think the warning of concern is? Just like a general warning that could be applied to anything?or actual health problems?

I don't "get" much, I'm an idiot. Everything I say is crackpot theories. I'll watch that doc, I've already seen it but don't remember it and I think you know why. Doritos and sodeey pop. Haha

BBC makes some quality craperoo. I've watched a lot of dream documentaries but it's usually just pseudo science and even my dumbass can smell bullshit, since this is BBC I'll give it more credit. 

What does your username mean? I always forget to ask. 
&gt;Would you bother to tell them that not even Helen Keller would think they're straight?

You're the best doe.


---------------Me and my boyfriend do this to extremely bad levels, to the point we had a talk were we decided we have to start saying actual nice things to eachother because we started to believe the insults.

It was fun at first, but he is a carbon copy of me personality wise, so by the end of it we were saying some pretty nasty stuff.

It is lots of fun if you are the type of person that likes being insulted, which I actually do. Oh shit sorry to scare you.

Coyotes are nocturnal hunters, they only come out at night, and they rarely approach humans. It's loose dogs that get targeted and at night, you will be 100% safe on trails and won't see/hear one. 

Haha, wow that pig farm story sounds like a nightmare, we get the smell of manure, but that's about it, there are slaughterhouses but nothing on the scale you mentioned, that is actually pretty freaking gross haha, I couldn't imagine the smell of that.

It isn't bad, I was just trying to say what makes country living bad, there are bad things about the city too. Too much traffic, lack of parking, crime, light pollution, constant noise.....etc.

Where did you live before? it sounds like you were in the states. Also it sounds like you would like to live in Caledon, if you are used to power outages....etc they're not a big deal. I mean once a month isn't horrendous, it's just annoying when a storm is coming and you know that you may not have power that night. I'm a weirdo that doesn't like people looking at me during sex, I get self conscious about sweat and other crap... I know stupid, I'm sleeping with somebody and think they don't want to look at me.

I usually go by their vocals for speed/pressure.

Missionary for me is just annoying because access can be harder/ I don't want them to look at me haha... I'm fucking weird. Haha ok, will do :)Thanks for mocking me dickface haha . I'm super paranoid sometimes of people judging me, do not judge me. I knew you were too nice to be a bumbaclot. 

For some reason I thought nuxfuggin was fuxnuggin reversed, but I have no idea what fuxnuggin is and that was the next question to be asked.

It does sound funny, derp. day-o, me say day-oits lonely at the toppppp oooooooooohhhhhhhhhhhI actually never went to bed and am seriously considering just staying up till tomorrow as I have no work today.That I'm not the one grabbing their assbest description so far, I think people took this as a troll question, I legit was wondering what people's interpretation of that life would be like.

You sort of go by feel the most; like tactile, and maybe even recognize the feeling of things so much so that that becomes "your world", steps on a staircase, you may remember how each individual step feels and know when you are about to hit the bottom. &gt;  one of her students had greeted her with a hug in the morning and cracked a joke about the clothing my mother was wearing.

So she cracked a joke based on the feeling? That's really interesting.

&gt;The teachers would take the kids to a local park and the kids could find their way back to school by touch alone. They would could foot steps and their mental map included the shape of the foot part, smells, and the feeling of air movement, etc.

This is all awesome, I should have rephrased this to include all deaf and blind people; I thought it was rarer. 

Thanks so much, that was a great responseI know in Canada the 60's and 70's sort of became the start of the Quebec separatist movement being taken seriously.

A lot of the same stereotypes as the U.S since we are very similar culture. We didn't have the civil rights movement though so all that isn't in the stereotypes.

There also was a huge anti-US movement sort of in the 60's just like there was in the US itself, draft dodgers fleeing to Canada...etc.

Pierre Trudeau was an icon during the 70's I believe; he was our Prime Minister, and is associated with that era; because of the FLQ.

Canada basically had Quebec separatists bomb places, commit arson and kidnap Government officials during the 70s, and Trudeau was in charge during the crisis, so that decade is sort of associated with political instability in Canada's past. Present themfunniest thing is that episode made me uncomfortable as a kid because I sort of knew I was gay too and it kind of annoyed me. musicJerking off sometimes is just a thing you have to do, some people just get horny/ aroused and need to get rid of that feeling so they jerk off... I do it all the time, I'd hardly consider it going behind my partners back, I just don't expect him to be my jack off machine when I need to get to bed and have a boner. everyone loves wall, I bought a wall trimmer and it's horrible... but it could just be the model/ specific one I got that had problems.

Literally everyone else says Wahl is great so it must be, I wish I didn't get a lemon doe.I have no idea what that is? A gay show? Or just a show that touched on it?That's awesome, my best friend is from Romania; he lives in Caledon(Bolton).

Honestly, Barrie is actually pretty beautiful and there is a lot to do there for outdoors and plenty of places nearby.

Caledon sort of has the best "forest" trails that I've been on in Southern Ontario, but Barrie overall just for the outdoors is a bit superior even if it is a city, they have the lake, and plenty of close by spots.

Caledon unfortunately is on it's way to becoming just a part of the concrete mess that is the GTA, the south end that touches Brampton already is developed on the Brampton side and it's only a matter time before it starts heading North. 

No problem, hope you have fun and aren't disappointed!

pretty accurate actuallyYes everyone knows that Harper is secretly French and working for the underground FLQ movement, I mean the Niqab debate alongside with the PQ's proposed banning of religious clothes for public servant workers... I mean durrrrrr they're both god damn terroristssss! Go back to your countrryyy, I cannn'ttt underrrstaannnddd youuuuu!!!!

VIVA EL QUEBEC LIBRA!

DAS ICH BIN HARPER EIN UNT FUHRER!!Can confirm said skidmark, I do his laundry.How could you not listen to [her](http://cdn.makeagif.com/media/8-15-2015/CL4xYt.gif) she's so majestic. Isn't there a name for those types of stories in German literature?

I remember I read the book Siddartha by Herman Hesse when I was a kid and had to do a project on a certain type of writing style, and for some strange reason I chose this German coming of age story writing style that has a name for the genre : Bildungsroman...

haha was that what the movie was?Haha maybe he can get a doubled ended one and him and the Oil sands can have a party while wearing a niqab what a dewche bag

[Time for Change! Godda Re-Arrange!](https://youtu.be/VS2vAhDy9v8?t=19)

Sha na-na-na-na na na Sha na na na naaa

I can't wait till we become the Canady Bunch Again!

Are you serious?Pretty similar

[Nine Inch Nails - Closer](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=zvIzL7LvTT8)

and this Korean band

[Yukari - Hang On](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fGWKJtQgQEQ)

post are also industrialish rock/electronic music

[Koi](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=SMu9dGm2bE0)

[Senpai](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=C94lR2QNNns)

[Yppah](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=L4nqLXg_SuI)

[La Fine Equipe; and basically everyone that makes it up especially Fakear](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=LjgWBqJG1yI)

[m A i t r o](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=WzxGPit_8UQ) &lt;-- get the name from that youtube link

[Onra](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=G7vYieITEHM)I like a lot of 30s/40s/50s sample triphop/chill hop

Like [L'Orange](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=qRs0MrfDhmw)

[JIM](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=UU0qs8jqUsQ)

[Brock Berrigan](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=d1ZeRy7rtOU)

[Birocratic](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Sw7NL10tu4c)

[Le Melodist](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=AfI2ExekxDY)

who may I like, I listen to basically all subgenres of electronic music besides heavy EDM. 
Pretty sure is assholeYa they're both pretty freaking ugly actually in my opinion, and sterile.

Almost like no effort went into them, the Coat of Arms with Red background for England,with Union Jack for UK, it kind of is over doing the "This is the British Empire"

I'd like to see something like the [Franco-Ontario flag](http://4.bp.blogspot.com/--ORfqxPUzWU/UmykdLXfhuI/AAAAAAAAEE0/2FFogE-JCcQ/s1600/Franco-Ontarian_flag.jpg), the trillium is a good symbol, or maybe even a [windswept eastern white pine silhouette](http://tidcf.nrcan.gc.ca/images_web/imfc/arbres/dessins/moyen/GR03_Pinus_str_silhouette.gif) in black with a red background; to keep ties to the roots of Canada it's not bad to give a nod to the culture that partially created the province.

Manitoba could be one of the first provinces to incorporate native symbols into their flag/ just general symbols of the province since they have a large native population and it'd be a good way to actually start incorporating them into the history. I know the territories do this, but they aren't provinces. Ontario could even do it. Those are both nice, I actually like Saskatchewans the best believe it or not, it's pretty original.

As for the Territories, if they were included I'd say Nunavut has the best flag in Canada. It's pretty simple.

Newfoundland and Labrador have a pretty awesome flag too.

All of them are nice minus Ontario and Manitoba, that's what you get for entering early province hood without much of an identity like the east coast had, at least Quebec had the decency to revamp a French symbol, and not just paste the French flag in the corner with the Quebec coat of arms in the centre.
pansexual means they don't mind who you identify as gender wise, so a bisexual only likes guys and girls that are born into those bodies, pansexuals are attracted to gender identities and not just assigned gender like bisexualsWhat do you want to be better about him? Is it just he doesn't take care of himself? Like hair, facial hair, body...etc?

Or is it something that is unchangeable; like facial structure? Is he actually unattractive or just not your type?

Why do you feel you could do better, do you think you are slightly embarrassed of him maybe? Possibly other peoples opinions are affecting your opinion?

When you first started dating were you ever attracted to him, or did you know you weren't but could "put" up with it sexually and can't anymore?

.... my opinion is sometimes peoples mannerisms/personality can be a turn off even if they are a great and loving person. Some people don't like clinginess, some people don't like people who are overly nice, some people don't like blurb blurb. So do you think maybe you were attracted to him but you are realizing his personality isn't what you are attracted to.

You can like somebody as a person, and think they're really nice/funny/great but not be attracted to their personality in that way, sometimes they just do things that are sexual turn offs. I know plenty of great people I wouldn't want to be in a relationship with that just aren't "my type" and it really affects how I see them physically, I put like a "sterile" label on them almost. Even if they're good looking. And sometimes it's just people who think they're superior and can't handle a joke, I was trolling :) Making a crackpot theory up from your comment and not even trying to give off negative vibes to you.

You find it stupid, I was just trying to make a joke, sometimes people can't see the humour. 

Article is on anti-Harper sensationalism and you said &gt; whipping up Quebec separatist sympathies in Quebec.

I decided to take a giant leap in connecting Harper to the FLQ and the PQ; I know stupid, and that they're both anti-Islam Quebec separatist extremists.

Then I decided to take the roll of a hill billy for some reason telling Harper and the PQ to go back to their country; which is what Liberals accuse Harper' of being.

I used moronic Spanish/French version of vive le quebec libre

and what I think sounds like German from what I've seen myself. To look like it's saying Harper is the Father; comparing him to Hitler. 

Calling you an asshole was out of line, but stop calling silly people stupid, we just don't take everything serious, and some of us make bad jokes. I'm joking wrong, sometimes their a hit or a miss, you can't learn to improve what appeals to general users of certain subreddits till you try.

Again, apologized for calling you an asshole, but I think some people may get what I was going for. I just am a fan of anti-humour, satire, and general stupidity. It's low brow at times. 

&gt; Deficit's are not a problem

I'm pretty sure they're a big problem, that could potentially affect all Canadians in the future... so they're not exactly something to mess with.

I have no idea Trudeau's exact plan, but I commend him for at least being honest about his plan. He is under the impression; could work or fail, that spending money can create money, and that in the long term the money spent that will put us into a larger deficit, will translate into enough to pay it back and grow the economy.

I have no idea what the logistics of this entail; where spending would be...etc, but you can't say they're not a problem, they have proven to be disastrous for many countries, Greece, Italy, and Japan is on the way. 

Not saying Trudeau is going to do Greek style infrastructure spending or provide too many social services, but debts have screwed over countries, there are other examples too. I was saying generally growing deficits just amplifies the problem. Most people don't know the intricate details of economics, environmental policy....etc, doesn't mean they can't have an opinion on them from basic understanding. 

No need to use harsh language, can you explain to me Trudeau's plan, because I've yet to hear anything cohesive besides basic filler. 

or just provide a link.

I'm also unaware of an example of where growing debt actually helped a country or jurisdiction. Stop assuming people don't know that, did you just recently learn this stuff and think because you didn't know it before other people must not?

That's all fucking basic understanding of the fucking world, not just economics, everyone knows all monetary entities pretty much borrow money/cut internal spending to spend more on and increase production.

I am saying Justin has said nothing that translates into what you are getting at, who knows what he is going to spend money on? Increase health care, Pensions, low interest rates? Who fucking knows, you don't know either.

Stop acting superior, I have no idea what your previous knowledge is, stop assuming you know random strangers on the internet .Alright buddy.. I'm backing out of this, I know I'm not talking to an intelligent person, I gave you enough time to prove you can articulate yourself in a non-aggressive way, but you clearly can't. 

You need to learn basic social skills.They're so coool!Caledon/Dufferin riding(half of which is in Peel) will be Conservative. It's always Conservative. Green actually the past two times has been the Runner up, I voted them last election.

It's weird the town has a Conservative base, but since it's really rural/natural here so there actually is a decent Green party support.

I think Liberals appeal too much to urban voters which is why they don't identify with rural areas all the time, but Harpers stance on the environment for sure has hindered their support in rural Canada. Is this self made, or an actual ad the Liberal Party put out there, because that is kind of sad if it is. &gt;and there's "pedestrian" ...

oh shit 1990ssssssssssssss up hereeeeeebobbbbbayyyHave you tried to look up "lesbians", or " Dad and son"

or anything with gender nouns into google image search? A lot of them are porn buddy, that's what the internet is here for, everything else is just a bonus. 

I mean /r/lesbians is a lesbian porn subreddit, the actual lesbian subreddit is called /r/actuallesbians . don't even think about itSorry but I can't stand it when recent immigrants/refugees talk about Canadian values..... it's sort of insulting to assume all it takes to understand our society Canadian is to be present on our land mass....

I mean I know our country is lacking a core culture/ values, but is our club really that fucking easy to get into?

"Hey I come from a country where we oppress women, homosexuals, kill eachother over religion and it's hot as fuck, I think I understand Canadians"

You can be CANADIAN relatively easily, but honestly, you don't understand Canada, it's a little more complicated than "not caring about your skin colour", yes that's great racism isn't accepted here, but I'm pretty sure these people come from racist societies to begin with so how the hell could they understand us?  It takes years of being here before you can start talking like you are an ambassador for our values.&gt;http://beta.merriam-webster.com/dictionary/culture

&gt;Simple Definition of culture

&gt;the beliefs, customs, arts, etc., of a particular society, group, place, or time
&gt;: a particular society that has its own beliefs, ways of life, art, etc.
&gt;: a way of thinking, behaving, or working that exists in a place or organization (such as a business)

I think it's arguable that values = culture. Also lucrative welfare isn't really a universal Canadian value, I think there are enough Canadians that think it is abused.

Yes we are a land of immigrants, but there are actual people who are "ethnically" Canadian, that is they've been here for generations and are a mix of English/French/Native.  I'm not included in this being a 1st generation, so no "racism" intended.

Also having so many Europeans in my family, and my Dad being from England, and Mom from Macedonian(but raised in France), I've even noticed me; someone born here, was raised a little differently than my 3rd/4th Canadian friends, just subtle little things that are a part of Canadian culture that my family doesn't 100% partake in. 

I don't even like LOTR and think this costume is awesome good jobYou know better than to post anything that challenges circlejerking anywhere on reddit. It isn't going to ever be taken positively.

Humans just aren't open minded.

Nobody will admit that "Yes" the reaction would be different, seen as a waste, and that the building is "fine".It's also discriminatory towards the dancing skills of people in white collar jobs as well as being stereotypical of blue collar workers.

Classism, bigotry... when will Canada be free of this?Yes /r/Canada where everyone thinks they're inclusive of all Canadians

EXCEPT

if you speak French or voted Conservative/ don't hate them and voted Liberal. 

How open minded. A lady got mauled not too long ago.

BBC Earth did a cool little feature on Churchill; including Hallowe'en and the Polar Bear Patrol, in their Human Planet serious in the Arctic episodes.  It's worth checking out how other cultures; with northern populations, live. Like Mongolia and Greenland. I understand your feelings, though they're not valid, I get it.

Don't know why people can't understand it.

It's hard when you get phased out by straight people in your life and know that some will judge you to not be judgmental of them yourself.

I think you need to have been hurt pretty bad to feel the way you do.Something tells me the NSA should be paying attention to these people tooI think it's more the long term effects that I am worried about before I start foraging.

I live in a pretty good spot to do, but the only things I eat are red currants and raspberries; because they're easy to identify.

These Sumac's are all over the place and I really wish there was an official green light on them because I would be making this drink right now.Holy shit was not expecting a response like that. Thanks a lot.

It wasn't a pity fest but you did make me feel better.

Was more wondering if this has happened to anyone else, knowing others deal with the same thing gives me a sadistic sense of relief; misery loves company. 

Moving is in the plans too.Clipping is amazing, I'm glad I came to reddit for suggestions.

Honestly love the speed and the beats.No way am I going to be a doctor.

My ex; who I've mentioned a million times because I was butthurt by him, is in Med School. That could be the confusion haha. I'm going to school for Environmental Tech, so the campus I'm going to is in the country as well; start in spring. 

And thanks, I like this subreddit for the most part even though I can be a douche.

And I wouldn't say that about my friends, they're just more conservative; live in the country where they grew up. It's just discouraging, they weren't horrible about being gay and were accepting they just sort of stopped messaging as much.

[This](http://i.imgur.com/bonFY0v.jpg?1) is a picture of the city from my town, so it's not like I'm completely isolated/ screwed. I am being a bit dramatic. I visit there often enough/ work there sometimes, but obviously not enough to make friends. 

Why are you so uppity? So many gay guys on this subreddit are so positive makes me feel like a downer haha.I'm less than a KM from where it was taken. I actually told a friend on reddit from Mississaga(a city south of me of 700,000) about my town and the trails through the woods....etc he can take. He told me he was an amateur photographer so I pointed out some spot he can go to, and loves it, he keeps going back and sending me photos

https://www.flickr.com/photos/134496569@N05/albums/72157660192865226

Thats the album he took of my town it was really impressive.

I'm about 60 km from downtown but it honestly takes over an hour usually because of traffic. You deserve it because you are really positive and it's awesomeThey don't miss the country that much; all my friends, so I know the city can keep you busy and pretty satisfied, and I think there is something about being close to a lot of people / life that makes people happy by default(not everyone but some people just like the noise/ liveliness of the city).

I like the country a bit better, because I like how calm it is; though it can get boring. 

Still favourite thing to do is off trail biking through the woods, fishing, climbing trees(plenty of gigantic trees to climb here that adults actually enjoy doing), we get to grow a lot of our own food, we make our own maple syrup, we cut down our own Christmas trees, get to pick tomatoes to make a ridiculous amount of sauce, fresh corn, fresh beef, there is a dairy farm with an awesome cheese store they make themselves, 

Basically the food is pretty fresh here in the summer and fall(not winter, but fresh maple syrup in spring).

There is only so much farming/ tree climbing / trail exploring you can do before you want to try something elseThe problem more is this.

You will identify with this.

In the country you make your friends and that's it, there is little opportunity for new friends after that, if your friends leave, you don't really have any other options.

In the city you are constantly meeting new people / have opportunities.
haha ok :0Really I'm gay and in a monogamous relationship and have only been in them.

Though I know nothing about gay people reallyYes twice, one was an ex best friend, the other was just a friend, I'd never fight a stranger; don't know if they'd charge me.

My boyfriend grew up in Alabama and has had his fair of fights.Have open body language; don't cross your arms, be afraid to look around or slouch.

Any interaction you have with people initially act a little bit more enthused than normal.

Source : I have been told by basically every friend / co-worker that I look pissed off a lot; even my boyfriend complains that when I'm sitting in the car I have this scowl on. I have really light sensitive eyes(i know sounds ridiculous but I do) so I squint a shit ton, fluorescent lights especially make me squint/ light headed. 

[This](http://www.inpapasbasement.com/wp-content/uploads/2014/04/robert-de-niro-scowl.jpg) is me in any kind of moderately bright lighting
&gt;(never seen someone born with a smile) to their lips.

Julia Roberts

Alanis Morrisette

Anyone that looks like Seabiscuit

For Canadians anyone notice [Amanda Lang](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=U79DoiC49r0) from CBC has a constant smirk on her face, I've seen her report on pretty dark stuff and she was smirkingI've said some pretty annoying stuff on /r/Canada and haven't been banned so I think the problem is what /u/furrot said and has to do with admin and possibly the users also trolling on other subreddits.

I don't think I've been censored once on here and I have so many downvotes on this subreddit I have an auto 9 minute time limit between my posts here(which is reddit's software doing that not the admin or mods). [Joule$](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=SnXzSfeTSSc) is pretty experimental. Really recommend him

[Shu Priest](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dHcuaLNJWYc) &lt;-- sort of experimental. Really recommend him.

[Ronny J](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=A0M2Km5gyPk) experimental and aggressive like Death Grips; completely different content though. They yell and scream. Ronny J literally sounds like the guy from DG but raps in a different style(the accent)

[Pouya](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MtA5r7D-TWo) &lt;-- experimental with an industrial sound; but a lot more typical hip hop sound. Completely different content from what you asked for though. Really recommend 
though.

[Lil Ugly Mane](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=t99r8JSdI7s)

[Jazz Cartier](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=i2t3cj3SE78) is experimental

[Savaga Mugen](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Oa6c5DbC9Og) &lt;-- don't know why I consider them related. Recommend anyway.The one shitty thing is it's actually hard for Canada to compete in any sector that isn't resource based because the U.S literally drains all of our other talent and is a huge competitor.

Not that the U.S deliberately does this, but it is impossible almost for anything to compete with the U.S unless it's something that is physically in the ground in our country that they don't have.

Food Industry, McDonalds, Wendys, Burger King, Subway....etc. Tim Hortons never stood a chance to fully compete against Dunkin Donuts, and none of our franchises like Harvey's or Swiss Chalet could ever break into the U.S market; it's way too big and saturated. They're all lucky enough they have huge followings in Canada, otherwise everything would just be American. 

Tech Industry - We have Blackberry, and Bombardier, pretty much everything else is in the U.S, every computer, the majority of our phones, music devices, t.vs everything are from foreign companies.

Clothing industry - doesn't even need to be mentioned

Hotel Industry - doesn't even need to be mentioned, it's all mainly American.

Just pick an industry that isn't natural resource based and we've already been beat out.

Canada is isolated on North America stuck beside only one country, the U.S which already is a major economic juggernaut.

We have Mexico; but they're further and trade is just starting to pick up, all other trade has to be done expensively through boats/planes.

We just can't compete, we were set up to be dominated by the US because they share the continent with us.

It's not like Europe, or Asia, or anywhere else where there are multiple countries for you to trade with relatively easily.

We have ours and its the U.S and they are 10x the population, nothing Canadian can compete with the U.S unless it's really exceptional.  We literally are another state when it comes to economics, most major companies set up in Canada as their "first" foreign endeavor, that means a lot of American companies see Canada as a place to do business in, which means very skilled very successful American business' are always trying to squash our companies; we can't even think about invading the U.S market for the most part. Ya he is a dick, he is a billionaire too, he is basically Canada's Donald Trump; but not racist.

He invented a reading system for kids; Leap Frog, or bought it or something, that's how he got rich, which is a pretty funny way for an asshole to get rich(educating children)k buddy, I have no idea what I'm talking about because it's tougher to break into Canadian markets. Companies still come to Canada because it's close and you can make money, they don't just say "oh that's not as much as we make at home fuck it".

Why do American companies still operate in Canada? Why are a lot of our clothes, electronics, movies, music, vehicles and food still coming from American companies?

American companies don't just stick to the U.S, they monopolize around the world, Canada is often the first country they break into because our markets are so similar.

They don't even make Canadian specific advertisements sometimes, they just play American made ads up here.

I honestly don't know what you are talking about. It's called the free market, we allow foreign companies to operate in Canada.

You think Molson is Canadian anymore, Tim Hortons? Hudson Bay company isn't Canadian anymore. 

What do we have left? Blackberry and Bombardier. 

All of our worthy companies are foreign owned, even the Beer Store in Ontario is partially foreign owned.

Nobody wants to invest in some shitty Canadian clothing company like Joe Fresh, or coffee company like Second Cup.

The majority of foreign investment in Canada is resource and real estate.

Tim Hortons is an anomaly. 

Walmart is a heavy competitor with most supermarkets and super stores.

Home Depot is a competitor with home improvement stores and Canadian tire to an extent.

Subway is way more popular than Mr.Sub.

Hilton, Holiday Inn....etc

I could just go on and on, every single little has a US counterpart.

Canada's Wonderland is owned by an American company; our largest theme park.

Waste Management... American.

There are very few industries in Canada that aren't U.S related/ foreign related. 

Why are all these companies operating here?

Our largest exports to the US are natural resource/energy based. Mostly everything else is just American companies profiting off Canada. Marriott is American........ there is just a Canadian subsidiary.. you think that GM of Canada is actually "Canadians"... the profits from Marriott Canada still end up profiting Marriott International which is HQed in the US.

Just because there is a Canadian headquarters doesn't mean it's not American.......

So 3/5 are American. Stop trying to make me look dumb.

I left out telecommunications and other industries that have Canadian laws protecting them, you know American phone companies aren't allowed to operate here right?

There are going to be random industries, but you are living in a dream land if you think Canada isn't owned by the U.S and highly dependent on the U.S.

It is hard for us to compete with them, yes we have successful at home business' but the majority of our companies will not be successful abroad like theirs are here.

There are a few examples but not all of them.

If you look at Canada's top companies they're either in an industry that is protected by Canadian law; banking, insurance,telecommunications, a foreign company operating under a Canadian branch, or are in the resource. Obviously the odd random one, but Canada doesn't have much to invest in besides resource and banking.

People aren't flooding money into our tech industries like they are in the U.S and Asia, and they aren't flooding much money into our manufacturing industries.

We are the worlds juggernaut of mining that is about it. Does this mean Syria/ Iraq/ Parts of North Africa are relatively empty?

Are the people who stayed just accepting ISIS?&gt;http://business.financialpost.com/entrepreneur/fp-startups/why-canada-is-failing-at-tech

You are living in a fantasy, I can't find a single list online that ranks Canada as a technology leader in the world.

We have a "growing" tech industry, but it's not important on the world stage.

Canadians don't realize how unimportant we are 

Named me 10 technology companies from Canada that are internationally known.

Blackberry and Bombardier are all I can think of.You can have a thousand crappy little companies that don't make as much as an international company combined.

The whole tech industry in Canada could be equivalent to Apple by itself, that's why.

Household names for technology is important in my opinion, unless you are just specializing in certain things.

There is a robotics company in my town that makes machinery that produce plastic products.

They aren't a household name, but do have a building in the U.S, Germany and Japan with their HQ in Canada, that is an example of a technology company not being a household name and being successful, so you are correct it isn't.

But they are few and far between in Canada, and I think the amount you have from your country is a good representation of the industry there.

It's hard to call Canada a "tech" country, when people aren't even aware of Canadian technology companies.

IMAX is a good example that became a household name.

Blackberry did, still doing alright in asia.

Bombardier isn't known everywhere but it's does decently.

That is it, I could name several technology companies from a lot of other countries.

The majority on your list are household names in Canada, I'm talking about internationally known. Blackberry was the only one that holds any weight. The rest are companies that just use technologies developed elsewhere and apply them here.

Telus and Rogers are irrelevant to the world.chickens can fly just not for extended periods of time.

Same with turkeys, I've seen them in trees before.

Source : I'm a hick/grew up in countryI thought your post was funny

I think it's misguided common sense that chickens can't fly when they can, they can go pretty high up too; like 15 feet. It's like a leap almost but they flutter and are slightly graceful.

I've never personally seen a turkey fly, but I have seen them like 40 feet up in a tree.... which is nuts.Let's all degrade rural folks because we all stupid a yuk yuk ka chuk.

Living in a rural area doesn't make you an idiot, or a bigot, there are plenty of them in the city.

Living in different societies/eras makes you a bigot.

Old people in general have racist attitudes because of the environments they grew up in, they're either scarred or brainwashed.

Plenty of old people in Western countries hate Germans. The Nazi's did a number on their PR.
I actively point out hot guys to my boyfriend, and he does to me. We get jealous of eachother sometimes but just make jokes about.

Sometimes he'll even check out a hot guy and then look at my in disapproval or disappointment; this is as a joke. Or I'll say " Id stick it in" about a guy, and say "but he'd have to be drunk first". Sort of throwing salt in the wound. 

We are douche bags, but we know it's as a joke.

Maybe your hands are hugeNot where I live. I didn't put words in your mouth, you conflated living in the country with being a bigot.

It's alright though, just letting you know you are a bigot yourself.If you get the job you can bring it up if they ask you to skip your lunch.

Your sister might just be an enthusiastic worker that is willingly breaking the rules. 

I've brought up labour laws at many different work places, they don't question you. Though I've never had one willingly break the rules I've just reminded my employers that it's been 5 hours and I'm taking a break... I don't ask I just tell. They never get upset and are pretty understanding about it so I wouldn't worry.

Obviously small business is going to let an employee willingly work harder, it doesn't mean they're forcing her and I doubt they are, again your sister is most likely just a really hard worker; you don't need to do the same. If they were producing their music in Ontario and investing the money made in Ontario then I would be proud

They are just Americans to me, the Weeknd doesn't even do Canadian media interviews, what a douche.

I'm sure Drake and Bieber send some money back to Ontario but the majority of it is being spent in the U.S, just more money/ talent flowing out of Canada and profiting the U.S(rightfully so), so it does absolutely nothing for me.

I'm proud of Ontario musicians like

[Kobo Town](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZthZSXe5v4k) &lt;produced in Ottawa

[Shad](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=q-mAMH5S6VA) &lt;-- way better rapper than Drake and Weeknd. Produced in Toronto by Ontario companies, filmed by Ontario cameramen, everything about it is Ontario.

[OBES\u00d8N](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=JXxCTxcwmc4) &lt;-- super creative, produced in Toronto

Than these guys, at least they kept their money in Ontario, same goes for Choclair, K-Os, Broken Social Scene, Saukrates, Dream Warriors......etc

All those artists are American produced, American profiting; I'm not anti US, I just don't take pride in that. Stay in Canada, be successful operating out of here and you really will impress me. Produced by American companies, profiting Americans, by Americans for Americans.

You think Drake, Weeknd,Bieber and Shawn Mendes aren't reinvesting that in the U.S.

Canadians have always been famous, we have always made it huge in the U.S, but that money stays there.

You think Canada profits off Mike Myers? Or anybody relatively famous.

I'd like to see any of those artists make it huge by producing their music in Canada.... it would be impossible.

The Guess Who are the only Canadian band to continue producing here and get international success, everyone else moved to the U.S.

EVEN GRETSKY TOOK HIS MONEY DOWN SOUTH.

The Weeknd doesn't even do Canadian news interviews, he pretty much ditched Canada altogether.

Bieber and Drake's music is just American music and they're performing it, they' don't right that stuff, I could name a hundred Canadian artists with more talent trying to make it in Canada, and they CAN'T. Drake is a joke.

Canada has had hiphop scene since the 1980's. 

Alright Canada I think we need to build a wall.

I honestly support granting him status. American immigrants/refugees can assimilate in a day basically. No I'm horny all the time

I prefer winter sex because it's less sweaty; don't like super sweaty humid muggy summer sex only because I hate having to shower after.I can remember parity, though the CPC did well during that times at managing Canada, a lot of it can be blamed on the U.S doing so horrible.

Canada was relatively unscathed and the U.S was in a complete dump.

I do remember the GST cut; was that along with the HST being created?

One thing I don't like about the CPC was just their stance on gay marriage, I know they didn't want to not allow "unions" and wanted gay people to be seen as equal, but the religious pandering on the marriage issue was a problem with me, but the Liberals pander way more so I can't really complain.

Let's honestly just wait and see what happens with the Liberals.

To be honest, a lot of the free trade agreements/ economic agreements with other countries the CPC made is going to start coming to fruition soon and this will partially benefit the Liberals(they'll be able to take credit).

I'm genuinely worried that Justin actually isn't ready, but luckily he has the rest of his party to keep him in check, only reason I say this is I think he is too emotional. But I know nothing about him, just seems like the type of a guy to make "now" decisions instead of factoring in the future. 

Just be happy we aren't like the U.S and our government isn't as big a circus as that, who knows what the fuck their Government's are ever going to do, they're so schizophrenic. and he's not just blowing smokeI'm 25, how many people do you think support the CPC that are under that age, and not from Alberta; honest question?

My friends are well aware of how shitty the dollar was, but they still voted Liberal because they were brainwashed about the environmental issue; they honestly think the Liberals are going to help.

That's at least what I found people in my demographic were the most upset about; they're all aware of the dollar....etc .

I know younger than that, and all their information is coming from facebook feeds; which is no good obviously.

A lot of my friends voted Conservative last election, but they switched this time because they watch the news and read newspapers;which were all Liberal biased. The media really did a number on them, they're convinced that Harper was hell bent on destroying the environment.

The environment is also one of the few issues I don't like to make fun of people for caring about, it really is something EVERYONE should be worried about. But to think the Liberals are some kind of green saviour is just naive.Not to burst your bubble, clips like this are highly selective in what makes the cut.

Not saying Americans are well educated about other cultures in general; I am dating one, but they do set it up to look the way they want.

If they just said Islamic Sharia Law in America the answer might be different.

Believe me, Americans are very xenophobic, if they knew what they were agreeing to they'd freak out. No, we don't do anal every time, and if we don't sweat we just wipe it off and that's it(obviously wash it).

Why does everybody shower after sex?Why?I was told I was scary looking once, but hot.

Also have been told I look like a dinosaur; not old but an actual dinosaur. Not really a compliment, just a funny insult.

One time a co-worker said I didn't look white and was some kind of weird "brown" mix. Not really a compliment; they were brown themselves. I took it as a compliment though.

People used to say my mole was a piece of poo my butt chin shit out.

Lots of strange insults, not too many strange compliments.

Canada gives you Asylum if you come from a country where you can be punished for being gay. Are they from the same sources? Are industries using treated water?

I know Ontario does have a shitload of water so it's not the amount used thats the problem, but generally screwing the consumer isn't right.

Maybe raise their prices a bit; still give them a break, and lower ours to even the field.
He's most likely a liberalFor some reason I thought hst was federally implemented.

I'm a bit biased on Justin because I personally don't like his super fluffy personality. I could be wrong on him he seems super hard working but I hate the hype I know he didn't create it. To me it seems a bit too much celebrity like and that could be throwing my opinion off. 

Personality doesn't matter in a leader anyway. On the reform there are problems with both sides I'm not against the Senate but I'm also not sure as to how necessary it is. 

There is no way electoral reform in Canada would bring on a True American style; no way we'd have an electoral college.

We'd stay True to parliamentary but the way votes are counted would be different I don't necessarily know how the popular vote could properly represent all parts of Canada though. It would represent the most Canadians but obviously Toronto Montreal and Vancouver could just decide everyttime which would be unfair.

I say abolish the Monarchy but my reasons wouldn't fan well on this subreddit.

Senate I'm not educated enough on the topic but it seems partially unnecessary.

Electoral system.  Keep it how it is.I don't even like LOTR and think this costume is awesome good jobYou know better than to post anything that challenges circlejerking anywhere on reddit. It isn't going to ever be taken positively.

Humans just aren't open minded.

Nobody will admit that "Yes" the reaction would be different, seen as a waste, and that the building is "fine".It's also discriminatory towards the dancing skills of people in white collar jobs as well as being stereotypical of blue collar workers.

Classism, bigotry... when will Canada be free of this?Yes /r/Canada where everyone thinks they're inclusive of all Canadians

EXCEPT

if you speak French or voted Conservative/ don't hate them and voted Liberal. 

How open minded. A lady got mauled not too long ago.

BBC Earth did a cool little feature on Churchill; including Hallowe'en and the Polar Bear Patrol, in their Human Planet serious in the Arctic episodes.  It's worth checking out how other cultures; with northern populations, live. Like Mongolia and Greenland. I understand your feelings, though they're not valid, I get it.

Don't know why people can't understand it.

It's hard when you get phased out by straight people in your life and know that some will judge you to not be judgmental of them yourself.

I think you need to have been hurt pretty bad to feel the way you do.Something tells me the NSA should be paying attention to these people tooI think it's more the long term effects that I am worried about before I start foraging.

I live in a pretty good spot to do, but the only things I eat are red currants and raspberries; because they're easy to identify.

These Sumac's are all over the place and I really wish there was an official green light on them because I would be making this drink right now.Holy shit was not expecting a response like that. Thanks a lot.

It wasn't a pity fest but you did make me feel better.

Was more wondering if this has happened to anyone else, knowing others deal with the same thing gives me a sadistic sense of relief; misery loves company. 

Moving is in the plans too.Clipping is amazing, I'm glad I came to reddit for suggestions.

Honestly love the speed and the beats.No way am I going to be a doctor.

My ex; who I've mentioned a million times because I was butthurt by him, is in Med School. That could be the confusion haha. I'm going to school for Environmental Tech, so the campus I'm going to is in the country as well; start in spring. 

And thanks, I like this subreddit for the most part even though I can be a douche.

And I wouldn't say that about my friends, they're just more conservative; live in the country where they grew up. It's just discouraging, they weren't horrible about being gay and were accepting they just sort of stopped messaging as much.

[This](http://i.imgur.com/bonFY0v.jpg?1) is a picture of the city from my town, so it's not like I'm completely isolated/ screwed. I am being a bit dramatic. I visit there often enough/ work there sometimes, but obviously not enough to make friends. 

Why are you so uppity? So many gay guys on this subreddit are so positive makes me feel like a downer haha.I'm less than a KM from where it was taken. I actually told a friend on reddit from Mississaga(a city south of me of 700,000) about my town and the trails through the woods....etc he can take. He told me he was an amateur photographer so I pointed out some spot he can go to, and loves it, he keeps going back and sending me photos

https://www.flickr.com/photos/134496569@N05/albums/72157660192865226

Thats the album he took of my town it was really impressive.

I'm about 60 km from downtown but it honestly takes over an hour usually because of traffic. You deserve it because you are really positive and it's awesomeThey don't miss the country that much; all my friends, so I know the city can keep you busy and pretty satisfied, and I think there is something about being close to a lot of people / life that makes people happy by default(not everyone but some people just like the noise/ liveliness of the city).

I like the country a bit better, because I like how calm it is; though it can get boring. 

Still favourite thing to do is off trail biking through the woods, fishing, climbing trees(plenty of gigantic trees to climb here that adults actually enjoy doing), we get to grow a lot of our own food, we make our own maple syrup, we cut down our own Christmas trees, get to pick tomatoes to make a ridiculous amount of sauce, fresh corn, fresh beef, there is a dairy farm with an awesome cheese store they make themselves, 

Basically the food is pretty fresh here in the summer and fall(not winter, but fresh maple syrup in spring).

There is only so much farming/ tree climbing / trail exploring you can do before you want to try something elseThe problem more is this.

You will identify with this.

In the country you make your friends and that's it, there is little opportunity for new friends after that, if your friends leave, you don't really have any other options.

In the city you are constantly meeting new people / have opportunities.
haha ok :0Really I'm gay and in a monogamous relationship and have only been in them.

Though I know nothing about gay people reallyYes twice, one was an ex best friend, the other was just a friend, I'd never fight a stranger; don't know if they'd charge me.

My boyfriend grew up in Alabama and has had his fair of fights.Have open body language; don't cross your arms, be afraid to look around or slouch.

Any interaction you have with people initially act a little bit more enthused than normal.

Source : I have been told by basically every friend / co-worker that I look pissed off a lot; even my boyfriend complains that when I'm sitting in the car I have this scowl on. I have really light sensitive eyes(i know sounds ridiculous but I do) so I squint a shit ton, fluorescent lights especially make me squint/ light headed. 

[This](http://www.inpapasbasement.com/wp-content/uploads/2014/04/robert-de-niro-scowl.jpg) is me in any kind of moderately bright lighting
&gt;(never seen someone born with a smile) to their lips.

Julia Roberts

Alanis Morrisette

Anyone that looks like Seabiscuit

For Canadians anyone notice [Amanda Lang](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=U79DoiC49r0) from CBC has a constant smirk on her face, I've seen her report on pretty dark stuff and she was smirkingI've said some pretty annoying stuff on /r/Canada and haven't been banned so I think the problem is what /u/furrot said and has to do with admin and possibly the users also trolling on other subreddits.

I don't think I've been censored once on here and I have so many downvotes on this subreddit I have an auto 9 minute time limit between my posts here(which is reddit's software doing that not the admin or mods). [Joule$](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=SnXzSfeTSSc) is pretty experimental. Really recommend him

[Shu Priest](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dHcuaLNJWYc) &lt;-- sort of experimental. Really recommend him.

[Ronny J](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=A0M2Km5gyPk) experimental and aggressive like Death Grips; completely different content though. They yell and scream. Ronny J literally sounds like the guy from DG but raps in a different style(the accent)

[Pouya](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MtA5r7D-TWo) &lt;-- experimental with an industrial sound; but a lot more typical hip hop sound. Completely different content from what you asked for though. Really recommend 
though.

[Lil Ugly Mane](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=t99r8JSdI7s)

[Jazz Cartier](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=i2t3cj3SE78) is experimental

[Savaga Mugen](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Oa6c5DbC9Og) &lt;-- don't know why I consider them related. Recommend anyway.The one shitty thing is it's actually hard for Canada to compete in any sector that isn't resource based because the U.S literally drains all of our other talent and is a huge competitor.

Not that the U.S deliberately does this, but it is impossible almost for anything to compete with the U.S unless it's something that is physically in the ground in our country that they don't have.

Food Industry, McDonalds, Wendys, Burger King, Subway....etc. Tim Hortons never stood a chance to fully compete against Dunkin Donuts, and none of our franchises like Harvey's or Swiss Chalet could ever break into the U.S market; it's way too big and saturated. They're all lucky enough they have huge followings in Canada, otherwise everything would just be American. 

Tech Industry - We have Blackberry, and Bombardier, pretty much everything else is in the U.S, every computer, the majority of our phones, music devices, t.vs everything are from foreign companies.

Clothing industry - doesn't even need to be mentioned

Hotel Industry - doesn't even need to be mentioned, it's all mainly American.

Just pick an industry that isn't natural resource based and we've already been beat out.

Canada is isolated on North America stuck beside only one country, the U.S which already is a major economic juggernaut.

We have Mexico; but they're further and trade is just starting to pick up, all other trade has to be done expensively through boats/planes.

We just can't compete, we were set up to be dominated by the US because they share the continent with us.

It's not like Europe, or Asia, or anywhere else where there are multiple countries for you to trade with relatively easily.

We have ours and its the U.S and they are 10x the population, nothing Canadian can compete with the U.S unless it's really exceptional.  We literally are another state when it comes to economics, most major companies set up in Canada as their "first" foreign endeavor, that means a lot of American companies see Canada as a place to do business in, which means very skilled very successful American business' are always trying to squash our companies; we can't even think about invading the U.S market for the most part. Ya he is a dick, he is a billionaire too, he is basically Canada's Donald Trump; but not racist.

He invented a reading system for kids; Leap Frog, or bought it or something, that's how he got rich, which is a pretty funny way for an asshole to get rich(educating children)k buddy, I have no idea what I'm talking about because it's tougher to break into Canadian markets. Companies still come to Canada because it's close and you can make money, they don't just say "oh that's not as much as we make at home fuck it".

Why do American companies still operate in Canada? Why are a lot of our clothes, electronics, movies, music, vehicles and food still coming from American companies?

American companies don't just stick to the U.S, they monopolize around the world, Canada is often the first country they break into because our markets are so similar.

They don't even make Canadian specific advertisements sometimes, they just play American made ads up here.

I honestly don't know what you are talking about. It's called the free market, we allow foreign companies to operate in Canada.

You think Molson is Canadian anymore, Tim Hortons? Hudson Bay company isn't Canadian anymore. 

What do we have left? Blackberry and Bombardier. 

All of our worthy companies are foreign owned, even the Beer Store in Ontario is partially foreign owned.

Nobody wants to invest in some shitty Canadian clothing company like Joe Fresh, or coffee company like Second Cup.

The majority of foreign investment in Canada is resource and real estate.

Tim Hortons is an anomaly. 

Walmart is a heavy competitor with most supermarkets and super stores.

Home Depot is a competitor with home improvement stores and Canadian tire to an extent.

Subway is way more popular than Mr.Sub.

Hilton, Holiday Inn....etc

I could just go on and on, every single little has a US counterpart.

Canada's Wonderland is owned by an American company; our largest theme park.

Waste Management... American.

There are very few industries in Canada that aren't U.S related/ foreign related. 

Why are all these companies operating here?

Our largest exports to the US are natural resource/energy based. Mostly everything else is just American companies profiting off Canada. Marriott is American........ there is just a Canadian subsidiary.. you think that GM of Canada is actually "Canadians"... the profits from Marriott Canada still end up profiting Marriott International which is HQed in the US.

Just because there is a Canadian headquarters doesn't mean it's not American.......

So 3/5 are American. Stop trying to make me look dumb.

I left out telecommunications and other industries that have Canadian laws protecting them, you know American phone companies aren't allowed to operate here right?

There are going to be random industries, but you are living in a dream land if you think Canada isn't owned by the U.S and highly dependent on the U.S.

It is hard for us to compete with them, yes we have successful at home business' but the majority of our companies will not be successful abroad like theirs are here.

There are a few examples but not all of them.

If you look at Canada's top companies they're either in an industry that is protected by Canadian law; banking, insurance,telecommunications, a foreign company operating under a Canadian branch, or are in the resource. Obviously the odd random one, but Canada doesn't have much to invest in besides resource and banking.

People aren't flooding money into our tech industries like they are in the U.S and Asia, and they aren't flooding much money into our manufacturing industries.

We are the worlds juggernaut of mining that is about it. Does this mean Syria/ Iraq/ Parts of North Africa are relatively empty?

Are the people who stayed just accepting ISIS?&gt;http://business.financialpost.com/entrepreneur/fp-startups/why-canada-is-failing-at-tech

You are living in a fantasy, I can't find a single list online that ranks Canada as a technology leader in the world.

We have a "growing" tech industry, but it's not important on the world stage.

Canadians don't realize how unimportant we are 

Named me 10 technology companies from Canada that are internationally known.

Blackberry and Bombardier are all I can think of.You can have a thousand crappy little companies that don't make as much as an international company combined.

The whole tech industry in Canada could be equivalent to Apple by itself, that's why.

Household names for technology is important in my opinion, unless you are just specializing in certain things.

There is a robotics company in my town that makes machinery that produce plastic products.

They aren't a household name, but do have a building in the U.S, Germany and Japan with their HQ in Canada, that is an example of a technology company not being a household name and being successful, so you are correct it isn't.

But they are few and far between in Canada, and I think the amount you have from your country is a good representation of the industry there.

It's hard to call Canada a "tech" country, when people aren't even aware of Canadian technology companies.

IMAX is a good example that became a household name.

Blackberry did, still doing alright in asia.

Bombardier isn't known everywhere but it's does decently.

That is it, I could name several technology companies from a lot of other countries.

The majority on your list are household names in Canada, I'm talking about internationally known. Blackberry was the only one that holds any weight. The rest are companies that just use technologies developed elsewhere and apply them here.

Telus and Rogers are irrelevant to the world.chickens can fly just not for extended periods of time.

Same with turkeys, I've seen them in trees before.

Source : I'm a hick/grew up in countryI thought your post was funny

I think it's misguided common sense that chickens can't fly when they can, they can go pretty high up too; like 15 feet. It's like a leap almost but they flutter and are slightly graceful.

I've never personally seen a turkey fly, but I have seen them like 40 feet up in a tree.... which is nuts.Let's all degrade rural folks because we all stupid a yuk yuk ka chuk.

Living in a rural area doesn't make you an idiot, or a bigot, there are plenty of them in the city.

Living in different societies/eras makes you a bigot.

Old people in general have racist attitudes because of the environments they grew up in, they're either scarred or brainwashed.

Plenty of old people in Western countries hate Germans. The Nazi's did a number on their PR.
I actively point out hot guys to my boyfriend, and he does to me. We get jealous of eachother sometimes but just make jokes about.

Sometimes he'll even check out a hot guy and then look at my in disapproval or disappointment; this is as a joke. Or I'll say " Id stick it in" about a guy, and say "but he'd have to be drunk first". Sort of throwing salt in the wound. 

We are douche bags, but we know it's as a joke.

Maybe your hands are hugeNot where I live. I didn't put words in your mouth, you conflated living in the country with being a bigot.

It's alright though, just letting you know you are a bigot yourself.If you get the job you can bring it up if they ask you to skip your lunch.

Your sister might just be an enthusiastic worker that is willingly breaking the rules. 

I've brought up labour laws at many different work places, they don't question you. Though I've never had one willingly break the rules I've just reminded my employers that it's been 5 hours and I'm taking a break... I don't ask I just tell. They never get upset and are pretty understanding about it so I wouldn't worry.

Obviously small business is going to let an employee willingly work harder, it doesn't mean they're forcing her and I doubt they are, again your sister is most likely just a really hard worker; you don't need to do the same. If they were producing their music in Ontario and investing the money made in Ontario then I would be proud

They are just Americans to me, the Weeknd doesn't even do Canadian media interviews, what a douche.

I'm sure Drake and Bieber send some money back to Ontario but the majority of it is being spent in the U.S, just more money/ talent flowing out of Canada and profiting the U.S(rightfully so), so it does absolutely nothing for me.

I'm proud of Ontario musicians like

[Kobo Town](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZthZSXe5v4k) &lt;produced in Ottawa

[Shad](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=q-mAMH5S6VA) &lt;-- way better rapper than Drake and Weeknd. Produced in Toronto by Ontario companies, filmed by Ontario cameramen, everything about it is Ontario.

[OBES\u00d8N](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=JXxCTxcwmc4) &lt;-- super creative, produced in Toronto

Than these guys, at least they kept their money in Ontario, same goes for Choclair, K-Os, Broken Social Scene, Saukrates, Dream Warriors......etc

All those artists are American produced, American profiting; I'm not anti US, I just don't take pride in that. Stay in Canada, be successful operating out of here and you really will impress me. Produced by American companies, profiting Americans, by Americans for Americans.

You think Drake, Weeknd,Bieber and Shawn Mendes aren't reinvesting that in the U.S.

Canadians have always been famous, we have always made it huge in the U.S, but that money stays there.

You think Canada profits off Mike Myers? Or anybody relatively famous.

I'd like to see any of those artists make it huge by producing their music in Canada.... it would be impossible.

The Guess Who are the only Canadian band to continue producing here and get international success, everyone else moved to the U.S.

EVEN GRETSKY TOOK HIS MONEY DOWN SOUTH.

The Weeknd doesn't even do Canadian news interviews, he pretty much ditched Canada altogether.

Bieber and Drake's music is just American music and they're performing it, they' don't right that stuff, I could name a hundred Canadian artists with more talent trying to make it in Canada, and they CAN'T. Drake is a joke.

Canada has had hiphop scene since the 1980's. 

Alright Canada I think we need to build a wall.

I honestly support granting him status. American immigrants/refugees can assimilate in a day basically. No I'm horny all the time

I prefer winter sex because it's less sweaty; don't like super sweaty humid muggy summer sex only because I hate having to shower after.I can remember parity, though the CPC did well during that times at managing Canada, a lot of it can be blamed on the U.S doing so horrible.

Canada was relatively unscathed and the U.S was in a complete dump.

I do remember the GST cut; was that along with the HST being created?

One thing I don't like about the CPC was just their stance on gay marriage, I know they didn't want to not allow "unions" and wanted gay people to be seen as equal, but the religious pandering on the marriage issue was a problem with me, but the Liberals pander way more so I can't really complain.

Let's honestly just wait and see what happens with the Liberals.

To be honest, a lot of the free trade agreements/ economic agreements with other countries the CPC made is going to start coming to fruition soon and this will partially benefit the Liberals(they'll be able to take credit).

I'm genuinely worried that Justin actually isn't ready, but luckily he has the rest of his party to keep him in check, only reason I say this is I think he is too emotional. But I know nothing about him, just seems like the type of a guy to make "now" decisions instead of factoring in the future. 

Just be happy we aren't like the U.S and our government isn't as big a circus as that, who knows what the fuck their Government's are ever going to do, they're so schizophrenic. and he's not just blowing smokeI'm 25, how many people do you think support the CPC that are under that age, and not from Alberta; honest question?

My friends are well aware of how shitty the dollar was, but they still voted Liberal because they were brainwashed about the environmental issue; they honestly think the Liberals are going to help.

That's at least what I found people in my demographic were the most upset about; they're all aware of the dollar....etc .

I know younger than that, and all their information is coming from facebook feeds; which is no good obviously.

A lot of my friends voted Conservative last election, but they switched this time because they watch the news and read newspapers;which were all Liberal biased. The media really did a number on them, they're convinced that Harper was hell bent on destroying the environment.

The environment is also one of the few issues I don't like to make fun of people for caring about, it really is something EVERYONE should be worried about. But to think the Liberals are some kind of green saviour is just naive.Not to burst your bubble, clips like this are highly selective in what makes the cut.

Not saying Americans are well educated about other cultures in general; I am dating one, but they do set it up to look the way they want.

If they just said Islamic Sharia Law in America the answer might be different.

Believe me, Americans are very xenophobic, if they knew what they were agreeing to they'd freak out. No, we don't do anal every time, and if we don't sweat we just wipe it off and that's it(obviously wash it).

Why does everybody shower after sex?Why?I was told I was scary looking once, but hot.

Also have been told I look like a dinosaur; not old but an actual dinosaur. Not really a compliment, just a funny insult.

One time a co-worker said I didn't look white and was some kind of weird "brown" mix. Not really a compliment; they were brown themselves. I took it as a compliment though.

People used to say my mole was a piece of poo my butt chin shit out.

Lots of strange insults, not too many strange compliments.

Canada gives you Asylum if you come from a country where you can be punished for being gay. Are they from the same sources? Are industries using treated water?

I know Ontario does have a shitload of water so it's not the amount used thats the problem, but generally screwing the consumer isn't right.

Maybe raise their prices a bit; still give them a break, and lower ours to even the field.
He's most likely a liberalFor some reason I thought hst was federally implemented.

I'm a bit biased on Justin because I personally don't like his super fluffy personality. I could be wrong on him he seems super hard working but I hate the hype I know he didn't create it. To me it seems a bit too much celebrity like and that could be throwing my opinion off. 

Personality doesn't matter in a leader anyway. On the reform there are problems with both sides I'm not against the Senate but I'm also not sure as to how necessary it is. 

There is no way electoral reform in Canada would bring on a True American style; no way we'd have an electoral college.

We'd stay True to parliamentary but the way votes are counted would be different I don't necessarily know how the popular vote could properly represent all parts of Canada though. It would represent the most Canadians but obviously Toronto Montreal and Vancouver could just decide everyttime which would be unfair.

I say abolish the Monarchy but my reasons wouldn't fan well on this subreddit.

Senate I'm not educated enough on the topic but it seems partially unnecessary.

Electoral system.  Keep it how it is.My pussy smell like a dumpstersplain me fag hagDrink till March!

I was going to make a much darker joke.

Go snowshoeing.

Go cross country skiing.

Go on a skating trail; seriously a trail you skate on that goes through the woods.

Go tubbing.

Go to a Maple Syrup farm/shack in the late winter.

Go get your own Christmas tree at a tree farm.

THAT ARROWHEAD RINK JUST SAW THAT IS AWESOME!

Honestly there is so much just google "winter activities ontario" and you will find a lot.

I'm going to Arrowhead this year because I can't get that trail out of my mind.

It's hard to tell when we don't know what town you are in or how far you are willing to drive.

Even going out on the lake in Wasaga Beach when it's frozen; just the shore, is cool, there are usually awesome snow sculptures naturally carved by the wind.38&gt;the Trudeau gang will walk together up the long, tree-lined driveway.

He's so [fucking cool](https://encrypted-tbn0.gstatic.com/images?q=tbn:ANd9GcTH0bPZ-nNHViK-7Qw253W4mgXZ_NOjmBQ8PkP8pTZytTr50sCb)

&gt;\u2014  Ed Pitt,  Dawson Creek

Joey put him up to thisWow you feel gross, I never feel gross, I usually just fall asleep.

If I get sweaty I need a shower though. So the fall is actually perfect time for that, it was 18 degrees today, not hot at all.Banjournoall of his cunningFlamboyancy doesn't mean femme or stereotypical gay behaviour. Nah my friends went all weird after I came out, I think I waited too longStopped calling as much, ask me for fashion advice, ask me to take them to pride; even though I've never been, asked me if I was a bottom or a top.

Basically assume I think that being gay is my life / only asked about stereotypical stuff then stopped contacting me. i knew itI don't think it's inline with this subreddit's thought process so I 'd just leave it. At least you read it. I always thought progressive rock was less aggressive and was different content; lyric wise.

I'd say maybe conscious hiphop is the best example of a "progressive"  hiphop subgenre.

People like Cyne, Zion I, J Live, Living Legends, Binary Star.

Modern ones, obviously Shabazz Palaces and Death Grips, I don't know about Kanye though and am not familiar with Kendrick.

Kanye seems too typical. Even though his content is. 

This is just my opinion, but that's how I always defined progressive; the lyrics and sound both have "progressed" from typical content.

Conscious hiphop is about as progressive in that way you can get. That Rap music, with a Nujabes sound.

[Nujabes with Cise Starr](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=IjSUsa3mFgU)

[Shu Priest](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dHcuaLNJWYc)

[Nujabes with Substantial](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=QJjrHffPPo8)

[Nujabes with Five Deez](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Ft5IFvsnFPA)

I'd look up Nujabes or Nujabes music.

Nujabes was a musician in Japan that died in a car crash, he basically inspired a genre of music to come from there called "nujabes" which means "good music" in Japanese I think.

You'll find plenty of instrumentals in that style with hiphop artists over them.

If you want just instrumentals I'd look into /r/triphop , /r/chillhop and hiphop instrumentals. 

I made a playlist on youtube thats all at least 50 year old songs sampled with hiphop instrumentals you may like

[Before Tv](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=qRs0MrfDhmw&amp;list=PLwnZVWlybns1Gc3Yo9MBxLSWykCPMLZTl)


My knee capsJust looked it, up looks like this town sort of. Bolton. They're like carbon copies.An actual Canadian here chiming in.

I wasn't aware of "white only" GrindR profiles till I came on askgaybros.

Not saying people aren't racist up here, but people will not publicly advertise that shit and if they do they look like complete morons.

It's not cool to be open about being racist in Canada if you are racist, that is generally kept among friends/family.

Personally I've never seen "whites" only on GrindR and I live near a town that is predominately Indian. Maybe the fact I'm white makes me ignorant to the fact but I personally haven't seen it ever.

Being called a racist is a huge insult in Canada. Even in the countryside; where I live.

No I would not bareback with a stranger, STD rates are too high to take that risk in my opinion. 

Condom's don't 100% protect but barebacking someone you don't know is asking for it in my opinion. Why are you hooking up with guys you aren't into?

I've lost my erection while having sex because I got distracted, was the tv playing in the background? Other people in the house? Noise outside? Music playing? Anything to take his mind off of what was going on.

Or did something happen to get a heavy emotional response out of him prior to hooking up?My Mom's brother is gay, and my Dad's sister is gay.

We have a gay second cousin too.Can't you just use something like metrojel for your rosacea? 

My sisters ex boyfriend had it and I think he thought worse about it than it actually was because everyone thought he was hot, he just had really rosy red cheeks.[Waldo](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=jgj_thMWROw)

[Cyne](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=bbRP5lrIx1Q) &lt;- a bit older

[Black Dave](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1-q3v5t3hR8) is a hit or a miss

[Anything produced by Pham featuring someone](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=a1B7--OQHxI)

[Awon &amp; Phoniks](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=j6Gdcspm7QI) 

[Clipping](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1tFXIy7OWos)

None are really housey though, just taking a shot in the darkI think a lot of Canadians would be tempted to move. Health care would carry the biggest problems. At least in Canada it's don't by province I don't know   how administering health care for New people would go through. Or what country would pick up the bill.No but the fees for it. It's not cheap and you don't jjust want someone with cancer moving to your country if they could be treated at home.

It wouldn't be an even flow. 

Canada does health care regionally and certain retirement and vacation Areas could be strained.

I'm sure Australia would be worried about the suddend influx of old people moving there to retire and draining your system.

Health care would be the biggest obstacle because it's free.

A doctor's visit still cost the government money and I don't think they'd want to be paying medical bills of people who are there to retire or are just there to try out living there.

Chemo cost is expensive. Broken leg is expensive.My Nana's from there! I'm pseudo Irish. Oy ti- toy- ti potatoeswww.vikingcruises.com Can vouch for Deerhurst, it is pretty awesome. 

You are right about the drive, I stayed there a couple of times because of hockey tournaments and it was far.Cause we never were imperialist if there weren't natives living thereDiscussion have happened in the last couple decades it's mainly Turks and Caicos that doesn't want it, not Canada.

There population is so small it wouldn't put a dent to supply them with health care and other infrastructure. 

They actually don't want to do it because they know we'd destroy the island because everyone would retire there.

Last time I checked there were 35,000 people there, we add 200,000+ people a year, I don't think it would affect much.

Turks and Caicos would add 1 million old people by years end though[Jazz Cartier](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Q94-nWxOcNM)

[Rozz Dyliams](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tw_Ry4DpPaY)

reminds me of Kid Kudi

[JakeGHNM](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=RgzqlZAFunA) kind of has that more traditional sound that Isaiah and Vince Staples sometimes have.

[Nae Sano](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ea7VaRU275s) reminds me of Travis Scott to an extent, not really what I like but worth checking out.I'm glad Justin knows the year.

Dion looks like he has to take a shit.American political atmosphere is different, pretty much only people that hated Obama hate him from the start still hate him, then some Southern states that were highly opposed to medicare.

The North U.S has pretty much stayed the same on their opinion of him.

The South is like Quebec, they're quick to oppose things the majority of the U.S wants.

Harper bashing has run so deep that I think the damage is irreversible. 

It's hard to think straight when someone has been painted as literally the anti-Christ.

He was relatively liberal and is, compared to many other politicians in Western nations.

---------------

I'm surprised the Liberals brought it back, not saying it's not necessary, but you'd think after all this "Government Intervention" complaining bringing back a mandatory census seems naziesque. Not saying it is, but I'm sure if Harper did it people would be bitching that he was a monster for possibly punishing people for not doing it. That it was old school thought process and blah blah.I don't think legalization will kill the illegal market.

I mean it's a plant after all, if people could grow beer on a tree and sell it they would, but it takes a hell of a lot more effort than a pot plant.

If dealers sell for less than whatever Government prices are set at; which I don't think it will be legalized, then the market can still exist and it still is a highly profitable plant to grow considering the gram for gram selling point(around $10, even at $5 it would be worth doing).

Also though it was easy for me to buy marijuana as a teenager, alcohol was relatively easy too. I live in Ontario with only two stores to buy from that are heavily regulated, but I never found it hard to find someone to buy us beer, and most of my friends parents would get it for us when we were 17/18 anyway. None of our friends parents would get us pot.

I'd imagine provinces that aren't as heavily regulated as Ontario, it is relatively easy for minors to get alcohol.

---------------

I'm not against legalization, but wouldn't legalizing it be telling minors and people in general it is ok to smoke it? From my pseudo psychology degree I'd say the consumption rate would go up a little bit, people who were hung up about it being illegal may feel alright trying it; and believe me people don't smoke it because they are too paranoid about it being illegal. No that's gross in my opinion, even for friends and family to do it.

Yes I get it we're all adults and we all do that, but it's something I'd rather not be reminded is happening close to me because I have a very visual imagination. 

What that guy did would be a major turn off for me; unless they were a partner of a year or more. I personally wouldn't have been able to do it again after hearing that.

My current boyfriend has made it his mission to catch me because I've caught him like 5 times and don't stop making fun of him for it, but it's not like we're open about it, but we do make light of it when it has happened; never during sex.

My go to line is "this isn't Perkins" because he went to the bathroom for like 10 minutes there when we took our first vacation.

I'm the type of person that can hear jokes about it, and joke about it, but actually visually seeing/hearing it makes me gag. It's not girly, it's a pretty human reaction to be repulsed by it. Same with barf.I've learnt to just ask when my mind is wandering versus asking the internet, what has been said is a reason to prod around, not everyone is used to the idea of FWB and being friends with people you used to be sexual with so I'd give him time to clear the air.

He should respect that not everyone may understand that and try to explain it.

I believe it to be platonic in my opinion and that he avoided it for the exact reason of you maybe thinking otherwise, but I don't see a problem with you asking more about their relationship. I don't particularly like him

[here he is throwing himself down the stairs](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=lRnwK01n904)

Could be my favourite video of him. It is similar to Chretien. He is like the definition of super liberal douche.

Hope the LP does a good jerbI was a fetus during Mulroney, I remember Chretien. THE PROOF IS THE PROOF AND IF IT'S A GOOD PROOF IT IS PROVEN.If he wanted a cabinet that looked like Canada he'd put a pine tree as the Minister of Finance and a beaver as the Minister of Aboriginals Affairs.

Maybe a fresh water lake could be the Minister of the Environment.

In fact I say Niagara Falls should be the Minister of Foreign Affairs.

I mean that really looks like Canada.nobody has dipped their hands in the pudding yet[Little Indian](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9XzlwA34tnw)

[J Live](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=XEx2T1NLsqw) &lt;-- that song is Jazzy a lot of his shit is jazzy

[G-Off the Whooligan](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=GgxfMSe_hz4)

[Scales Empire](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Ck5UTjpLva0)

[KRS-ONE](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xnI8JEW7Ty4)

[Que D](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1AmNDV7-N0Q)

[Asheru and Blue Black](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Mw-5IvHyafM)

[X-Tra Pleza](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MV7KSWuTwy0)

[Literally all of the Jazz Liberatorz Albums](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=DcgLvwRR2SY&amp;index=2&amp;list=PL8B613A9F12D768A6)

[Sick Lyrical Damager](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=D0zTHq7dtMQ)

[Black Moon](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=w3xON2BapBY)

[People Under the Stairs](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=pVjLA52jFkw)

[Pete Rock and CL Smooth](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=7wEw05-Ef5Q) &lt;-- really recommend

[Dj Jazzy Jeff](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=AMs0Eq4QVVU&amp;list=PLaqtl7KABhyvm-WIZMLQEbKkSa4DBvQRA) &lt;-- I know he's from Fresh Prince but he honestly has two c.ds the Magnificent and Return of the Magnificent which are amazing in my opinion and full of random artists; none of it is Will Smith.

Jazz was a DJ prior to the tv show and Fresh Prince and has still been producing for over 20 years.

[The Sound Providers](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=5DLTlgzhxFE)

[Grand Puba](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=loq5D9u4nZo) &lt;-- recommend

My brain is drawing a blank, but this is all I used to listen too, I'll come back more if I can remember its been a while. There is so much of it from the 1990's and 2000s



The downvotes are ripe in denialI don't see how abolishing the Monarchy would eliminate any parties.

I can see election reform doing so, but the Monarchy really doesn't affect anything. I'll list some things Canada does produce for the world; that Canada is known for.

I agree with everything you said by the way, the other day I got into an argument with someone who was under the impression Canada's tech industry is "thriving", maybe by Canadian standards but not by world standards.

Anyway

:

Childrens Entertainment, believe it or not we actually are a top producer of this; not something to be 100% proud of but it is an industry that is alive in Canada and is the top in the world. Not even joking, a lot of even American children shows; like Arthur, are produced in Canada.

Some agricultural products,

- We are the number 1 producer of Barley; of course we aren't the top Beer producing nation because we like to sell of any Canadian company to foreigners. 

- We are the number 1 producer of mustard seed on Earth. We supply the majority of the world with mustard. Yes seems stupid, but do you know how much mustard the world consumes? A lot? Why though, why on fucking Earth, do we not have the largest MUSTARD company on Earth. No fucking idea, we could be processing that shit here. But again it's the Canadian way to sell everything off prematurely just to make a quick buck.

- One of the top wheat producing countries on Earth, yet again, we aren't internationally known for our pasta/bread products.... fucking Italy is.... again why on Earth are there not major Canadian companies selling wheat products internationally? Saputo is our largest food company and it focuses on dairy.

- We are one of the largest blueberry producing nations, unfortunately they're not as popular internationally, anyway, of course we don't have any major companies that use this at home product, we just sell it off for a quick buck.

- One of the largest pork producing nations, yet again, we don't have internationally known pork products; Canadian bacon is only called so in the U.S and isn't popular really elsewhere.

Then there are all the natural resources we have.

- Lumber... oh lets not create processing companies and ship finished wood products, lets sell our wood, let someone else turn it into a product then buy it back from them because we are stupid.

- Mining, this could be the only thing Canada is a juggernaut in, we are a world super power when it comes to mining; look it up, the majority of mining companies are listed on the TSX.

--- Mining translates into us being of the worlds "coin" producers, a lot of other countries actually contract our mint to make coinage for them.... could be the only smart thing Canada has done with it's natural resources(creating alternative industries out of it).

I could go on and on, Canada is a moderate performer in pretty much everything, our biggest problem is we are a country whose history was founded on selling raw materials to Europe. We have continued to just "sell" raw materials to the world instead of taking those raw materials and specializing in industries to create even more.

Why Canada doesn't take advantage of all the resources available to us is beyond us.

Why the hell does Canada not have even an internationally known water bottle company? We are known for having a lot of fresh water, and being a pure place, yet we can't even manage to sell that shit to the U.S?

I mean why the hell are American companies, and European companies SELLING US WATER? Like why the hell is PERRIER and FIJI popular in Canada? 

Why the fuck do we buy French's mustard? Blah blah, I could go fucking on, we are ridiculous sometimes, the idea of someone from another country could sell us bottled water blows my fucking mind. 

There are so many little things like this about this country.

Maple syrup truly is the only "consumer product" that Canada is seen as the "premier" for, and that's arguably a Quebec thing, and half of them want nothing to do with us.

Anglos who bash Quebec, will take poutine and maple syrup as their own, that is how sad this country is. We are proud of things made by people we don't like. 
oh fuck didn't even realize!Oh I agree with that, but I don't use Republican as a negative. Those are just people who don't realize that America isn't the first and only Republic on Earth.

France is a Republic and they have a Parliamentary system. 

I've slowly learnt that most of the people using those terms don't know anything about politics or the world in the first place.
People are under the impression Harper was too callous to give a shit about his party members. 

I think that's why the OP thought that post would hold some weight.

or it's just a part of the romance people who don't actually care about politics are in with Justin at the moment.

I think Justin will get a pat on the back for anything by the stupid. I actually met Kim Campbell while she was PM when I was a kid

We were in Nova Scotia. Over 20 years ago, but ya, the Liberals are trailblazers. 

I know the Conservatives are seen as "conservative" but that doesn't mean "bigoted" only idiots think the two are synonymous. I look at the Conservative party as " we are slower to make decisions" that's about it. Everyone else see it as "No ethnics, no women and no gays". 

Yes people don't realize the Republican Party is just a name, they're just two parties in a Republican Democracy. Republican means an elected official head of state.

I actually credit South Park with opening up my political views as odd as that sounds. 

They were aware of the Hive Mind early, and taught me about it as a kid; before I even had political views. By the time I got involved I remembered how blind people are to follow just what one person says

[This 10 Second Clip](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=IGl1CCprCeU) pretty much sums up exactly /r/Canada(towards the Cons) and Liberal America(towards the Republicans). Though I really don't like the U.S Republicans, it just emphasizes how most peoples arguments against them are "nothings". Though I agree with you.

I think people cheered the guy getting fired because he was a homophobe and they don't care how it was done, in my opinion anyone that does something like that should be fired. So though it can be spun as hypocritical there is a grey area there where I think it's appropriate for anyone to support "muzzling".

By saying you don't want to drive a bus for gay people because you don't agree with them, really creates nothing, and it's not like any religion forbids you from doing anything for gay people. So this guy was clearly openly trying to promote hatred.

I was a Conservative voter. Not saying you are agreeing with it, and I know you aren't, just saying why I agree with it being ok to be a hypocrite in the sense.

Social conservatism is almost hypocritical in itself too, but that's because it factors in morals(keeping health care, having social programs). They're pro big business, pro military....etc, but also think that the government should help take care of the little guy a little bit further, bringing in the most immigrants in recent decades.

Much like the LPC is hypocritical by being hyper liberal but factoring in morals(muzzling those who are causing hatred towards others). They're so Liberal, they protect minority groups who may themselves discriminate against other minority groups and are too PC to address issues within ethnic communities; such as homophobia and racism towards others.

A True Liberal would be like the U.S democrats almost, and be ok with freedom of speech even if it's hate speech. 

Canada is a weird grey zone where there are contradictions everywhere. Conservatives that like big bad business but also support social programs, and Liberals that are so PC and "Liberal" they support taking away Liberties(like free speech).

Also agree on the company policy comment. Work for any large company/entity and you will sign a non-disclosure contract on certain things, even fucking McDonalds made me sign one when I was 16. Holy shit couldn't even readhttps://www.reddit.com/r/canada/comments/3rq5vw/thats_great_and_all_but/cwqe2o1

&gt;The guy covered every demographic but homosexuals, what a homophobe, unless he himself is the homosexual.The war was mainly fought by British troops, and the majority of Canadians that fought considered themselves British.

Let's stop grasping at straws on the heritage stuff.Financial problems are heavily dependent on foreign countries and whether they are buying our products / setting up in Canada.

Peoples money is generally safe if it's invested with the Government or the Banks, but personal ones / outside ones are always victim to volatility. Which is one of the reasons Canada weathered the last crisis relatively well. We also didn't have the ridiculous mortgage rate boom that the U.S did, which indebted a lot of people; banks giving out mortgages they basically know the people can't afford.

There is a lot to it, but many things that affected other countries were trickle effect. Any kind of financial crisis will have negative effects elsewhere as people spend their money differently, negative information about a country can hurt investment in that country for the day....etc.

Canada just has really safe banking systems, that Harper didn't create, and have been in place for a while; I don't know which Government created it. I don't know all the regulations, but the Government is heavily involved in setting boundaries for them so that they can basically never fail; unless currency fails in general.


This keeps a lot of personal money / housing relatively safe, which really is one of the worst things that can be lost in a financial crisis; jobs aren't safe here though obviously.

In the U.S peoples investments could have disappeared as some banks went under, many American companies went under, and people had mortgages they couldn't afford, which created a financial crisis on it's own that Canada didn't have.

We do have a lot of personal debt compared to other countries.

This is basically what I get from Trudeaus plan

1. Don't stop spending/ cutting things that could slow us down further economically;but would stop the debt the growing.

2. Continue spending investing in industries; I have no idea which ones, to create more jobs.

 Mind you Canada's population isn't large enough to sustain relatively large industries so a lot of our companies depend on other nations, so if they suffer our industries suffer, they also have to face more competition.

3. Hopefully after all this spending and continuing to support the economy and I guess "stimulate spending and job creation", there will be a surplus of revenue from the newly created jobs/industries to pay off the debt accumulated prior?

They honestly haven't specified much, and sometimes saying you are "investing" in this industry doesn't necessarily do anything to help, and again we are dependent on other nations economically as well, so the world in general is in a sluggish mode.

China for one has slowed it's economic growth, though it far outpaces Western nations, it has been hit relatively hard too.

So it really is a complicated global problem, because every little industry in Canada is doing a lot of foreign sales/deals...etc.

There is only so much retail that can be purchased in Canada, the government can stimulate spending by lowering interest rates and giving benefits/tax cuts.

There is only so much construction....etc Canada can do within it's own border.

Basically if Canada truly wants to succeed and be economically strong they have to enter international markets. If the international markets are doing poorly in general Canada will too.
http://www.carlisle.army.mil/ahec/ahecfiles/BurningofWashington.pdf

&gt;The British forces were led by Rear Admiral George Cockburn and Major General Robert Ross, a
veteran of the Iberian Peninsula campaigns in the war against Napoleon. Ross was a seasoned
campaigner and superb troop commander. 

&gt;British forces began landing at Benedict,
Maryland at 2:00AM, August 19, 1814, with
a combined force of 4,500 Sailors, Marines
and Soldiers. From this point Ross marched
his force to Nottingham, MD (Aug 21), Upper
Marlborough, MD (Aug 22) and Blandensburg,
MD (Aug 23). 

http://www.whitehousehistory.org/the-burning-of-washington

--------------

Nothing suggests Canadian units were sent to Washington to burn it.

Napoleon war was ending freeing up troops for the British, who then sent troops to Washington just to piss them off.

https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/17rgyh/was_it_canadians_or_british_who_burned_down_the

&gt;"Saying the Canadians burnt down the White House is as True as saying the Australians burnt down the White House, because they were both part of the British Empire."

--------------

No Canadians took party, they were British people fighting in the Caribs and Europe.

Canada has lots of other things to be proud of, but the war of 1812 was mainly a British vs American thing because of the way the British were treating American vessels at sea. 

They also were penalizing them for trading with the French who they were at war with, and the French were penalizing the Americans too for trading with the British.

Actual Canadians had very little to do with it, and a lot of them ; especially on the borders, had no particular beef with AmericansHaha are you serious? Can you show me a link that says the troops were from Canada, everything I read stated that they were pulled from the islands/ europe.

If Canada gets to take claim, so does Australia and New Zealand. 

What are you talking about reality? It's just history, what does politics have anything to do with it.

If anything Conservatives would be more likely to claim it as Canadian.

My political views have nothing to do with how I see Canada historically. I just don't pick and choose things to fit better.

It is how many Canadians rip on the French then claim poutine and maple syrup to be a part of the Canadian identity, when it's French Canadians who popularized both. 

Anglo Canada is in this weird pick and choose what fits us best mood about our history. 

I don't romanticize our country and it's history as much as others that's all. 

The troops who attacked the white house and did the majority of the fighting within the U.S were British born.

Canadian troops stayed in Canada. They weren't sent to Washington by boat; which the sources say, led by a General who was fighting in Europe. If the troops were Canadian they would have specified they were from there.

We were not involved in a lot of the inner battles, and battles happened elsewhere than just Canada in the war. 

It's just denial. 

depends what you think a whore do doeMy family has a bunch of gay people so I wouldn't want to bring my boyfriend because everyone is going to make a fuss but I will eventually do it.

His family is religious but most of them accept him, some try to convert him back or send him religious propaganda but they acknowledge my existence.valleyWhat would you consider highway 9 ? What was his reasoning for being on it?fo profitFunny stuff, and docs.

Nathan for You, Tim and Eric, Eric Andre Show, Last Week Tonight with John Oliver, The National(CBC), W5, fifth estate, Doc Zone, Passionate Eye.

Mainly late night crap.I don't know I was born in 1990, and was never taught girls were unequal which is why the feminist movement seems passe.

Equality takes time, there is only so much you can do, I've done my part by being part of the first generation that doesn't need feminist. 

I mean the first leader of my country I ever met was a women when I was little, I don't really know where else I can look for validation. 

Girls are equal to me, but I'm not a feminist, because I think the only problems left for girls lay with the older crowd and that's none of my business; they're also sometimes homophobic. 

It's also hard to feel bad for them when I feel more minimized as a homosexual, I think that is much more "important" an issue to tackle than women's rights; at least in my country.Honestly watch the Sporting Goods Store and Antique Shop episode

 http://www.much.com/shows/nathan-for-you/episode/741638/sporting-goods-store-antique-shop/

You can watch it on there if you are from Canada.

He hires an Astronaut to try and convince a kid to be a soccer player instead of going into the space program and it is literally the funniest interview I've ever seen. I was crying. Somebody on this forum once said a story of their Dad beating them up and kicking them out of the house in winter in Northern Ontario; which is basically no mans land like a real no mans land.He is from Canada; thats why I assumed I guess you were. He was pretty big here, and Nathan for You was based off a segment he had on a show called "This Hour Has 22 Minutes". His segment was called "Nathan Fielder Report"

and was pretty similar to the show

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=EwPZpALhBxM

I was really surprised to hear he got picked up in the U.S. And I sort of miss him on 22 Minutes he was the funniest part.Ya True I guess it was the comparison I didn't like, messages deleted. Hard to tell without background knowledge on you and your friend, does he even know you are out...etc

That honestly looks like every single conversation I have with one of my friends who is really anxious staying in and likes going out to do things.Not the rebel. It's like Sun Media reincarnated. Oh ya that show is decently popular; not so much among the younger crowd.

I just remember him being on it and he was pretty much the highlight of the show.

I'm glad the U.S picked him up because the new show is hilarious and I don't think it could have been made in Canada; we don't have a big enough audience.

Sadly most of our talent goes to the U.S because there is more money to be made and Canadian made shows rarely get international recognition. 

This Hour Has 22 Minutes was focused on Canadian issues so there was no way it would be popular internationally anyway, so good for him, he was sort of limited working for the CBC. More aboriginal men are actually missing and murdered, not even joking, it's just aboriginal men account for a larger percentage than female involved unsolved cases/ murders.

There are still double the amount of missing aboriginal men. 

Trans women is not womens issue it is trans issue, it's not because they want to be a women and people hate women, it's because people are idiots and don't understand that your brain can actually be female in nature in a males body.

I think Canada is on the right track and that we are doing the best we can, things can't be done overnight, and I still believe homosexual issues are more important to overcome than women's rights.

It's hard to compare the two.

The leader of the CPC is a female now, and she will most likely be the leader in the upcoming election, she is charismatic and a good speaker/ rep. 

The CPC also had many female cabinet ministers. 

There is only so much you can do, females have only just started aspiring to be in government in the past decades, it won't happen over night.

I just don't look at girls in a negative way, and nobody I know does, so I just don't get it, it seems to just be relics of a more traditional society from the past that haven't died yet.

I'm not saying things don't need to be done,just the wheels are in motion and it's going at a pretty fast rate.I said trans issues aren't a women's issue.... are you being serious? You think trans discrimination is because we discriminate against women and hate women? Are you nuts? It's because people don't understand the concept of gender, it's nothing to do with being a women. There are transgendered men too. The issue is different from women's issues, completely different.

It isn't a womens issue, not saying trans people aren't women, but transexual discrimination has NOTHING to do with people HATING WOMEN.

Stop spinning it to make me seem like a bigot, I never in my life have had a problem with transgendered people and actually sort of understand their plight.

--------

Anyway, all I'm saying is it's going in the right direction, people are acting like women get called "bitches" like I get called "fag" by random strangers.

I don't think women get stared at for kissing their boyfriend at the bar I go to.

I think it's really sad that gay people don't even give a shit about the discrimination faced by other gay people. I don't like seeing people paint a group like "women" as having it as bad as I do because that's unfair, and the attention doesn't need to be on women. They already are getting their equal status... as I said it takes time.

Honestly, you are from Ontario I am assuming.

Try being gay in small town Ontario, just try it, and then you'll be envious of the problems women face.

Not everyone is Ottawa/ Toronto, discrimination against gay people is very RAMPANT in this country. More so than any other group, everyone is just so urban they actually don't see the problem.

----------------

Women need people fighting for them, the whole point of my comment was I feel like women's issues are on the right track to being solved; the aboriginal issue isn't because they're women it's because they're aboriginal, and that homophobia actually hasn't gotten better where I live, the entire time I've lived here.

Women's rights have progressed more than gay peoples rights, so my energy and thoughts don't go towards women's rights, gay people and gay youth still kill themselves in this country for being gay, women do not do this. 

I'm not a feminist because I think there are bigger fish to fry. My life has been ruined because I am gay.Yes it has, it's also given me a "suck it up" attitude towards problems I don't see as significant enough to get worked up over.

I think I'm less empathetic than I would have been; guilt/empathy ruins my day sometimes. It's called being deep in the closet? Can't you remember?I never said women weren't equal but everything seems to be going in the right direction.

Being from a military family doesn't necessarily mean anything.

Also stop saying aboriginal women issue, it's an aboriginal issue and a Canadian issue period, it has nothing to do with gender inequality. That is what I am getting at.

Just because I don't agree with you on what category something falls into doesn't make me a bigot either.

We are just going to have to agree to disagree here, I think you severely misunderstood what I was getting at; again never said women rights don't need improvement. 

Trans women, have the same issue trans men have, acceptance/understanding of gender identity, which again, is not a women's issue. This does not make me a bigot.

I think trans gendered people are the most discriminated group on the planet, and least understood. I just wouldn't say their issue is a "women's" issue, especially when women are part of the problem(they can be bigots too).

Point being I was just explaining to the OP why I'm not a feminist and that is it, take it or leave, me and you clearly have two different life experiences. I'm beginning to realize almost every gay person from the city has a different attitude than I do. It's a severe disconnect in understanding of eachother.

Believe me when we say we live in two different worlds.What do people get out of this?

I guess music does the same thing for me.&gt; As for military background, go fuck yourself and the horse you rode in on. Seriously, get your head out your tiny little asshole and look at other experiences for one brief moment

Didn't mean to piss you off to that extent, I said it doesn't necessarily mean anything I didn't even make a judgment on you.

You are just acting like I'm not educated on all these matters, or that I'm self absorbed. 

I say it's an aboriginal issue and it has nothing to do with women, because it's an issue that affects the aboriginal community, not for any other reasons. It has to do with Canadian Government setting them up for assimilation or failure. This is why I don't see it as a women's issue.

I didn't ride in on any horse or think anything worse of you, don't know where you are getting this hostility or sense of superiority from.

Me saying agree to disagree is pretty much saying I respect your opinion but I have mine. The last thing I do is ever think I'm better than people. Zion I and Aesop Rock are pretty good for that subject matter

[Zion I - Poems 4 Post Modern Decay ft. Aesop Rock](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-jUB3n6GfLg)

[Aesop Rock - None Shall Pass](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZEBGCOCxLgA)

[Brand Nubian - Slow Down](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Msq6s_t42OA)

[Cyne - Money Parade](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=4S1Q27LsbLA)

[Dream Warriors - Day In Day Out](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=rl5TP5X6ooA)This isn't in order, provided links.

1. [One Be Lo from Subterraneous/ Binary Star](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Q8y6R6H3Il8) 

2. [Double K and Thes One from PUTS](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=pVjLA52jFkw)

3.[Babu Zumbi from Zion I](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_6ZEy2_sjak)

4. [Aesop Rock](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_JX4c8nXPsA)

5. [Deltron 3030](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Q7_jbluF0qo)

6. [Illogic](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KOjKVhPNCMo) could be my favourite

7.[Cise Starr of Cyne](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=11eoDv2ESzw)

8. [Palaceer Lazaro of Shabazz Palaces or Butterfly from Digable Planets](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kXEWj9N8gVg)

9. [Everyone in Pharcyde](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=QjsPG0Kspxo)

10. [Mos Def](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=01yUzXQctcM)True sorry.

We're not going to agree on the aboriginal issue, urban and rural communities are not ethnicity and culture.

They are aboriginal issues, if I provide you with links I doubt you'll even bother giving them a thought. 

http://www.thestar.com/news/gta/2014/08/22/aboriginal_men_murdered_at_higher_rate_than_aboriginal_women.html

http://www.socialjustice.org/index.php?page=aboriginal-issues

http://www.ctvnews.ca/canada/canada-faces-a-crisis-on-aboriginal-reserves-un-investigator-1.1497612

http://www.ammsa.com/publications/windspeaker/canada%E2%80%99s-aboriginal-education-crisis-column

http://www.theglobeandmail.com/news/national/canadians-attitudes-hardening-on-aboriginal-issues-new-poll/article7408516/


None of it mentions it being a matter of womens rights. I've been paying attention to this issue since I was 15 and have been paying attention to the political atmosphere of the country much earlier, this problem is not a womens issue, it's been going on since the 1980's and very much has to do with aboriginals themselves and the position the government has put them in ; isolated on reserves, current generation raised by people scarred from the residential schools, and rampant acloholism because their culture doesn't know how to handle it yet, every culture that gets introduced to alcohol goes through an abuse period. 

Losing stomach fat means you need to do cardio and reduce your intake of fatty/sugary foods/empty calories.

The stomach can be one of the hardest places to loose weight so don't be discouraged, it just takes longer.

Most people for some reason store fat on their stomach first and their bodies shed the fat on their stomach last.

As for the gym thing, you will not look amateur what so ever, the gym is a place to get in shape, nobody looks down on anyone doing something healthy.

Would you be embarrassed to go to a health food store? No? There's your answer about the gym. It literally should be the last place you feel judged.

Yes you will see people who are ripped, but that's because they've been going to the gym, they don't have this " I was born this way" attitude, they know it requires hard work, and I'd say the majority of them would be happy to see a new face there.

It's like sharing a hobby, would you be upset if a new person came to share a hobby you like?

There are many subreddits to help you know, but I know that cardio workouts combined with lower calorie intake / reduction of fatty foods will help shed fat off your stomach. I also know the stomach seems to be the hardest place for people to target so you need to have patience and keep at it, and not be discouraged, progress can seem slow at first. Haha no problem, yea he is def one of my favourites.

He's been doing it for over 10 years so maybe you just didn't look in the right places.being on metacanada has nothing to do with what I'm saying, I'm pretty sure they're more likely to take credit for things that they shouldn't.

I honestly don't care, I think it's funny Canadians are pathetic enough to be proud of things that they didn't even do.

I wish my fellow national peers weren't so lame, but what can I do about it.... nothing.

Enjoy thinking we burnt the white house down and that poutine is from Anglo Canada....

/r/Canada, we are tolerant, unless you are French or Conservative.

&gt; Fact is, indigenous people's attitudes with regards to gender dynamics changed after colonialism, and they slowly adopted a semblance of the gender hierarchies of Western nations - hence a wide range of gender specific expectations placed on indigenous men and women. Even if it's internal to an aboriginal community, that doesn't remove an edge of trouble in the air with regards to these women.

I was under the impression aboriginals were actually more matriarchal than we are. 

We aren't even arguing over anything, we both agree they're important issues, so now it's just semantics of what category to put it under

I think the problems facing the aboriginal women is because they are aboriginal not because they are women.

You really need to stop trying to spin it like I'm a bigot, I wasn't raised to be that way, and haven't thought a single negative thing about a demographic group. So please stop.

I have been educating myself on aboriginal issues prior to it being in the limelight like it is. It was never called a womens issue, all of a sudden some hipsters find out about it and they think they're the authority; not calling you a hipster, and that they can call it a women's issue.

For the 10 years I've been paying attention to this, only this year has it ever been referred to as a women's issue, prior to that it had to do with aboriginals. 

Saying it has to do with a cultural group does not make me a bigot, being so PC that you think you can't talk about a group that you don't belong to is bigoted in my opinion.

I'm a human being, aboriginals are human beings, I can talk about them if I want. I don't see the issue being specific to women, I see it being specific to aboriginals, only aboriginal women are involved, and aboriginal men are missing/murdered too, so it is an aboriginal issue that doesn't have to do with gender. 

[Restrict Flavour](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=W5EMZpZSBkI)

[unitr\u2206_\u2206udio](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=v4dD8C4lSYU) &lt;-very similar

[Da Vosk Docta](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9e9Rwq-hJi8)

[Bear//Face](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Acr1yJRm9DY)

[\u2132.\u2205.R.X.S.\u22a5](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8rggntDwCdY)What makes you king shit?

You better be a 10/10 with that attitude. Ya but at what age did you go back to school I'm already 25. You'll get through it just hold out for that month man, good you are working towards getting help. Stop pitying yourself though, you control your own destiny, sounds corny but it's True, there is no one out there looking out for anybody, everyone is on their own. 

Anything you can do to preoccupy yourself until then?A lot of my friends are in their 30s and I'm 25, two of them are in their 40s and I'm still in contact with them. People are people.I've done lots of labour wouldn't call myself a tradesman though. Tell him you saw him on GrindR , you were on out of curiosity , and were wondering where you guys stand.

That's about it, not really a big deal, you guys aren't official, and he may have downloaded it out of curiosity like you since you guys aren't actually in a verbalized monogamous relationship. 

There really isn't any harm in him being on there considering you guys haven't solidified anything, and there shouldn't be any harm in asking him if you guys can be exclusive if you are genuinely interested in it.

Maybe he's into open relationships or isn't looking for a relationship that is steady right now, better to find out. Why does Dion always look like he is confused?It represents the never ending circle of Monarchical oppression in the post-industrialized anglosphere[CBC = Government Funds = Justin Trudeau = Muzzling Canadians](http://us.123rf.com/450wm/kzenon/kzenon1303/kzenon130300032/18231136-woman-looking-through-magnifying-glass-or-loupe.jpg)&gt;It represents the never ending circle of Monarchical oppression in the post-industrialized anglosphere

It formulates the interminable succession of tyrannical monarchical oppression in the post-industrialized anglosphere

*smells farts*

*gives kids two last names*

*pronounces city names in foreign accent according to country they're in*It always smells like cookies near there because of the factory. Canada has more bald eagles than the U.S, it should be our bird, not the stoopid goooseI'm pretty sure even Russia would be the best place on Earth compared to Iran. Yes for gay people that was my point. The comparison was even a shit country for gay people like Russia would be amazing compared to Iran.

Iran denies they even exist, Russia it's not illegal to be gay. They currently are even still allowed to adopt; though the Gov is considering removing that right. 

It's illegal in Iran and there is speculation people have been executed for it there. Russia gets a bad rep in the sense, it's not that bad compared to a lot of other countries, but those Asia, African and Middle Eastern countries where it is illegal or punishable to be gay tend to treat their general population shit anyway so people don't really pay mind to the gay rights thing when more important things are at issue. 

Russia's in a decent place if one of it's worst social issues is it's treatment of gay people. How the fuck is Singapore homophobic?

They're all mainly Buddhist, and though Buddhist are anti-sex in general, there is nothing specifically against homosexuality in Buddhist.

There is anti- sex, anti-rape....etc, no anti-gay. 

Maybe this is one of the few times a gay person is being protested against simply for the sex implied and not just because he is gay.Ya that's what I was getting at; don't think it's homophobic but anti-sex.Why does everyone on this subreddit think being unattractive means you are unlovable and will never find anyone.

My boyfriend is hot and I am unattractive, my ex was a good looking guy, my ex before that was good looking.

I've hooked up with what I found attractive; know others may not, and have hooked up with other attractive people.

Me being in shape certainly did help. Not a magic cure, but this subreddit is obsessed with putting down unattractive people, what is the deal with that?No it's not because everyone I've dated has been a gay male, and everyone I've hooked up with has been a gay male. 25 I don't think Im old.You are from Algeria? Judging from the way you spell personne I am guessing you speak French as a first language.

Your English isn't that bad either. 

Canada seems like a good fit, apply for refugee status here or even immigration.

Our immigration goes by points, you get points for knowing English, and you get points for knowing French, being bilingual is an asset in Canada. If you have a degree I think that may get you points as well but it wouldn't be recognized in Canada.

If you have enough money to get set up for rent/ car, and can apply for a job in Canada ; work on your English and look for jobs that require French and English knowledge, and get a work visa and move here, then eventually start the process of immigration once you've worked for a certain amount of time.

This is all just a guess , but I feel like you could attempt to move here based on refugee, and possibly immigration status.

Most immigrants here have a very wispy grasp of English or French, and you seem to have a grasp of both of them. Canada, and I'm dating a guy from Alabama right now.(In real life he lives in Ontario too)Feeling good on a Wednesday Exactly what I was getting at.

I actually think this "if you aren't attractive you are doomed" attitude on this subreddit to be toxic.

Obviously hand holding and being yes men isn't any better, but this is one of those issues I really think people are feeding into on here.

Reading some responses on this subreddit where people act like being unattractive means you are forever alone sort of starts to get me down about myself; even though I'm not alone, and then I start to think of single people who read that shit and may think bad about themselves.

If you take care of yourself, have a decent personality, and can take on responsibilities there is no reason for you to even think you will be forever alone.

If you are super overweight, or a slob, or socially awkward why do you not look for someone else who is overweight, or a slob, or socially awkward. If you are unattractive, why do you not look for someone else who is unattractive?

Why does everyone think that attractive people are the only ones ever in relationships? 

My boyfriend is friends with tons of "overweight" gay dudes who are in loving relationships, the gym doesn't mean shit. I'm envious of one of the couples because they have their own house in Chicago and have two kids(surrogates from each one), good jobs, are financially secure and incredibly happy, they're all not the biggest "lookers" on earth, but I find them cute because they are positive people.Even Richmond Hill has decent Shawarma.

People come to Toronto, stay downtown and think that's it. 

There is more to the city than the actual "old Toronto", and the suburbs offer good eats too, immigrants move there more often than the actual city anyway. 

It's like if you complained about Indian food in Toronto, only went downtown, never considered Scarborough or even Brampton(largest Indian population).

Bradford, Brampton and New Market both have the best Mexican food I've ever had, and I've seen people complaining about Toronto having no Mexican. 

The best Italian can be found in Vaughan and Caledon.People just don't like Scarborough in general, everyone has a negative view of it where I live(North West of the GTA) we are on the opposite end and I don't know anyone that would willingly venture there. I had to convince my friends to go to the Bluffs and they were blown away. 

I only learned about how awesome it can be because I delivered furniture for Ikea and would often have routes there and was surprised by the Indian food places there.

Guildwood is actually nice too, don't know why Scarborough has such a bad rep. 

Also Brampton just destroys anywhere in Toronto for Indian and even Shawarma, bigger populations there, you feel "India" when you are there; and it's not just strictly to one street like Gerrard. 

Whether you are in the North, East, South, or West of that city there will be a decent Indian food place and most likely Shawarma and Jamaican. 

Brampton like Scarborough just has a shitty reputation.

Depends how it came to be, I mean if you guys are seeing eachother anyway through work or mutual friends it's kind of stupid of you not to be friends with him. Haha, Caledon has a higher percentage of Italians than Toronto, obviously not as many, but every other restaurant in Caledon is Italian. 8.3% of the towns population's mother tongue is Italian, that's not considering the 2nd and 3rd generations here.

For Caledon(Bolton is a part of Caledon) Euro Deli, Mercato's , Prenderci Gusto, Four Corners Bakery, Caledon-Italian Bakery, the Angry Tomato, Allegro's, Cielo, Baffo's(featured on you got to eat here), Mr.Gigi's, Pizza Panini, Garden Foods(Italian Grocery Store), Cheek's, Da Paolo's, Casamici, Paganelli's, La Pedella

http://www.tripadvisor.ca/Search?q=italian&amp;geo=671618&amp;pid=3826&amp;typeaheadRedirect=True&amp;redirect=&amp;startTime=1449019002386&amp;uiOrigin=MASTHEAD&amp;returnTo=http%253A__2F____2F__www__2E__tripadvisor__2E__ca__2F__Restaurant__5F__Review__2D__g671618__2D__d7229740__2D__Reviews__2D__Da__5F__Paolo__5F__Trattoria__2D__Caledon__5F__Ontario__2E__html

La Katrina downtown Brampton for Mexican. Bar Burrito.

I actually don't like Shawarma that much, but I dated a guy from Richmond Hill who was in love with it, he stood by Richmond Hill having the best.

Then two of my friends from Sandalwood; in Brampton, like this place called Ozmows or something, and Shawarma Queen, they always go there. My friends and I both factor in price with quality, so I think it's just good cheap Shawarma. A buddy of mine from Caledon goes to Ozmows sometimes too. 



Gay people are a small part of the population, so take that city size and take 1/20th of the size or even less and that's why.

This is why living in a small town fucking blows. I'm pretty sure I am the gay community here. 

North-west Toronto is not Jane and Finch or Yorkdale... thats like central North Toronto. Northwest Toronto would be Rexdale. 

I said the GTA, so Caledon. Bring on the snickers of people stuck in the mindset of nothing exists past Steeles. Shutup a ma fungu or something. Haha :pThe teen thing is True.

Lots of people like to bitch about how "whacky" and "mental" gay people are , truth is a lot don't start dating till 5-10 years later than their straight counter parts, so excuse us if we are running around like chickens with our heads cut off. Haha you are excused if you are actually from TorontoThere are no rules this isn't some single middle aged woman's sitcom.

If you like him, I think the next day is appropriate to text to ask if he wanted to go out again.

Calling just seems passe to me but I was born in the 1990's. Exactly.

I don't think "I'm going to slap the brown off your face" would go down well so why would saying it for gay be any different.

OP being ok with it isn't good because he is encouraging that behaviour, and as much as I hate being PC and an SJW who knows if they are ever accidentally overheard.

People think they keep the homophobia or "joking" racism to their groups, but other people hear that shit and can interpret it wrong, and you can't exactly call someone a pussy for not wanting to hear disparaging remarks about innate characteristics they contain in public.

I can't tell you the amount of times I heard some rando in call their friend a "homo" or "gay" in what they thought were private conversations in public when I was closeted and how shitty it made me feel. 

I think the OP should make sure his friends aren't going around saying that stuff to just anybody, not all of us are Miss Cleo mind readers and are going to interpret it as "friendly" joshing. Yonge and Finch is North York. You are right, in the traditional sense. 

Fuck that amalgamation, haha. It's hard to get your point across, by Toronto I meant all the boroughs, I call the "original" Toronto, "Old" Toronto to avoid confusion.

My little town had the same thing happen, I grew up in Bolton, then moved to Palgrave, and now it's all called Caledon(there are like 15 different towns in Caledon). The west side of my town  is considered long distance to call(literally charges you long distance to call the west side); and also would take me longer to drive to than Toronto.  

Godda love the confusion conglomerating municipalities creates. Haha you are just a New England whore :P
 
Joking. You have to go in late when they've marked them down most of them are over $5. But good idea if you are up late or don't mind eating food from yesterday!Family to an extent.

I grew up in the countryside so there was very little if anything, and I honestly thought being gay was super rare so I decided to hide it / not seek support.

My sister told me I ruined the family at 18, and my brother didn't talk to me for about 2 years; not ignoring just stopped bothering interacting with me as much.

Both my parents took it really well, but the support was absent because my sister was too busy having children out of marriage / with dead beat losers. Good I don't think he even sees me as gay considering the way he treats me, I think he even forgets; talks about girls. Rough patches are normal in any relationship; romantic/ platonic.

Maybe just ask him what he thinks about the future in a non accusatory / aggressive way.

I feel having talks about the future is healthy for a long term relationship and ever once in a while get serious with my boyfriend about what we both want in life, even if it's repetitive answers. I can't get over Dion, I never will, I wish he was the LP leader. He always manages to look confused / constipated. 20 or 15[JIM - Il est trop tard](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dk0LCmPtpSA) yes french title, absolutely no lyrics, this guy makes very depressing / heavy sounding instrumentals sampling older music. He is great, and there is more to music than just what comes out of America. You'd think it was an American that produced this anyway. 

[Zion I - Make U Fly](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=gwd5qP6v-A0) hiphop, just listen its sad, it's not typical, they put a great amount of effort into their instrumentals and meaning. 

[Matryoshka - Niedela](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=mnmbPLC-iUU) - Japanese Downtempo/ triphop. Really fucked up video

[Glen Porter - 5 AM](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=iV98MpubQIM) or anything by him, he is rock like, so if you like Nirvana you may like it, no lyrics, but it's sad(the audio clips make my friend uncomfortable). If this guy wanted to make standard pop rock he would/ could be very famous, super talented guy. Could be marketable if he didn't have such fucked up connotations to his music. 

[Lil Ugly Mane - Throw Dem Gunz](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=t99r8JSdI7s) cloud hiphop, before you judge, this guy isn't a "thug" , his songs are a social commentary and are pretty deep/meaningful and sad. People always overlook hiphop. It's almost "satirical"

Tried to make it diverse



They're both old relics of what music was confined to being in the past.

Dylan has an annoying voice and I really don't find him that talented, his music is basic and stoney beyond belief.

I hate Neil because he's a Canadian that got all involved in American politics. Southern Man was completely uncalled for Mr.Young, you grew up in Canada and have no business sticking your nose in the politics of a country you've just called your home.

[Neil Young - Born in Ontario](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1woTG_DaTuw) not New England/ the Midwest, bleh and that voiceNeil Young is a douche and no I'm not wrong, he wrote Southern Man 4 years into being in the United States. I've been dating a guy from Alabama for a year, and we are going to end up moving to America, does that mean I can start writing songs about racial tensions in the U.S acting like I'm American too? The guy is fake.

As a Canadian he is a loser for pretending to be an American. He also wrote that Ontario song as an insult to Ontario, it's fucking horrible, great nod to the country that raised him / inspired him. I have personal reasons to hate Neil Young. Just another Canadian leaving his country and pretending to be American. He's an old school Justin Bieber. GB Monroe is awesome, Sour Balls is great hahaahhaa, in all seriousness it is. Haha I tried to tell /r/Canada that the refugees don't give a fuck about Canada and nobody believed me.

Delusional people we are, Canada is cold and fucking blows donkey dick for quarters.Wynning!Yes, they all scoffed when I mentioned that refugees were having a hard time adjusting to Finland because of the weather, and that they may have a hard time in Canada.

Everyone acted like Vancouver was the only place getting refugees and that it's a "paradise". Overcast, mild and damp weather is not paradise..... these Syrians would rather take their chance on landing in a much more temperate climate. Or that a cold climate isn't a big enough deterrent, but it is, people do not like the cold. Humans are not meant to be living in Canada. 

Canadian weather is only for the hearty , I will give us that, it takes a tough attitude to live here in the winter, even if you are a 76 year old grandma. 

True story, slaves from the underground railroad went back to the South OFTEN after arriving in Canada, it is that inhospitable during the winter. So sad her for it isit's impossible, now go fuck yourselfYes it was on an old account, I don't post songs I really like in multiple subreddits anymore, I was a bad dog and learnt my lesson with the rolled up newspaperban

I just realized the &lt;---- and the answer is the amount of upvotes, I've been giving actual answers to these questions.

Maybe I am a liberal. I've never fawned over straight guys, I grew up thinking I was the only gay person in a 100 km radius. 

There is literally more sexual tension between me and girls than me and straight guys. She's got moose blood Rose are red

Violets are blue

I'm a homo

are you too?my uncle and my cousin and her best friendsdoniz konow waht tlis sayWell where is the money going to come from to provide the proper infracstructure. The fabled moneygroves of the Sundarbans?

No one should be surprised and there is nothing that can be done about it without some cashhhhhh.Us Canadians will grasp at anything that makes winter seem more bearable.

Sure a heat wave. Better only wear my windbreaker for this one.They really hate dolphin and whaleFifa and corruption go together like flies on shitAustralia has a capital region and the people can vote there, DC is the only one that does that. I heard he is starting to loose his marbles. if you are gay they dogas plant enthusiastsThe [answer](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=WeYsTmIzjkw) for every mistake the Liberals make after legalization. how the fuck does a 22 year old make six figures....that makes absolutely no sense unless you are entrepreneur/ your parents gave you a business / hooked you up with a job, I can't think of a single career(that isn't you running your own business) where you would make that much money that quickly? Like honestly how?

22 years, that means 4 years of school(less since you are already working), which means you most likely didn't even get a masters. Probs works as a Supervisor at MacDanalds.

I made 30,000 when I was 22; made less this year actually from being in between jobs/ going back to school. I was pretty fucking stocked when I made that much and actually got taxed more than usual. I just don't understand the need to lie.

30,000 at 22 is pretty fucking good IMO. Haha. I never once felt the need to times that by five online.  No need to lie. Having a job and education at 22 is pretty good to me. 

I think I only made 23,000 this year, OP must think I'm a piece of shit. :)What do you mean Linux admin? Like you work for Linux? Cause I thought they were freeware.... and it was crowd-source created for free?

I can believe people with no post-secondary getting jobs in IT...etc, buddy of mine actually is making pretty decent money, got a job right out of highschool doing graphics for a skate company then somehow got scouted by a porn company(I think he makes like 78,000 or something). So I guess it's believable, he taught himself everything and was able to demonstrate his skills enough to get a job. 

But I don't understand the position Linux admin?

Ok so excuse me, but I am not familiar with the title or IT in general. Does that just mean that a large company that uses Linux hired you to be an administrator for their computer systems that use Linux?

Or do you actually work for linux? what the hells a Dan Savage?Wow the guy has a God Loves Ugly album..... wtf.... gay guys are supposed to have shitty taste in music.

and ATCQ man slug is one of my favourite rappers, seen him twice, been listening to God Loves Ugly for way TOO long, never gets old, haha loved seeing that on the shelf.

I don't mind Mos Def either, but I would expect that since he's more popular, that Atmosphere album just really shocked me. its just I don't see wax versions of it ever.

I feel really bad being a digital file type music person, it's my life but I don't own a single record, only evidence I have is an external disk drive full of files from 10 years plus, just not the same as having physical records. Any Carter's ,that is what got me hooked, and I usually hate mainstream hiphopHaha glad to see someone likes Mr.Green too.That's not even that bad haha. I usually like backpacker / conscious hip hop. But

I'm a sucker for 90's poppy hiphop, sometimes I listen to some pretty embarrassing shit.

[Skee Lo](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ryDOy3AosBw)

[Whoomp there it is](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Z-FPimCmbX8) haha

[Naughty by Nature](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=qA2_-eQ26tY)

Real guilty pleasure stuff. 

For newer stuff anything with a Three 6 Mafia vibe I like, and being a cracker from the countryside in Canada means I really can't relate to any of it. 

[Pouya](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=7qbr2RmZegQ) I really like some of his songs, even though its shit lyrics, made by a little dumbass kid from Florida. 

You know REAL EMBARRASSING.

He's a Christian dude.... you can't be a Christian and not think it's a sin. I'm dating one, his opinion is God really doesn't give a shit, and that though it's a "sin" it's a lesser sin. I'm sure your friend has the same opinion.

Basically it's sinful because it doesn't equate to reproduction and is only based on giving into wanting "pleasure"; acting on the actual gay sex. Which again, aren't even that big of a deal in the bible.

God put us on the Earth to reproduce, that is the reason, that is what the good ol' Bible say, gay people don't reproduce, of course Christians think it's wrong.

But a Christian "wrong" is different from an "agnostic/atheist" "wrong". I'm starting to realize that; I'm agnostic, and just from talking to my boyfriend....etc, it seems the word means something different and doesn't come from judgement.

If a non-faithful person says they think something is wrong, it means they actually think there is something "wrong" and judge worthy about it, it's different to a Christian isn't it? Don't people just think "Well he can take that up with God" and move on; therefore no judgment allowed, and aren't they not allowed to judge you anyway, isn't that God's place?
I don't know, but thats my non sensical two cents

TL DR;If I think something is wrong with what somebody does; as a non believer, I feel I can judge people based on it and my idea of "wrong" is my personal decision,

To Christians "God" decides what's wrong and passes judgement so it seems like they are very capable of thinking something is wrong based on the word of God, but can "personally" think to themselves its not their place to judge and that's for God to do.I think I'm associating them with the other acts I mentioned cause they were all on the radio at the same time when I was a kid?

I didn't realize they had this much love.I don't like Hopsin personally, I just thought more people liked him.

I think my idea of embarrassing is different; could be where I live.

Naughty by Nature is still on the radio all the time where I live, like I hear them daily, not embarrassing, but I guess I considered it more "pop" than most other people do.

 I have no idea why it gets so much radio play where I live but they're always on three stations so I guess I have associations with pop music and it. 

Could be because where I live the police are called the OPP.
 He also created the Universal Child Care benefit, something that greatly benefits my sister... a single mom..

Without Harper she would be out $300 a month to spend on her children. 

She doesn't support abortion, and didn't get one, like many other girls would to make "their" life better, she put the life of another human being above hers.

I don't get what you are on about, all this antiharper bs from /r/Canada is really starting to get it me, it's incredibly undemocratic for such a hivemind to form.

What about the Liberals/NDP makes them better?

Canada is one of the most radicalized ; for Islam, countries in the Western world, we have more ISIS fighters than the U&gt;S does and they have 10x the population. We ISIS and other terrorist cells in every major city. Many independent reports have said that 1/100 Syrian refugees are undercover ISIS fighters.... that means Harper is right to do C-51 and to stop the Syrian refugee process in the spring.

Do you know how many Canadians have committed terorrist attacks? Killed innocent people abroad? A lot. 

His government has been in power during 4 foiled terrorist attacks.

The fact he is actually taking the threat seriously, shows he is a moral person. If he was amoral he would pander to public opinion and let an attack happen, which again, would have happened 4 TIMES. Look it up.

I think making Canadians feel safe in Public spaces is a lot more important than making a few "immigrants" few welcome, the needs of the many outweigh the needs of the few and it is so True.

Imagine if the Toronto 18 plot went through, how much tax money would be wasted on security AFTER that, how many people would be afraid of doing things in Public? How much would that affect Canadian society.... A LOT.

There is proof that some terrorist are using the Syrian crisis as a way to move around the world, like literal proof; again look it up, so.... I don't want those people in my country at the moment.

An indepdent party verifies refugees, it's not Canadian Government, we are just delegated and have no say in who is sent to us, there is a reason for everything Harper has done, people just aren't updated on current events to realize it. Or can't put two and two together. Harper doesn't want to scare the public and be like " terrorist, terrorist" like they do in the U.S, but that is the reason he does what he does.

There is a real threat, that he is actively preventing, and us Canadians stupidly bitch about him infringing on our rights, I think the right to a happy peaceful life is more important than the right to be able to be involved in terrorist activities without being monitored by the government.

I give up my right to full privacy and "equality" knowing that I can go to Toronto, take a subway, and know that the Government is actually trying to prevent real radical threats from happening.

Look it all up please, I'm not even anti-Islam at all, I come from Islamic countries, the threat is real, and Harper is the only leader with enough balls to actually approach it, regardless of PC hippie Canadian public complaining about violations of their rights that DON'T and WILL NEVER affect them, ever.

A terrorist attack, just one, may not kill a lot of people, but it would AFFECT every Canadian in their DAILY lives, that's what makes it so important, he isn't dumb, and doesn't think that there is going to be massacres....etc, he just knows that an attack would make going out in public/events a lot harder, and would negatively affect Canadian life style in all facets. I say deport them, I say monitor them. I don't care if that can be applied to me, I'm not a terrorist, so it will never affect me. They also say the Conservatives are racist.

Fact : 2010 we have 280,000 immigrants to Canada, more than any year in recent history.

Fact : The Liberals actually cut back immigration in the 1990's while they were in power during a tiny" economic crisis". Canada is facing a huge crisis now; that's not harpers fault it's the WORLDS fault, and we are letting in more immigrants than ever before. Ya the conservatives are sooooo racist.

They also made it easier for people with just TRADES skills to immigrate here, that means the restrictions became EASIER, people who don't have any post secondary education can move here to work in the trades.... wow he is so racist, he is letting in stupider immigrants.... makes no sense at all to think he's racist.

The only thing I don't agree with Harper on is it's environmental policy; but everyone who is against him because of it is a hypocrit who lives a lifestyle that destroys the planet anyway unless you are off the grid growing your own food you don't care about the environment, and on Israe; he supports them too muchl.

Oh ya, on your support for parents comments, he also did that organized sports tax credit, making it easier for poor kids to play sports..... ya what a douche bag.

Sorry to go on a rant, I just hate when people claim shit that they don't even back up with fact, people just spew " He is racist", without even realizing he has let in the most immigrants/ made it easier for less skilled immigrants to move here. 

He wanted to help Syrian refugees, then that report came out on how many radicalized people are using it as an excuse to immigrate and that must have affected his decision for halting processing in the Spring.

He's not perfect, but I trust the guy a lot more than the Libs, they are the ultimate pandering party, they just say whatever the public wants to hear.

If the Libs comes into power, I cannot wait to see the shit show that follows and the hivemind change to anti-Liberals. Yup, again Harper is a douche, every politician is a douche, he is just the best douche we have so far.

I do like Mulcair actually, a lot, I just feel the NDP may be irresponsible; more so than the Conservatives.

We can't forget some of the crap that Harper has done; unintentionally, that has been pretty crappy. The closing of science research libraries, and funding was poorly handled, the intent was to save money and actually keep the research but somehow it all got fucked up, which was really bad in my opinion, the scientific community should be fully left a lone.

He has is pro-Israel, and wants to give more funding to the military, which I don't agree with at all.

But those two issues to me, are less important than other issues, and immigration is the least important issue to me, it affects the least amount of Canadians, most of us were born here, so I don't see why it's placed at the top of the list.

Environmental policy is something that I do see as very important, is the one thing that I sometimes hate the Cons for, but they do it from an economic standpoint, and aren't completely horrendous, the world as a whole is destroying the environment, so being truly "green" is very hard. It's not like the Libs/NDP would do much more to help in that respect.Sometimes if it looks like they put too much effort into how they dress I can, but I always give them a chance, some of them aren't as "vain" and "shallow" as you may think and just generally enjoy that crap. I just tend to judge people on that really easily/am embarrassed to be seen with people that are dressed really well. Unless they are foreign, then I sort of just give them a get out of jail free card because they may be from a society that does that a lot more. I thought they just went to temples/mosques and or Muslim education schools.

Arabs aren't the only muslims, my family is from the Balkans and there are a lot of muslims there that are "european" in lifestyle, writing...etc. Everything is done in the Latin/ Cyrillic Alphabet. Look up Bosnia, Macedonia, Albania. /r/roastme , /r/blunderyears , /r/facepalm , /r/whitepeoplefacebook , /r/pettyrevenge , /r/nottimanderic&lt;--- nice collection of different types of humour/r/listentothis for music is alright too if you like listening to random songs that people generally approve of; it sort of filters out shit but not always.

/r/nottheonion for funny real news articles

Honestly just click the random button for 30 minutes, and subscribe to subs you like, you will get a lot of crappy ones, but will find at least a couple that are pretty interesting.

/r/blackpeopletwitter is funny too it's not racist either its whitepeoplefacebook but for black people, just funny posts that people make that might be "stereotypical" or "more to their culture", all in good fun. 

/r/cringe is alright

or /r/cringeanarchy

/r/ThatHappened is good for funny stories.this, and I think the site may be under pressure to avoid linking copyright violations just for it's sake too. Ya I just think reddit may not want to be a community; due to it's size, that links to a lot of things that may infringe just because it makes them look bad? I don't know, it's a wild guess.

I don't care about reposts at all, I actually will answer the same question in askreddit a million times and try to say something different.

People can't absorb everything this site has to offer so reposts are almost crucial to me. Funnier than them all . Correct, I'm not arguing with you, it was just a crackpot theory I had they did for maybe making the site "look better" I have no idea, from a business perspective.

Piratebay haha, what a shit show that was. 

Thanks for bringing the google search up, that didn't even occur to me, google is the *internet* to me haha, and of course everything illegal is webcrawled and added to their searches, how stupid of me to forget, sometimes things just fly over your head. Sometimes the answer is so obvious you don't even see it.

Jeopardy had a category the other day that stunned everybody, the answer was literally in the question; Trebek even said this, it seemed like such an easy category, but under pressure people were choking up.

Of course that freak from DC got most of them because he's a genius. I'll never be seen as equal/comfortable with others as heterosexuals, at least in my lifetime, I'm already 25 that ship has sailed. I really like him too actually, he seems like he might be funny.

I call people freaks when they are abnormally talented at anything, it's a compliment. Think of a 90s valley girl talking haha.

haha I was gonna call him Dave but I knew that was wrong so that could have influenced the "freak" too.

Me and my family were joking that Trebek was going to start introducing him as the "DC Freak".

The guy is just so fucking randomly knowledgeable, and quick. Have you noticed he buzzes in before Trebek finishes sometimes; like 1/2 second before he is done talking. This is one of the harder ones to tell, I'm going to say Cons or Libs for sure, going to be minority obviously; I hope not but I don't think so. Messy eating, I mean getting anything on your face/hands, so I basically hate eating finger foods, and hate seeing other people at them.

I know they're just enjoying life, and it's not really causing harm, but seeing sauce on your face or hands makes me want to vomit. The sauce reminds me of your saliva , and bacteria in your mouth, and seeing that mixed with the food I'm eating really grosses me out. I'm not even that much of a germaphobe either, I can share drinks/food, I just hate seeing it, I'm the same way with meat, I can't stand seeing blood or anything that reminds me it was alive, but I don't mind eating them. 

I also hate loud eaters.

When I was a kid I used to tell my parents that we should all eat in cubicles because I couldn't stand how everyone ate, and that way we could talk to eachother still but don't have to see/hear eachother as much. No I like him a lot, way more than Ken Jennings, he has a really unique personality.

I think they can press it, but I was just pointing out he does this often, meaning he needs a lot less time to think about the questions than the other contestants.

I think speed + accuracy kind of dictate how knowledgeable the contestants are, he is clearly being triggered the answers by key words combined with the category and doesn't need to hear the full sentence to guess how it ends/ what the answer is.

I really want him to beat Ken Jenning's record, like really bad. in Canada they are called black without any eyes batted. Most black people here are from the caribs, so they really don't like being called "African" because they are proud of being from the islands and find it racist to just be assumed to be from Africa.

The term implies that you are African culture in Canada, so you just say black.

We also call Indians/Pakistani's/Bangledeshi's/ Anyone with brown skin brown.

Our government census even says "black". We also say "white" for white skin.

It's really not racist, at all, I find people racist who get all worked up about it, it means they are seeing the other people as different who need to be "protected", they're just people to me, and if their skin is black, they're black, it's an accurate descriptor. Sometimes Wheel of Fortune; haha because Jeopardy is after it.

We used to have a funny one called "You bet your ass" in Canada that I liked a lot.

Cash cab, but sometimes it's way too slow.

Pretty much nothing is on par with Jeopardy, Who Wants to be a Millionaire was way to slow.

I love how Jeopardy is fast, and actually get annoyed when the contestants don't get through all the questions.

How about you? Are there any other worthy ones out there? If some beastly chick hit me, I'd most likely kick her, so many girls are bigger than me. I'm 5 9 160 lbs, plenty of females are larger than that. 

So it is sexist, it's saying girls can't defend their own against some guys, when plenty of chicks could kick my ass, why can't I smack them back, what makes an angry chick a delicate flower? Coffee being bad for you.

Meat being bad for you.

Tap water isn't clean; most of your bottled water and bottled beverages use tap water.

In Canada the idea that our leader is racist is something people run with without providing proof that is actually racist. I second this.

Long beards are pretty gross.

I don't like moustaches unless they have a beard accompanied. 

Just look like you take care of it and you are golden, it's pretty easy to do that. 

Smooth looks too boyish Any language or just English?People Under the Stairs, RUN DMC. I think you can without food for like a week, but water only a couple of days. 

It depends on how fat you are too/ healthy/ your immune system/ your metabolsim I think.Creativity + knowledge of music theory makes a good mix. oh ya it's a bit ridiculous.

Whenever I hear a Canadian being like I'm "Asian-Canadian" or "Indian-Canadian", I ask them if they were born here, if they say "yes", I say "you are just Canadian".

You can further describe yourself as asian Canadian; lower case, black Canadian...etc, the emphasis should be on the country not were your grandparents came from.

I'm literally from 10 different countries, it would take me forever to recognize my heritage, and is quiet dumb.

I think the fact Americans' call black people "African-American" versus just "American" or a black American really put the emphasis on the "African" and away from the "American". Nothing about black Americans is like Africans, they are culturally and even genetically the same as the other Americans partially/more so than Africa.

A lot of them are mixed with white/native, and have been removed from Africa for over 200 years, that is enough to say "ok you aren't really African anymore". 

It really gives a "me and you" vibe when you describe like that, just say American. Stop walking in the middle of a busy foot traffic area.Either have I, I've been hit by them when drunk though; twice, and I had no idea who they were....etc, they thought I was somebody else.

Didn't hurt bad, but it's kind of a double standard. I think women who are beasts can handle getting punched, I'm non violent anyway, but if a chick attacked me I would defend myself, I feel kicking their legs would do the least damage, obviously you don't wanna deck them in the face. I was born in Canada, my mom was born in Macedonia, and my Dad was born in England, I really don't feel connected to Macedonia... England yes because I'm Canadian and our cultures are similar.

The only thing Macedonian about me is I like the music/eat the food.

I feel identifying with another nationality takes away from the country you live in. At least in Canada, a lot of people have this "the country my heritage from is better" mentality, which can get annoying. It's good to be proud of your heritage, but an Indian-Canadian who was born here, and goes to india, is going to find out very quickly how "Canadian" they are. the sOn a gay forum of all forums, I was bitching about how everyone is on the Liberal/NDP bandwagon in my country; Canada, for the upcoming election. Really strange guilding, did not expect that on that subreddit. No change rooms are kind of a gross environment for me, and most guys in them aren't even in good shape. I don't go to the gym, but I play hockey, if anything it makes me want to be straight.

I also hate the awkwardness of it, because I really am not turned on in that situation and hate thinking that I make other people uncomfortable.

Same thing goes with sharing a hotel room with a straight guy, they make it awkward, I have no intention of pulling any moves. I really like R and B; not pop R and B. Canada brings poutine, and candied maple.My opinion is countries should be clubs that you "join" almost, and anybody can join. Race/cultural heritage should be irrelevant, to me it creates more segregation. Obviously you can add to your new country with your old customs, which is great, but people should embrace the country they live in.

I only say this because Canada is like 10% Italian, and virtually everyone of them identifies as Italian, and will openly blast Canada; even if they're 3rd generation... it's kind of annoying, please move back home if you hate Canada so much. Ya that sucks, not every country is like this, Canada you just have to basically be here for a winter and you are Canadian.

It seems countries with a longer history; Canada has a long history but it goes back with natives so thats a whole nother issue.

but here you can be "Canadian" relatively easily, so I don't know why people don't take the opportunity, people are literally ashamed of Canada because it is seen as a "dopey and lame" country, well I'm proud to be dopey and lame.Ya wasn't being a dick saying I would if everyone was ripped, just saying would you been turned on if you were allowed to change at curves???

Haha, :D obviously we aren't attracted to every guy, and I can see enough "dick" if I wanted to on my own without having to creep a locker room.

I will tell you this, just to be fair, there is a lot of "locker room" fetish within the gay community, a lot of porn revolves around it, it just doesn't do it for me, I've played organized sports my whole life, they smell really bad and are full of bacteria not my cup of tea.  I think the fetish developed out of guys that have never played sports and don't realize how disgusting they are, they smell like piss. 

I'll also admit I don't mind seeing guys at the beach or at a pool, but I'm not really creeping, much in the same way if a girl with a nice body in a bikini walked by, you would "looK", it's not really creepy, just admiring something that looks nice. Honestly does anybody have tribal music like this, or no any, with the downtempo but chanting in the background?https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=2fzNBVn0bKY

I get weird after I orgasm, completely turned off, and just want to zone out. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=lAcO0SSGVHE&amp;list=PLwnZVWlybns1_rULc36O2KlJXx9qoBd33

Darker playlist I made, kind of perfect for Hallowe'en, everything has a creepy vibe.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PxFaJqxT19Q&amp;list=PLwnZVWlybns1b70y6A-ITnrEXqLLiuVJZ

Specifically a Fall playlist. Tried my best to sum up the feeling, it's all songs people won't recognize though, good to open up to new sounds though.Been using reddit for 2 years, it's always had a hivemind, that's the way humans are.

I don't let it censor what I say, I actually enjoy getting downvoted, it means people bothered to read what I wrote, if they don't agree with it who cares.

I actually never downvote, I upvote every response people make to me, even if they continue to downvote me in our discussion.

I'm open to other peoples opinions, not everybody is though. That's just HUMANITY, not reddit.oh god is this normal grindr conversation?When I was younger, hockey, baseball, soccer, golf, badminton, tennis and lacrosse.

Now it's jut tennis and hockey, I wanted to join a soccer league this summer but I was too lazy, and I played baseball for a couple games then stopped going; a bit too homophobic. 

I used to snowboard but it's too expensive.

too, tooo, toooo tooo too too[TR\u2206NSITIONS - SOULUL\u2206R VIBR\u2206TIONS](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=roA7rAfr4lg) &lt;-- only Indian inspired; Sitar.

[Fakear - Darjeeling](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dk8FwKI1nA4) &lt;-- again only Indian inspired.

[Oriental Job - Gramatik](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZEdmbZkJNP0) &lt;-- Indian inspired. 

I don't know many actual Indian musicians. Besides traditional music.[Darjeeling - Fakear](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dk8FwKI1nA4)

because it was the answer to a question I answered 2 minutes ago.[Penthouse Penthouse](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=iw2nPjlc29Y)

[Shipwreck](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=aoUKVI6Qcvw)

[Koi](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=SMu9dGm2bE0)

[Funwari-chan](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8T6HGgIsjQc)

[Madijuwon](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=nvfpFrnqQos)

[Kidkanevil](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=YkdCHN4c_CQ)

[m ai t r o](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=WzxGPit_8UQ)

[Yppah](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xTJhs6ua3Bk)

they're along similar lines.Maybe he was addicted, or using something too which is why he was running drugs, my buddy used to do the same and he was abusing the crap out of the stuff, the only reason he was doing it was to get more drugs. 

I don't agree with the moral implications of selling hard drugs like meth and cocaine, it's just really immoral to sell that stuff even if it was in your past, it's pretty dangerous/addictive/destructive stuff. Maybe he didn't realize that, but to me it's a sign that he sort of doesn't care about other people, even if it was in the past.

I used to sell "weed" and even then I felt guilty because I didn't want anybody to get high and drive then crash. There are moral implications to drug dealing that you have to get past, you need to either not care about the fact your are harming other people, or be too stupid to realize what you are doing.

Hopefully he was just too stupid, but I personally don't agree with anybody that does something that bad, meth and cocaine actually kill.  This won't be a popular opinion, but as someone who has been "there", I know the type of people that do this stuff and they're generally not good people.

But people can change. Hey, same shit happens to me, I made him show me everything on his phone, found out he was doing same shit on facebook and I was pretty pissed.

He also has photos on his phone of himself that are provocative and make no sense for him to have. 

His phone also has a lock on it.

I am still very suspicious of him and let him know that if I catch him talking to guys again we are done, and if he gives me an STI he's going to get his ass kicked.

Cheaters are liars, so don't expect them to be honest with you, what he is doing is suspicious and the fact he gets angry about it makes him more suspicious, my SO didn't get mad he was "nervous" and happy to show me everything. 

Just be careful, a lot of people are gonna say you are being paranoid, but there is no reason to want things to be so private, what could he possibly have to hide from you that isn't worth letting you know about? 

Some things should be kept private yes, but anything on a cellphone/computer shouldn't need to be "private", what could you possibly be doing that you wouldn't want other people to know? 

Internet and cellphone activity are two things that really shouldn't involve anything that you wouldn't want your SO to know, unless you are taking pictures of your crap, there really shouldn't be a reason to hide things.... I never understood the " I want privacy" line, there is nothing that should be private on your phone.

Could someone give me an example of something that they have on their phone that is "personal" enough you wouldn't want your SO to know about it? I thought your SO is supposed to be an extension of you, so knowing their personal things even if embarrassing is a bit crucial.

Just don't understand the mentality of wanting to hide things. Whoever I date has access to everything I own, the most embarrassing thing on my phone/computer is porn.... sooooo embarrasssinggg. try out Yppah if you like them, or Tycho(you most likely already know them though)tred crack rap welcome to the pap papppp!Stuffed bell peppers so good, but if you put enough porc in it it can become unhealthy and cheese, it's so fucking good though mmmmm. I almost don't consider them healthy because they're so tasty, it doesn't make sense. 

OP try it, it's almost like a cabbage roll without the sauce. Whoever uses the term "boyfriend material" isn't worth your time, what is this fucking 1990's California Valley Highschool?

Yer like so not boyfriend material, I don't want no scrubs.  Fuuuuaaaaacccckkkkk offffHaha, stuffed peppers is a dish from my "heritage"(Bosnia, Macedonia, Greece and Serbia), my family makes it all the time, we go overboard with the cheese and pork; just realized I spelled it the French way earlier thanks bilingual labels Canada. 

We never put beans it in it though, usually just rice, paprika, cheese and sausage, sometimes topped with feta. Haha ya, OP should look up Balkan food, its all relatively healthy; minus the cheese and smoked meats, and is really tasty.

Beans is a really good alternative to meat, much healthier too, so that is a good suggestion, I feel it would give it a mexican flavour, Balkan people eat a lot of beans but they usually eat them in tomato sauce and they're prepared in a completely different way that makes them taste a bit strange; at least to me I don't like the bean dishes.

But they're really good for you and are tasty.

For ours though, it's about 1/3 meat, 1/3 rice 1/3 cheese, haha so not the healthiest. Throw a shit ton of feta on top and you have cardiac arrest in a "healthy" looking dish. Can someone tell me why they wouldn't want their SO to know their passcode to their phone.

I brought this up with my boyfriend, he gave it to me, I forget it, never look on his phone, but the fact he gave it to me let me trust him.

I asked him to explain why he had a lock on it, I want actual reasons that make sense for me to trust people.

He said that it's because he has a lot of personal information on his phone; banking apps....etc, and doesn't want to loose it and worry about someone gaining access. He has a decent amount of money in his bank account so it made sense, I'm poor as fuck so I never feel the need to protect my banking information, if someone wants to pay my debt for me go ahead.

But ya, that is a reason why some people lock their phone, they also may have selfies/pictures they just don't want others to see, that are relatively harmless. I mean the idea of a stranger seeing some of the photos I send to my boyfriend makes me cringe, and them reading my text messages so it makes sense.

I'd just try to use his phone in front of him; leave yours somehwere, and ask him what the new passcode is in a non-accusatory and casual way.

"Shit I don't have my phone I need to check my bank account to see if transfer went through", pick it up " Oh whats your passcode?".

If he doesn't want to give it to you ask him why.They're not gonna hire you at Starbucks, try McDonalds. Nice v-neck and chin strap, it nice of you to let people know you are a douche so they can avoid you. You're Nefertiti necklace isn't reflecting enough blinding light into my eyes.I didn't know Michael Angelo was alive and painting peoples faces.Just get your skoal and beer and enjoy your day off work. Thanks for making sure the picture is blurry.So I should lie? Sometimes giving another perspective can help her understand.

I never told her to hate her father, or that he was a horrible person, just a major fuck up/ selfish thing to do. I'm sure her Dad was incredibly confused, but sometimes you need to look at it from another perspective.

She didn't explicitly say her Brother was a homophobe, he may think he was being deceitful and is really confused about it all/ hurt, I would be a little upset if I found out my Dad was gay.&gt;I should know to not have sex this often

No, there is nothing wrong with what you did, it's how you did it. Obviously protection is key, and now you know to use it in the future.

There is no shame in wanting to have sex. What makes you think he wants to give you one?murcaDerrrprprprprprprprpYa, and I said give him time, he is young, 17, most likely has homophobic friends, most likely is upset about the deceit, so maybe just talk it out with him and fully hear his side of the story, don't even argue with him, just try and hear him out.

I don't think he should write him off, or you should, or your mom, and that they should support him, I was just saying their is a solid reason to be upset, I experienced this twice, with four different cousins, they all took it differently, all of them but one came around.

Of course they had happy times, and were a family, it just was never going to last, and was set up for failure which is what's wrong with the situation, it can be seen as deceitful because he wasn't being honest about the reasons for marriage; depending on if he knew he was gay or not.

He got a family out of it, and kids, your Mom is obviously happy to have you guys, he is obviously happy to have your guys.

But in the end, your Brother has a reason to be upset, so all you can do is hear him out, and wait for him to mature a bit, 17 year old males can be extremely homophobic, I was 17 only 7 years ago, so I'm sure things haven't changed tooo much since I was a teenager.

I can remember virtually every male was a tad homophobic, some where accepting, but I could see their opinion being different when it comes to a family member, especially a parent. That would really hurt.

Have you talked to your Brother about why? Does he just give you non-specific reasons like you said "that's gross"....etc, is there any way you can get him to be more explicit in why he has a problem with it?Alright well I guess I deserved it. I didn't realize I was such a shitty persobj'espere que tu avais appr\u00e9ci\u00e9 ton sandwichI did, I just never responded to people who sent me dick pics/ ass pics without soliciting them, haha, so I never go this deep into the rabbit hole, and am glad I didn't, that is way too quick to decide to hook up in my opinion.R.Mullen, and Good Like That are my favourites but there's plenty of others.

Yppah has more of a traditional instrumental sound and is a lot more experimental than Tycho, but he's pretty acceptable to most peoples ears, virtually everything he makesHey nice song, though it can be classified as trip hop I think it'd do better in /r/chillhop or /r/chillmusic because it is more reminiscent of actual hiphop.

I've found certain songs don't do well on /r/triphop if they aren't "dark" enough, if that makes any sense.haha no I meant electronic music that samples it.

Like

[Bayaka - Edamame](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=slYrJNMXBKU)

[Axel Thesloff - Bad Karma](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=knfrxj0T5NY)

[Rone - Bye Bye Macadam](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kfoJUeyMsOE)

[Cusp - Jespy](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fo1e1HQC9BU)

[Superpoze - Iceland Sound](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=rTz26pKS4A8)

[Jazz Cartier](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=i2t3cj3SE78)

[BNJMN x Krs. x Dutchboy](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8v8JNaX7J6M)

[Hi-Rez](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=771FbVwRmSs)

[Nae Sano](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ea7VaRU275s)

[Lox Chatterbox](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=a1B7--OQHxI)

[Lyrics Born](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dbPxZQBuSIk) &lt;- pretty fast

[Sunspot Jonz](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ChINckcDDvY) is melodic and fast

[Eyedea](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=jAWrscplyOA) &lt;-- literally one of the fastest rappers I know, he is dead now though.

[Dark Time Sunshine](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=0_rnDXq9XOU) &lt;-- fast, good story telling, not all of them are melodic, but this song fit the ball.  It's mainly Swamburger that does it. 

[J Live](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=XEx2T1NLsqw) &lt;-- good story telling, melodic, and relatively fast

[Asheru](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tUpAnhFGM_M) &lt;-- relatively fast, melodic

[Talib Kweli](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=7xk0eGIU0Ys) &lt;- melodic, not super fast, this song is with Asheru.

Not really exactly what you were looking for but you may like. 

[Aesop Rock](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZEBGCOCxLgA)

[Cyne](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tD04ynxNGUY) &lt;-- song I provided talks about a crack deal, but it's referring to black association with drug dealing, and isn't about drug culture, but black American culture. 

[J Live](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=K0i241-2_NE)

[Binary Star](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=__Z4jDgOFTA)

[Little Brother](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=4l0-AMHiCHs) &lt;- honestly Chitlin Circuit and the Minstrel Show are both amazing albums, have nothing to do with drugs, or drug culture. I recommend those albums to anyone, even if they don't like hiphop. 

Virtually all the artists I listen to; minus the odd one, stay out of talking about drugs, and if they do it's mainly pot. I live at home, we just have lots of outdoor sex, thank god I live in the country, and there is a trail in my backyard that goes on for about 2 kilometres that is crown land(government).

Having sex at home with a full house; my brother his girlfriend, my sister , her boyfriend, her two kids, and both my parents, makes it pretty hard to even think about doing it at home. 

People who think living at home with their parents is going to ruin their sex life really need to start looking at the world in a different light. I personally don't think I'd get a long with someone who had a problem with it, they most likely would think they're cool, when they're really not. Anyone that is worried about "lameness" is lame themselves.

Nothing to be ashamed of, life is life, when you're dead nobody is gonna care where you lived or who you fucked, you're just gonna be a rotting corpse being eaten by worms, or a pile of ashes in a tin can, at least you'll look really good then too. God BlessI have a boyfriend haha so maybe that's why, he likes me enough to put up with my crap.

I had two FWB's earlier on in the year, and they were both country boys, so we naturally liked going out into random places, corn field wasn't one of them though haha, that is a good idea though.

We actually boned once on a Maple Syrup farm in the late winter, while they were harvesting, against a pine tree, with cross country skiers skiing by; we were blocked completely I really am not into people watching it actually weirded me out. Haha, can't get more Canadian than that, and we actually both got so cold we didn't finish and just went to Tim Hortons to eat.

Doing it outside is fun if you aren't going to be caught, it feels natural almost.

You'll stick it in soon enough buddy, just enjoy your life as is, and plan for times when your house is empty, or find somebody that doesn't mind going out into the wilderness. I'm really glad my boyfriend is outdoorsy like me, we already spend most of our time outside anyway. &gt;Y'all need Ativan and/or Zyprexa

I doubt there is a connection between GA and being gay. Anxiety in gay men is a result of the environment and pills wouldn't be the greatest fix to the problem.

They need therapy; me too.

Stop pretending like being gay is easy for everyone, because it's not. The anxiety is pretty warranted in my opinion, I personally don't get it anymore, but I had it pretty bad.

Therapy really did the trick. &gt;Just got out of a serious relationship

Ya, nothing will turn you off more than that if you are self confident enough. Glad you can be ok with being alone for a while, I really have trouble with it, but I enjoy my time by myself when I get it.

It's nice to not really have to care about another person for a little while and kind of be selfish towards yourself. Relationships aren't hard work in my opinion, but they're draining at times. [What do you mean?](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hKxCDwCEgao)me

and it's because you are a chicken [a koo koo ka cha, a koo koo ka cha, cha chi cha chi cha chi, craaa, craaa, craaa](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1TphEh0Qgv0)Glad my buddy has fucked up dreams too, haven't creeped you in a while decided to do so.

OP dreams like that are normal, and maybe this is the first time you remember it, people often don't remember their dreams.

I die in almost all of them, and have vivid feelings, that wake me up rather quickly, so I always remember them; they say that's the best way to remember your dream is to be woken up in middle of it if you naturally wake up you won't remember much.

You most likely have had dreams like this and don't realize it.

I had a dream my brother died once, went to the funeral, when I woke up, the dream was so intense, I had a brief 10 seconds were I thought he had been dead for a couple of months, it was a really surreal and scary feeling. 

Really nothing to be worried about. 

Vivid dreams are kind of cool. No problem, I'm just gonna keep my mouth shut on that topic from now oni peel mangoes and eat them like an apple.I'd just try Ebay, it has everything, even the t'ird. two sodasMaybe he's just a short texter in general, lots of guys are. I'd drink it, but it's against my vice principlesI am honestly gonna try this, then I can give the kids my homemade fuck offs. only user to consistently have a controversial symbol next to their comments, somebody is stalking your posts and downvoting everything, it's kind of ridiculous that even I notice it.

Leave john2nhoj alone *howls*Going through the same thing, best thing you can do is just talk to him about it and see how he feels about it all. He can offer some insight for sure into how he became this way, and I doubt that he didn't feel the same way you did at some point.

My boyfriend told me that I'm homophobic and care too much about what other people think yesterday. He noticed that I don't do anything in public with him, I take away his hand from mine when we drive by cars, and supposedly I always am bashing other gay people; don't even notice it myself. Not saying you are, but you may be a bit homophobic still, I know I am, I catch myself bashing gay people on this subreddit sometimes. Just did it 10 minutes ago. 

He's had a lot to say that has made me rethink my behaviour.

He's also from Alabama, and I'm from Ontario; gay marriage has been legal here for over 10 years. So if anybody has a reason to be closeted like you and me are it's him, yet he isn't.

There is just a moment; at least he told me, where you sort of have an epiphany or brain fart and you realize how stupid you are being.

Yet to happen with me.

You'll get there eventually, it just takes a while. I know that people that think like you usually still see homosexuality as "lesser", so that is something you should focus on too. Honestly, you'll find it difficult to want to continue if he shows a sign of you hurting him, so just take it extremely slow at the beginning.

I'm a top, and always go unbelievably slow/ use lots of lube. 

It really does depend on the bottom though, some can handle pain more, some don't mind you taking over and doing what you want, some like it gentle....etc.

So best thing to do is just be really vocal about everything as you are doing it, there is no harm in asking if something feels good/ bad, if they want a certain position....etc.

I normally just go for what I want and ask for approval as I'm doing it and change what I'm doing accordingly, and it doesn't really cause problems. 

I prefer them on their knees; doggy style, because it just is so much easier for me, but I notice a lot of guys want to be on their back for some reason, you have to life their legs up over your arms to get good access. 

Proper access is key to both of you enjoying it, nothing worse than a bottom who is trying to get you to get them from a weird access point. Porno positions aren't always the best, some of them are good though, like one leg on floor other on something a little higher up; like the bed.

Sounds bad, but if a bottom goes into a really "slutty" or "I want it" position it makes everything so much easier, missionary position is annoying as fuck. It's because it was easy to use it as ammo against eachother, I really don't think they "truly" cared about it.

But yes, someone should have said shutup already. 

Show your face for a couple seconds to verify your identity to a female officer and that's about it, issue solved. Yes I realized I derailed everything... forgive me for I am high.

Also agree that dreams have relevancy, but sometimes they're relevant in strange ways.

I used to play COD all the time, right before bed, and I often had dreams where I was basically living a game of Free for All COD in real life, people I know would die in these dreams, and so would I, but it was related to the COD.

OP possibly could have seen a movie, watched something, heard something, read something the day before the dream that actually related to the context, and their brain created the scenario.

But yes, sometimes they are warning you of things, say if you are stressed out about something, or procrastinating, you may have dreams about the repercussions of what you are fearing/avoiding happening. 

My Brothers death dream actually coincided with my Grandpa's funeral, and he had been having major anxiety attacks that had to do with him thinking he was going to die at the time too, so it sort of made sense I had a dream he died, I attended his funeral....etc.


One weird thing that people think is True, is having a dream about your teeth falling out, may signal you are worried about what other people think about you physically, and it's actually quiet a common dream, and quiet a common worry people have.

Wish there was more research on it./u/NetRockyAZ7688 and women... a koo koo ka chaWhat did you just say?No I know, my point was, it was already ok, issue solved already I should have said.

The whole argument of whether they should be allowed is obviously ridiculous if it is in their religion, verification of ID was ever the only issue and it got solved before. 

Thanks though, haha, I guess I should have been more specific, and can see how that can be read as I think the issue was identity purposes. But that's basically the only "logical" issue with it, and it's already solved. is Belgo from Belgium?

And congrats, I'm sure the Queen shed a tear when she heard you're allegiance being pledged!Vice has other problems, namely hiring too many hipsters. As much as I want to vote NDP, I honestly am so "unsure" of them, that I don't think I can, so this seems pretty True.

A lot of people like the idea, but don't want to take the chance. There is the Caledon Trailway around Belfountain.

You can take your dog to the actual park there but it's honestly not that big, and I think it has to be on a leash, I rarely see dogs there.

The Caledon Trailway is the best place to take dogs. 

Honestly anywhere in Caledon is good, Belfountain doesn't strike me as particularly more appealing than any other part.  Cheltenham, Caledon Village, Caledon East, Palgrave, Terra Cotta,Cataract, Mono, are all nice and have a lot to offer too.

I live near Palgrave and the trails here are pretty nice, and Albion Hills Conservation area has a lot to offer.(All of these towns mentioned are in Caledon; including Belfountain) The Caledon Trailway is part of the trans-Canada trail, it's an old railway line that got discontinued, and is dog friendly, and offers a lot of views with side trails that diverge.

The awesome thing about it is it has access points all over Caledon, literally all over, I suggest the North part near highway 9 if you can get a map of it, and go towards Tottenham, there are really really unbelievable views from there and it's kept on the hush hush.

You can access it just south of Highway 9 on Mount Hope, Mount Pleasant, Mount Wolfe, Airport Road...etc, basically any North-South road that goes through Caledon, and you can park on the side too.

If you go to Mount Wolfe, Mount Hope, or Mount Pleasant, you head North towards Tottenham, and you have some pretty spectacular views. [This](http://cdn.where.ca/wp-content/uploads/2013/09/Fall-Colours-Toronto.jpg) is literally one of the views near Mount Pleasant.

Then... go to Mount Wolfe, or Mount Pleasant and just drive south for about 2 minutes you will get a view of Toronto and the GTA that looks like [this](https://s-media-cache-ak0.pinimg.com/736x/65/42/75/654275952b25eb7462a2929a0d2e9d15.jpg) that is taken from the top of Mount Wolfe road, not lying, it is worth the visit. I live 2 minutes from there, and go there on days were there are fireworks because you can honestly see fireworks going off in Toronto, Brampton, Vaughan, Markham, Mississauga all at once.

Tomorrow I am going to go and take some pictures of the fall colours from there and I'll try and post it, it really is wroth the visit, and virtually nobody knows about it.Last suggestion is going to the Caledon/Cheltenham Badlands just west of Inglewood(which is at Olde Base Line and Highway 10) it's about fifteen minutes from that area I was suggestion, [this](http://headwatersarts.com/wp-content/uploads/2014/07/caledon.jpg) is what it looks like, they recently closed walking on it to the public, but you can still go and view it.

Haha I'm done tooting my Caledon horn now. I rarely get to brag about my town, it's a rural and really quiet for the most part so there isn't much to brag, but it is beautiful. I have been trying to explain this to my SO from the U.S south, he keeps on asking what the winter/ fall/spring are going to be like, and I'm like "I don't know", I don't know what the summer is going to be like. I don't know anything, it may be hot, it may be cold, it may be wet, it may be dry, it may be sunny, it may be cloudy. 

Ontario literally has the least predictable weather in terms of warmth/cold. We get pretty stable rain/ cloud cover, that is predictable; but droughts/ floods happen too.

We honestly get all the freaking weather related events you could think of, tornadoes, blizzards, heavy thunder storms, droughts, wildfires, even earthquakes; not weather events, the only thing we don't get is hurricanes, but even those have hit us as tropical storms and don'e major damage.

Then in the winter we somestimes get arctic weather conditions.

This province is schizophrenic.

Wasn't it pretty hot out like 2 weeks ago, now they're saying it may even snow in Barrie this week. &gt;I love small/rural towns just because of the nature

Caledon is nice, but don't underestimate the city, life there is more convienent. I will list some shitty things about Caledon.

- No public transport, your car breaks, you are shit out of luck.

- I feel like I spend my entire life racking leaves, picking up twigs, chopping wood just to help maintain the area; we live in the woods.

- Sideroads are fucked in the winter, so you need to really plan your commute to work if it's going to snow. Sometimes you honestly can't make it out.

- The power goes out all the time because of all the trees, tiny wind storm... power goes out, perfectly calm out... power goes out. I'm being serious, it happens at least once a month where I live an often last over 6 hours. A lot of people have generators here.

- I hear coyotes killing animals very often, hearing nature is cool, and them calling is cool, but listening to them rip apart a neighbourhood cat/dog; it happens/racoon/fox really is an experience that is unsettling. I have countless audio on my phone of them hunting from this summer, I couldn't sleep some nights it was happening on my lawn.

- You really do have to watch for wildlife on the roads, deer do randomly pop up and have caused accidents that have actually hurt people I know. My friend totaled his new car because he reacted the wrong way when one popped up..

- Caledon is the worst place for mosquitos, there are countless pounds/mini lakes/stagnant bogs/marshes that make them the perfect breeding ground. My SO from Alabama thinks this place is messed up and he lived on the bajou where mosquitos are 5 x the size.

- Everyone speeds like a mad man on the sideroads which actually make them partially dangerous

- There is no crime so police are there to harass the general public basically. I go through ride programs all the time, though I don't drink and drive and agree with them, it's kind of annoying to be stopped at 3 p.m on a Tuesday.

- 4th highest property tax in the country

- Did I mention how inconvienent it is, you usually can't just walk to a bar, store, get groceries, everything closes early, my local bar /restaurant isn't open on Mon-Wed . Many stores/ restaurants have weird hours. It's like 30 years ago in some places.



Also that is awesome you got to see the Badlands earlier, and I've actually never been there as late as November, I usually just take friends/family not from the area in the summer, it must have been nice then.

A lot of people seem to use it as a filming location, and wedding photos used to be quiet popular there. I can remember when it was barely known and basically only locals ever went there, now you can't go without it being jam packed. I'm voting Conservative. 

I know, I'm evil.

Green party hits home the hardest with me, but I'm a hypocrite. Your quotes are making me think you are mocking me, but maybe I'm just being a "paro" "high" "dumbass" haha.

What do you think the warning of concern is? Just like a general warning that could be applied to anything?or actual health problems?

I don't "get" much, I'm an idiot. Everything I say is crackpot theories. I'll watch that doc, I've already seen it but don't remember it and I think you know why. Doritos and sodeey pop. Haha

BBC makes some quality craperoo. I've watched a lot of dream documentaries but it's usually just pseudo science and even my dumbass can smell bullshit, since this is BBC I'll give it more credit. 

What does your username mean? I always forget to ask. 
&gt;Would you bother to tell them that not even Helen Keller would think they're straight?

You're the best doe.


---------------Me and my boyfriend do this to extremely bad levels, to the point we had a talk were we decided we have to start saying actual nice things to eachother because we started to believe the insults.

It was fun at first, but he is a carbon copy of me personality wise, so by the end of it we were saying some pretty nasty stuff.

It is lots of fun if you are the type of person that likes being insulted, which I actually do. Oh shit sorry to scare you.

Coyotes are nocturnal hunters, they only come out at night, and they rarely approach humans. It's loose dogs that get targeted and at night, you will be 100% safe on trails and won't see/hear one. 

Haha, wow that pig farm story sounds like a nightmare, we get the smell of manure, but that's about it, there are slaughterhouses but nothing on the scale you mentioned, that is actually pretty freaking gross haha, I couldn't imagine the smell of that.

It isn't bad, I was just trying to say what makes country living bad, there are bad things about the city too. Too much traffic, lack of parking, crime, light pollution, constant noise.....etc.

Where did you live before? it sounds like you were in the states. Also it sounds like you would like to live in Caledon, if you are used to power outages....etc they're not a big deal. I mean once a month isn't horrendous, it's just annoying when a storm is coming and you know that you may not have power that night. I'm a weirdo that doesn't like people looking at me during sex, I get self conscious about sweat and other crap... I know stupid, I'm sleeping with somebody and think they don't want to look at me.

I usually go by their vocals for speed/pressure.

Missionary for me is just annoying because access can be harder/ I don't want them to look at me haha... I'm fucking weird. Haha ok, will do :)Thanks for mocking me dickface haha . I'm super paranoid sometimes of people judging me, do not judge me. I knew you were too nice to be a bumbaclot. 

For some reason I thought nuxfuggin was fuxnuggin reversed, but I have no idea what fuxnuggin is and that was the next question to be asked.

It does sound funny, derp. day-o, me say day-oits lonely at the toppppp oooooooooohhhhhhhhhhhI actually never went to bed and am seriously considering just staying up till tomorrow as I have no work today.That I'm not the one grabbing their assbest description so far, I think people took this as a troll question, I legit was wondering what people's interpretation of that life would be like.

You sort of go by feel the most; like tactile, and maybe even recognize the feeling of things so much so that that becomes "your world", steps on a staircase, you may remember how each individual step feels and know when you are about to hit the bottom. &gt;  one of her students had greeted her with a hug in the morning and cracked a joke about the clothing my mother was wearing.

So she cracked a joke based on the feeling? That's really interesting.

&gt;The teachers would take the kids to a local park and the kids could find their way back to school by touch alone. They would could foot steps and their mental map included the shape of the foot part, smells, and the feeling of air movement, etc.

This is all awesome, I should have rephrased this to include all deaf and blind people; I thought it was rarer. 

Thanks so much, that was a great responseI know in Canada the 60's and 70's sort of became the start of the Quebec separatist movement being taken seriously.

A lot of the same stereotypes as the U.S since we are very similar culture. We didn't have the civil rights movement though so all that isn't in the stereotypes.

There also was a huge anti-US movement sort of in the 60's just like there was in the US itself, draft dodgers fleeing to Canada...etc.

Pierre Trudeau was an icon during the 70's I believe; he was our Prime Minister, and is associated with that era; because of the FLQ.

Canada basically had Quebec separatists bomb places, commit arson and kidnap Government officials during the 70s, and Trudeau was in charge during the crisis, so that decade is sort of associated with political instability in Canada's past. Present themfunniest thing is that episode made me uncomfortable as a kid because I sort of knew I was gay too and it kind of annoyed me. musicJerking off sometimes is just a thing you have to do, some people just get horny/ aroused and need to get rid of that feeling so they jerk off... I do it all the time, I'd hardly consider it going behind my partners back, I just don't expect him to be my jack off machine when I need to get to bed and have a boner. everyone loves wall, I bought a wall trimmer and it's horrible... but it could just be the model/ specific one I got that had problems.

Literally everyone else says Wahl is great so it must be, I wish I didn't get a lemon doe.I have no idea what that is? A gay show? Or just a show that touched on it?That's awesome, my best friend is from Romania; he lives in Caledon(Bolton).

Honestly, Barrie is actually pretty beautiful and there is a lot to do there for outdoors and plenty of places nearby.

Caledon sort of has the best "forest" trails that I've been on in Southern Ontario, but Barrie overall just for the outdoors is a bit superior even if it is a city, they have the lake, and plenty of close by spots.

Caledon unfortunately is on it's way to becoming just a part of the concrete mess that is the GTA, the south end that touches Brampton already is developed on the Brampton side and it's only a matter time before it starts heading North. 

No problem, hope you have fun and aren't disappointed!

pretty accurate actuallyYes everyone knows that Harper is secretly French and working for the underground FLQ movement, I mean the Niqab debate alongside with the PQ's proposed banning of religious clothes for public servant workers... I mean durrrrrr they're both god damn terroristssss! Go back to your countrryyy, I cannn'ttt underrrstaannnddd youuuuu!!!!

VIVA EL QUEBEC LIBRA!

DAS ICH BIN HARPER EIN UNT FUHRER!!Can confirm said skidmark, I do his laundry.How could you not listen to [her](http://cdn.makeagif.com/media/8-15-2015/CL4xYt.gif) she's so majestic. Isn't there a name for those types of stories in German literature?

I remember I read the book Siddartha by Herman Hesse when I was a kid and had to do a project on a certain type of writing style, and for some strange reason I chose this German coming of age story writing style that has a name for the genre : Bildungsroman...

haha was that what the movie was?Haha maybe he can get a doubled ended one and him and the Oil sands can have a party while wearing a niqab what a dewche bag

[Time for Change! Godda Re-Arrange!](https://youtu.be/VS2vAhDy9v8?t=19)

Sha na-na-na-na na na Sha na na na naaa

I can't wait till we become the Canady Bunch Again!

Are you serious?Pretty similar

[Nine Inch Nails - Closer](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=zvIzL7LvTT8)

and this Korean band

[Yukari - Hang On](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fGWKJtQgQEQ)

post are also industrialish rock/electronic music

[Koi](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=SMu9dGm2bE0)

[Senpai](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=C94lR2QNNns)

[Yppah](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=L4nqLXg_SuI)

[La Fine Equipe; and basically everyone that makes it up especially Fakear](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=LjgWBqJG1yI)

[m A i t r o](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=WzxGPit_8UQ) &lt;-- get the name from that youtube link

[Onra](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=G7vYieITEHM)I like a lot of 30s/40s/50s sample triphop/chill hop

Like [L'Orange](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=qRs0MrfDhmw)

[JIM](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=UU0qs8jqUsQ)

[Brock Berrigan](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=d1ZeRy7rtOU)

[Birocratic](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Sw7NL10tu4c)

[Le Melodist](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=AfI2ExekxDY)

who may I like, I listen to basically all subgenres of electronic music besides heavy EDM. 
Pretty sure is assholeYa they're both pretty freaking ugly actually in my opinion, and sterile.

Almost like no effort went into them, the Coat of Arms with Red background for England,with Union Jack for UK, it kind of is over doing the "This is the British Empire"

I'd like to see something like the [Franco-Ontario flag](http://4.bp.blogspot.com/--ORfqxPUzWU/UmykdLXfhuI/AAAAAAAAEE0/2FFogE-JCcQ/s1600/Franco-Ontarian_flag.jpg), the trillium is a good symbol, or maybe even a [windswept eastern white pine silhouette](http://tidcf.nrcan.gc.ca/images_web/imfc/arbres/dessins/moyen/GR03_Pinus_str_silhouette.gif) in black with a red background; to keep ties to the roots of Canada it's not bad to give a nod to the culture that partially created the province.

Manitoba could be one of the first provinces to incorporate native symbols into their flag/ just general symbols of the province since they have a large native population and it'd be a good way to actually start incorporating them into the history. I know the territories do this, but they aren't provinces. Ontario could even do it. Those are both nice, I actually like Saskatchewans the best believe it or not, it's pretty original.

As for the Territories, if they were included I'd say Nunavut has the best flag in Canada. It's pretty simple.

Newfoundland and Labrador have a pretty awesome flag too.

All of them are nice minus Ontario and Manitoba, that's what you get for entering early province hood without much of an identity like the east coast had, at least Quebec had the decency to revamp a French symbol, and not just paste the French flag in the corner with the Quebec coat of arms in the centre.
pansexual means they don't mind who you identify as gender wise, so a bisexual only likes guys and girls that are born into those bodies, pansexuals are attracted to gender identities and not just assigned gender like bisexualsWhat do you want to be better about him? Is it just he doesn't take care of himself? Like hair, facial hair, body...etc?

Or is it something that is unchangeable; like facial structure? Is he actually unattractive or just not your type?

Why do you feel you could do better, do you think you are slightly embarrassed of him maybe? Possibly other peoples opinions are affecting your opinion?

When you first started dating were you ever attracted to him, or did you know you weren't but could "put" up with it sexually and can't anymore?

.... my opinion is sometimes peoples mannerisms/personality can be a turn off even if they are a great and loving person. Some people don't like clinginess, some people don't like people who are overly nice, some people don't like blurb blurb. So do you think maybe you were attracted to him but you are realizing his personality isn't what you are attracted to.

You can like somebody as a person, and think they're really nice/funny/great but not be attracted to their personality in that way, sometimes they just do things that are sexual turn offs. I know plenty of great people I wouldn't want to be in a relationship with that just aren't "my type" and it really affects how I see them physically, I put like a "sterile" label on them almost. Even if they're good looking. And sometimes it's just people who think they're superior and can't handle a joke, I was trolling :) Making a crackpot theory up from your comment and not even trying to give off negative vibes to you.

You find it stupid, I was just trying to make a joke, sometimes people can't see the humour. 

Article is on anti-Harper sensationalism and you said &gt; whipping up Quebec separatist sympathies in Quebec.

I decided to take a giant leap in connecting Harper to the FLQ and the PQ; I know stupid, and that they're both anti-Islam Quebec separatist extremists.

Then I decided to take the roll of a hill billy for some reason telling Harper and the PQ to go back to their country; which is what Liberals accuse Harper' of being.

I used moronic Spanish/French version of vive le quebec libre

and what I think sounds like German from what I've seen myself. To look like it's saying Harper is the Father; comparing him to Hitler. 

Calling you an asshole was out of line, but stop calling silly people stupid, we just don't take everything serious, and some of us make bad jokes. I'm joking wrong, sometimes their a hit or a miss, you can't learn to improve what appeals to general users of certain subreddits till you try.

Again, apologized for calling you an asshole, but I think some people may get what I was going for. I just am a fan of anti-humour, satire, and general stupidity. It's low brow at times. 

&gt; Deficit's are not a problem

I'm pretty sure they're a big problem, that could potentially affect all Canadians in the future... so they're not exactly something to mess with.

I have no idea Trudeau's exact plan, but I commend him for at least being honest about his plan. He is under the impression; could work or fail, that spending money can create money, and that in the long term the money spent that will put us into a larger deficit, will translate into enough to pay it back and grow the economy.

I have no idea what the logistics of this entail; where spending would be...etc, but you can't say they're not a problem, they have proven to be disastrous for many countries, Greece, Italy, and Japan is on the way. 

Not saying Trudeau is going to do Greek style infrastructure spending or provide too many social services, but debts have screwed over countries, there are other examples too. I was saying generally growing deficits just amplifies the problem. Most people don't know the intricate details of economics, environmental policy....etc, doesn't mean they can't have an opinion on them from basic understanding. 

No need to use harsh language, can you explain to me Trudeau's plan, because I've yet to hear anything cohesive besides basic filler. 

or just provide a link.

I'm also unaware of an example of where growing debt actually helped a country or jurisdiction. Stop assuming people don't know that, did you just recently learn this stuff and think because you didn't know it before other people must not?

That's all fucking basic understanding of the fucking world, not just economics, everyone knows all monetary entities pretty much borrow money/cut internal spending to spend more on and increase production.

I am saying Justin has said nothing that translates into what you are getting at, who knows what he is going to spend money on? Increase health care, Pensions, low interest rates? Who fucking knows, you don't know either.

Stop acting superior, I have no idea what your previous knowledge is, stop assuming you know random strangers on the internet .Alright buddy.. I'm backing out of this, I know I'm not talking to an intelligent person, I gave you enough time to prove you can articulate yourself in a non-aggressive way, but you clearly can't. 

You need to learn basic social skills.At least all the gay people I know, which isn't many, were against the Cons for that reason.

Everyone on that other subreddit seemed to know about their stance on gay marriage, so I just assumed it was common knowledge.

Can you confirm Baird is gay I've only read he was online, never from anything official.

I also if you read my post history or my above, you'll see I know that they wouldn't touch it and it's just appease the super right wing.

I don't think Reddit is anti-conservative either, I see plenty of people supporting republicans the odd time, maybe anti-Conservative for Canadians but you can blame the election on that everyone only heard negatives about them.

/r/Europe can be pretty conservative too. 

I don't get your comment on the Christian Heritage Party; I have no idea what that is. How would the CPC removing their stance given them more funding? Is it because the CPC is taking their funding from the super right winged Christians?

I come from a Conservative part of Canada too, but I'm literally on the border of Liberal land, downtown Toronto is only 40 minutes away; and I was born in Etobicoke. My riding; Dufferin-Caledon, always votes for Conservatives, I don't think they've ever voted Liberal during it's history; possibly when the riding didn't exist. 

I knew the Conservatives were hit hard because it was almost a close race in my area, and the Liberals usually come in last, the Green party came in second last election. This time strong support for the Liberals, really surprised me. A lot of farmers, and rich people in this area. 

That could be a factor, maybe age too, I'm 25, so a lot of gay people my age are set up to be anti-conservative because a lot of people my age are set up to be that way; at least in Ontario. Almost every gay person I know ends up living in Toronto; I'm one of the last still holding out and my boyfriend in the country don't think I'll ever move downtown. 

Haha my area has voted Conservative 6 times in a row, I think prior to that it was a different riding/grouping, but I know for sure they hardly vote Liberal.

Funny because the ridings, South, and East of us have traditionally voted Liberals, and the ridings North and West are the same as us and have voted Conservatives 6 times in a row.

Ontario is stagnant. Why do the outspoken ones always have to be racist idiots?

I'm a Conservative supporter, but this shit does not help, they make the average Con voter look like rednecks. Not my brand, I'm not loyal to any party, the Cons have just consistently earned my trust; please no one try and convince me otherwise.

I don't hate the Liberals either.

Ford Nation is not respected among Conservatives either, and frankly I'm surprised they're Conservative considering they're from Toronto. The Ford's are just idiots, and the Conservatives are idiots for ever thinking associating with them would earn their respect.

This was my reaction

https://www.reddit.com/r/metacanada/comments/3pbbvz/rob_ford_on_twitter/cw4zqulEasy there nelly. That's a little judgmental now isn't it?
By me not being a complete moron and actually understanding why we ran deficits, and not being brainwashed by Liberal media.

Sorry, you can't say someone disgusts you based on what party they voted for, that is actually so ridiculously unCanadian.

Looked through your post history, you also blasted old people for being stupid, you need to recheck how you look at the world, you sound more like a Nazi than Harper ever was. He thoughts Jews disgusted them for holding their beliefs, you think Conservative voters are disgusting just because of one scandal? Something that every fucking party does. 

Do you even realize that global financial crisis had a huge impact on our economy?

And that every Western nation RAN DEFICITS, and that Canada was actually doing the BEST out of the G7, and that we have a lower debt to GDP ratio than the majority of other Western nations?

Did you ever stop to think about that? That our economy is a global economy based on exports and imports, and that if shit goes wrong in other countries there is nothing we can do about it.

You can't base a history of a party on their current policies.

You know the Conservatives did NAFTA? Something that benefits Canadians and the ECONOMY in a shit ton of ways?

Did you know the Liberals are the only party to lower immigration rates? Ever? In the 1990's?

DId you know Harper government saw the highest rate of immigration, even during a recession? We had the highest year in recent history two years ago, 287,000 people.

You don't know what you are talking about, and neither do a lot of people.

Chretien and Martin's Government set the path for being fiscally responsible and Harper utilized that as best he could but sometimes the GLOBE doesn't want to co-operate with you.

You are way too brainwashed by face book feeds and need to read something that isn't Liberally biased.

The entire world has been commending us for how we survived the recession, every other country has faced economic downturn. You are here saying every single leader in Europe and North America is an idiot?

Learn about economics, they include other countries. 

Don't even try talking about the economy to somebody from Alberta, the oil sands boomed the shit out of that province. Why do you think they've been such heavy Conservative supporters?

Now oil prices are getting too high again for it to be worth doing the tar sands, that's the GLOBES fault, not Canada's, we are NOT OPEC, we DO NOT SET OIL PRICES.

Learn about the world, and how things in other countries effect ours.

Do you even know whats going on in Europe? DO you even know whats going on in Japan? Do you even know whats going on in the USA? They're all fucked, way worse than Canada. 

A real informed Canadian voter isn't a partisan nimrod, I can credit the Liberals for things they do well, and they've done a lot of good, and so have the Conservatives. 

The Liberals in Ontario are absolute filth, so obviously Parties don't matter and the people do. True, maybe I flipped out a little too much.

Let's all just Canada in Canada for Canada. To me it's not a turn on, but no problem with it. I'm just not into the whole "straight guys" thing.it's actually relatively recently that our "ultra" superficiality came to fruition.

Prior to maybe 50 years ago, we still praised the beautiful, but it wasn't expected of everyone. Though people generally were in better shape back then anyway, so it must have felt a lot more like equal ground. 

I'm talking about all humans, because our brains are still human.As a white guy that likes basically anyone that is attractive, it's annoying when people assume I have a "fetish" for it, when it's just more I'm used to seeing different types of people so I sort of developed an attraction to them as well.

No preference; possibly preference for Middle Eastern.

Not taking away, it's just annoying when people stereotype white people into other races as having a fetish... how does that even work?Hard to say, I'm not going to pick my favourite ones and give an honest opinion of who I think has a lot of production skill and knowledge.

1)[Prefuse 73](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=TDUQ4-DAEUY)  hands down for me, he's been at it since like 2000, pretty much pioneered Glitch music, and is really experimental. A lot of his old stuff sounds like it could have been produced today. That track provided was produced this year, but it sounds exactly like his stuff 15 years ago. Not a lot of other artists have a track record like him, or pretty much created a style of music. 

2) [Bonobo](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ztjmnJs_2ek) super diverse

3) [Emancipator](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9op3cgh4680) again just really diverse

Really hard to choose. I'd mention J Dilla too; but he's dead. 

Favourite would have been Brock Berrigan and Gramatik, but they use too many sampes; still really good though. 

I don't know what kind of feel you are going for, since it's outdoorsy obviously a folksy sound would suit it best.

I don't really know much of that kind of music, but since it's in fast motion there are some songs I can suggest that might suit that time passing feeling. It's all instrumentals without lyrics, so it should generally be non offensive to peoples ears; it doesn't throw ideas into your head like lyrics do.

[Untitled 4 -Teebs](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=A25PTzqgbEk)

[Superpoze - Iceland Sound](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=rTz26pKS4A8) icy feel; for north, fast past for fast motion

[Kenmochi Hidefumi - Snowflake](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FJ21USAHzYg) t